Connecticut, session 2026, HB05350.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (q) of section 1-1 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(q) Except as otherwise specifically defined, the words "agriculture"
and "farming" include cultivation of the soil, dairying, forestry, raising
or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the
raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training and management of
livestock, including horses, bees, the production of honey, poultry, fur-
bearing animals and wildlife, and the raising or harvesting of oysters,
clams, mussels, other molluscan shellfish or fish; the operation,
management, conservation, improvement or maintenance of a farm and
its buildings, tools and equipment, or salvaging timber or cleared land
of brush or other debris left by a storm, as an incident to such farming
operations; the production or harvesting of maple syrup or maple sugar,
or any agricultural commodity, including lumber, as an incident to
ordinary farming operations or the harvesting of mushrooms, the
hatching of poultry, or the construction, operation or maintenance of
ditches, canals, reservoirs or waterways used exclusively for farming

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
purposes; handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing,
freezing, grading, storing or delivering to storage or to market, or to a
carrier for transportation to market, or for direct sale any agricultural or
horticultural commodity as an incident to ordinary farming operations,
or, in the case of fruits and vegetables, as an incident to the preparation
of such fruits or vegetables for market or for direct sale. The term "farm"
includes farm buildings, and accessory buildings thereto, nurseries,
orchards, ranges, greenhouses, hoophouses and other temporary
structures or other structures used primarily for the raising and, as an
incident to ordinary farming operations, the sale of agricultural or
horticultural commodities. The terms "agriculture" and "farming" do not
include the cultivation of cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-
240, as amended by this act. The term "aquaculture" means the farming
of the waters of the state and tidal wetlands and the production of
protein food, including fish, oysters, clams, mussels and other
molluscan shellfish, on leased, franchised and public underwater farm
lands. Nothing herein shall restrict the power of a local zoning authority
under chapter 124.
Sec. 2. Subparagraph (H) of subdivision (7) of subsection (c) of section
7-148 of the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted
in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(H) (i) Secure the safety of persons in or passing through the
municipality by regulation of shows, processions, parades and music;
(ii) Regulate and prohibit the carrying on within the municipality of
any trade, manufacture, business or profession which is, or may be, so
carried on as to become prejudicial to public health, conducive to fraud
and cheating, or dangerous to, or constituting an unreasonable
annoyance to, those living or owning property in the vicinity;
(iii) Regulate auctions and garage and tag sales;
Public Act No. 26-8 2 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(iv) Prohibit, restrain, license and regulate the business of peddlers,
auctioneers and junk dealers in a manner not inconsistent with the
general statutes;
(v) Regulate and prohibit swimming or bathing in the public or
exposed places within the municipality;
(vi) Regulate and license the operation of amusement parks and
amusement arcades including, but not limited to, the regulation of
mechanical rides and the establishment of the hours of operation;
(vii) Prohibit, restrain, license and regulate all sports, exhibitions,
public amusements and performances and all places where games may
be played;
(viii) Preserve the public peace and good order, prevent and quell
riots and disorderly assemblages and prevent disturbing noises;
(ix) Establish a system to obtain a more accurate registration of births,
marriages and deaths than the system provided by the general statutes
in a manner not inconsistent with the general statutes;
(x) Control insect pests or plant diseases in any manner deemed
appropriate;
(xi) Provide for the health of the inhabitants of the municipality and
do all things necessary or desirable to secure and promote the public
health;
(xii) Regulate the use of streets, sidewalks, highways, public places
and grounds for public and private purposes;
(xiii) Make and enforce police, sanitary or other similar regulations
and protect or promote the peace, safety, good government and welfare
of the municipality and its inhabitants;
Public Act No. 26-8 3 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(xiv) Regulate, in addition to the requirements under section 7-282b,
the installation, maintenance and operation of any device or equipment
in a residence or place of business which is capable of automatically
calling and relaying recorded emergency messages to any state police
or municipal police or fire department telephone number or which is
capable of automatically calling and relaying recorded emergency
messages or other forms of emergency signals to an intermediate third
party which shall thereafter call and relay such emergency messages to
a state police or municipal police or fire department telephone number.
Such regulations may provide for penalties for the transmittal of false
alarms by such devices or equipment;
(xv) Make and enforce regulations for the prevention and
remediation of housing blight or blight upon any commercial real
property, including regulations reducing assessments and authorizing
designated agents of the municipality to enter property during
reasonable hours for the purpose of remediating blighted conditions,
provided such regulations define blight and require such municipality
to give written notice of any violation to the owner of the property and
provide a reasonable opportunity for the owner to remediate the
blighted conditions prior to any enforcement action being taken, except
that a municipality may take immediate enforcement action in the case
of a violation at a property that is the third or more such blight violation
at such property during the prior twelve-month period, and further
provided such regulations shall not authorize such municipality or its
designated agents to enter any dwelling house or structure on such
property, and including regulations establishing a duty to maintain
property and specifying standards to determine if there is neglect;
prescribe civil penalties for the violation of such regulations (I) for
housing blight upon real property containing six or fewer dwelling
units, of not more than one hundred fifty dollars for each day that a
violation continues if such violation occurs at an occupied property, not
more than two hundred fifty dollars for each day that a violation
Public Act No. 26-8 4 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
continues if such violation occurs at a vacant property, and not more
than one thousand dollars for each day that a violation continues at a
property if such violation is the third or more such violation at such
property during the prior twelve-month period, (II) for housing blight
upon real property containing more than six but fewer than forty
dwelling units, not more than ten cents per square foot of each
residential building upon such real property for each day that a
violation continues, (III) for housing blight upon real property
containing forty or more dwelling units, not more than twelve cents per
square foot of each residential building upon such real property for each
day that a violation continues, and (IV) for blight upon any commercial
real property, not more than ten cents per square foot of any commercial
building upon such real property for each day that a violation continues.
If any such civil penalties are prescribed, such municipality shall adopt
a citation hearing procedure in accordance with section 7-152c. For the
sole purpose of determining if a violation is the third or more such
violation at such property during the prior twelve-month period,
"violation" means a violation of any municipal blight regulation for
which the municipality has issued a notice of violation and either, in the
determination of such municipality, the conditions creating such
violation were previously cured or one hundred twenty days have
passed from the notice of violation and the conditions creating such
violation have not been cured. A third violation may also be established
where three or more conditions constituting such violation exist at a
property simultaneously;
(xvi) Regulate, on any property owned by or under the control of the
municipality, any activity deemed to be deleterious to public health,
including the burning of a lighted cigarette, cigar, pipe or similar device,
whether containing, wholly or in part, tobacco or cannabis, as defined
in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act, and the use or
consumption of cannabis, including, but not limited to, electronic
cannabis delivery systems, as defined in section 19a-342a, as amended
Public Act No. 26-8 5 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
by this act, or vapor products, as defined in said section, containing
cannabis. If the municipality's population is greater than fifty thousand,
such regulations shall designate a place in the municipality in which
public consumption of cannabis is permitted. Such regulations may
prohibit the smoking of cannabis and the use of electronic cannabis
delivery systems and vapor products containing cannabis in the
outdoor sections of a restaurant. Such regulations may prescribe
penalties for the violation of such regulations, provided such fine does
not exceed fifty dollars for a violation of such regulations regarding
consumption by an individual or a fine in excess of one thousand dollars
to any business for a violation of such regulations;
Sec. 3. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 12-330ll of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(1) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section [21a-420]
21a-240, as amended by this act;
Sec. 4. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (120) of section 12-412 of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(B) Nonprescription drugs or medicines do not include cosmetics,
dentifrices, mouthwash, shaving and hair care products, soaps,
deodorants or products containing cannabis or cannabinoids. As used
in this subparagraph, "cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in
section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act, and "cannabinoids"
means manufactured cannabinoids or synthetic cannabinoids, as such
terms are defined in section 21a-240, as amended by this act.
Sec. 5. Section 12-650 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, revision of 1958,
Public Act No. 26-8 6 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
revised to January 1, 2021, any outstanding liabilities or assessments, or
any portion thereof, made under said chapter related to the sale,
purchase, acquisition or possession within the state or the transport or
importation into the state, of [marijuana] cannabis, as defined in section
21a-240, as amended by this act, shall be cancelled. The Commissioner
of Revenue Services may take any action necessary to effectuate the
cancellation of such liabilities and assessments. No cancellation of a
liability or an assessment pursuant to this section shall entitle any
person affected by such cancellation to a refund or credit of any amount
previously paid or collected in connection with such liability or
assessment.
Sec. 6. Subdivision (13) of subsection (a) of section 12-704d of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(13) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section [21a-
420] 21a-240, as amended by this act; and
Sec. 7. Subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 14-36 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) (1) No motor vehicle operator's license shall be issued to any
applicant who is sixteen or seventeen years of age unless the applicant
has held a youth instruction permit and has satisfied the requirements
specified in this subsection. The applicant shall (A) submit to the
commissioner, in such manner as the commissioner shall direct, a
certificate of the successful completion (i) in a public secondary school,
a technical education and career school or a private secondary school of
a full course of study in motor vehicle operation prepared as provided
in section 14-36e, (ii) of training of similar nature provided by a licensed
drivers' school approved by the commissioner, or (iii) of home training
in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection, including, in each
Public Act No. 26-8 7 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
case, or by a combination of such types of training, successful
completion of: Not less than forty clock hours of behind-the-wheel, on-
the-road instruction for applicants to whom a youth instruction permit
is issued on or after August 1, 2008; (B) submit to the commissioner, in
such manner as the commissioner shall direct, a certificate of the
successful completion of (i) a course of not less than eight hours relative
to safe driving practices, including a minimum of four hours on the
nature and the medical, biological and physiological effects of alcohol
and drugs, including cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240,
as amended by this act, and their impact on the operator of a motor
vehicle, the dangers associated with the operation of a motor vehicle
after the consumption of alcohol or drugs by the operator, the problems
of alcohol and drug abuse, the penalties for alcohol and drug-related
motor vehicle violations and a video presentation specific to the impact
of cannabis on the operator of a motor vehicle and how the ingestion of
cannabis can cause impairment of motor function, reaction time,
perception and peripheral vision, and (ii) for applicants to whom a
youth instruction permit is issued on or after January 1, 2026, the
highway work zone and roadside vehicle safety awareness program
established in section 14-111r; and (C) pass an examination which may
include a comprehensive test as to knowledge of the laws concerning
motor vehicles and the rules of the road in addition to the test required
under subsection (c) of this section and shall include an on-the-road
skills test as prescribed by the commissioner. At the time of application
and examination for a motor vehicle operator's license, an applicant
sixteen or seventeen years of age shall have held a youth instruction
permit for not less than one hundred eighty days, except that an
applicant who presents a certificate under subparagraph (A)(i) or
[subparagraph] (A)(ii) of this subdivision shall have held a youth
instruction permit for not less than one hundred twenty days and an
applicant who is undergoing training and instruction by the driver
training unit for persons with disabilities in accordance with the
provisions of section 14-11b shall have held such permit for the period
Public Act No. 26-8 8 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
of time required by said unit. The commissioner shall approve the
content of the safe driving practices course at drivers' schools, high
schools and other secondary schools. Subject to such standards and
requirements as the commissioner may impose, the commissioner may
authorize any drivers' school, licensed in good standing in accordance
with the provisions of section 14-69, or secondary school driver
education program authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 14-
36e, to administer the comprehensive test as to knowledge of the laws
concerning motor vehicles and the rules of the road, required pursuant
to subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, as part of the safe driving
practices course required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this
subdivision, and to certify to the commissioner, under oath, the results
of each such test administered. Such hours of instruction required by
this subdivision shall be included as part of or in addition to any existing
instruction programs. Any fee charged for the course required under
subparagraph (B)(i) or (B)(ii) of this subdivision shall not exceed two
hundred dollars. Any applicant sixteen or seventeen years of age who,
while a resident of another state, completed the course required in
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, but did not complete the safe
driving practices course required in subparagraph (B) of this
subdivision, shall complete the safe driving practices course. The
commissioner may waive any requirement in this subdivision, except
for the requirements of subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, in the case
of an applicant sixteen or seventeen years of age who holds a valid
motor vehicle operator's license issued by any other state, provided the
commissioner is satisfied that the applicant has received training and
instruction of a similar nature.
Sec. 8. Subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 14-227a of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) In any prosecution for a violation of subdivision (1) of subsection
Public Act No. 26-8 9 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(a) of this section in which it is alleged that the defendant's operation of
a motor vehicle was impaired, in whole or in part, by consumption of
cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act,
the court may take judicial notice that the ingestion of cannabis (A) can
impair a person's ability to operate a motor vehicle; (B) can cause
impairment of motor function, reaction time, tracking ability, cognitive
attention, decision-making, judgment, perception, peripheral vision,
impulse control or memory; and (C) does not enhance a person's ability
to safely operate a motor vehicle.
Sec. 9. Subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of section 15-140r of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (a) of this section
in which it is alleged that the defendant's operation of a vessel was
impaired, in whole or in part, by consumption of cannabis, as defined
in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act, the court may take
judicial notice that the ingestion of cannabis (A) can impair a person's
ability to operate a vessel; (B) can cause impairment of motor function,
reaction time, tracking ability, cognitive attention, decision-making,
judgment, perception, peripheral vision, impulse control or memory;
and (C) does not enhance a person's ability to safely operate a vessel.
Sec. 10. Subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 19a-342 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(3) "Cannabis" [means marijuana, as defined] has the same meaning
as provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act; and
Sec. 11. Subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of section 19a-342a of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-8 10 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(6) "Cannabis" [means marijuana, as defined] has the same meaning
as provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act;
Sec. 12. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-3b of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(1) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section [21a-420]
21a-240, as amended by this act;
Sec. 13. Section 21a-8c of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) There shall be a State-Wide Cannabis, [and] Hemp and Controlled
Substances Enforcement [Policy] Board consisting of the Attorney
General, the Chief State's Attorney, the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services
[, the Commissioner of Public Health,] and the Commissioner of
Revenue Services, [and the executive director of the Social Equity
Council,] or their designees.
(b) The [policy] board shall convene quarterly to (1) identify areas of
need and enforcement opportunities concerning illegal cannabis sales,
[and] intoxicating hemp product sales and controlled substance sales,
and (2) [examine scientific developments and public health studies
concerning cannabis and hemp, (3)] examine developments in national
trends and best practices concerning cannabis, [and] hemp [regulation]
and controlled substance enforcement. [, and (4) examine developments
in the cannabis and hemp industries.]
(c) The quarterly meetings of the board, and all documents related to
such meetings, shall not be available to the public or subject to
inspection or disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, as
Public Act No. 26-8 11 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
defined in section 1-200.
Sec. 14. Section 21a-12g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Not later than December 1, 2022, the Department of Consumer
Protection shall develop documents concerning the safe storage by
consumers of (1) prescription drugs, as defined in section 19a-754b, and
(2) cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this
act, and cannabis products, as defined in section 21a-420, as amended
by this act. Such documents shall contain, but need not be limited to,
information concerning best practices for (A) storing prescription drugs
and cannabis and cannabis products in a manner that renders such items
inaccessible to children, and (B) disposal of unused and expired
prescription drugs and cannabis and cannabis products. Not later than
December 15, 2022, the department shall publish such documents on its
Internet web site.
Sec. 15. Subsection (d) of section 21a-106 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or
hypnotic substance alpha-eucaine, beta-eucaine, bromal, cannabis,
carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, [marijuana,]
morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote or sulphonmethane, or any
chemical derivative of any such substance, which derivative has been
designated as habit-forming by regulations promulgated under Section
352(d) of the federal act; unless its label bears the name and quantity or
proportion of such substance or derivative and in juxtaposition
therewith the statement "Warning-may be habit-forming";
Sec. 16. Subdivisions (20) to (29), inclusive, of section 21a-240 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-8 12 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(20) (A) "Drug paraphernalia" means equipment, products and
materials of any kind that are used, intended for use or designed for use
in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting,
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing,
containing or concealing, or ingesting, inhaling or otherwise
introducing into the human body, any controlled substance contrary to
the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to: (i) Kits
intended for use or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing or harvesting [of] any species of plant that is a
controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be
derived; (ii) kits used, intended for use or designed for use in
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing or
preparing controlled substances; (iii) isomerization devices used or
intended for use in increasing the potency of any species of plant that is
a controlled substance; (iv) testing equipment used, intended for use or
designed for use in identifying or analyzing the strength, effectiveness
or purity of controlled substances; (v) dilutents and adulterants,
including, but not limited to, quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite,
dextrose and lactose used, intended for use or designed for use in
cutting controlled substances; (vi) separation gins and sifters used,
intended for use or designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from,
or in otherwise cleaning or refining, [marijuana] cannabis; (vii) capsules
and other containers used, intended for use or designed for use in
packaging small quantities of controlled substances; (viii) containers
and other objects used, intended for use or designed for use in storing
or concealing controlled substances; and (ix) objects used, intended for
use or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing
[marijuana] cannabis, cocaine, hashish or hashish oil into the human
body, including, but not limited to, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic
or ceramic pipes with screens, permanent screens, hashish heads or
Public Act No. 26-8 13 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
punctured metal bowls; water pipes; carburetion tubes and devices;
smoking and carburetion masks; roach clips; miniature cocaine spoons
and cocaine vials; chamber pipes; carburetor pipes; electric pipes; air-
driven pipes; chillums; bongs; ice pipes and chillers. "Drug
paraphernalia" does not include a product used by a manufacturer
licensed pursuant to this chapter for the activities permitted under the
license or by an individual to test any substance prior to injection,
inhalation or ingestion of the substance to prevent accidental overdose
by injection, inhalation or ingestion of the substance, provided the
licensed manufacturer or individual is not using the product to engage
in the unlicensed manufacturing or distribution of controlled
substances. As used in this subdivision, "roach clip" means an object
used to hold burning material, including, but not limited to, a
[marijuana] cannabis cigarette, that has become too small or too short to
be held between the fingers.
(B) "Factory" means any place used for the manufacturing, mixing,
compounding, refining, processing, packaging, distributing, storing,
keeping, holding, administering or assembling of illegal substances
contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or any building, rooms or
location which contains equipment or paraphernalia used for this
purpose.
(21) "Federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 USC 801 et seq." means
Public Law 91-513, the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and
Control Act of 1970.
(22) "Federal food and drug laws" means the federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act, as amended, Title 21 USC 301 et seq.
(23) "Hallucinogenic substances" are psychodysleptic substances,
other than cannabis-type substances, which assert a confusional or
disorganizing effect upon mental processes or behavior and mimic
acute psychotic disturbances. Exemplary of such drugs are mescaline,
Public Act No. 26-8 14 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
peyote, psilocyn and d-lysergic acid diethylamide, which are controlled
substances under this chapter unless modified.
(24) "Hospital", as used in sections 21a-243 to 21a-283, inclusive, as
amended by this act, means an institution for the care and treatment of
the sick and injured, approved by the Department of Public Health or
the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services as proper to
be entrusted with the custody of controlled drugs and substances and
professional use of controlled drugs and substances under the direction
of a licensed practitioner.
(25) "Intern" means a person who holds a degree of doctor of
medicine or doctor of dental surgery or medicine and whose period of
service has been recorded with the Department of Public Health and
who has been accepted and is participating in training by a hospital or
institution in this state. Doctors meeting the foregoing requirements and
commonly designated as "residents" and "fellows" shall be regarded as
interns for purposes of this chapter.
(26) "Immediate precursor" means a substance which the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection has found to be, and by
regulation designates as being, the principal compound commonly used
or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
intermediary used or likely to be used, in the manufacture of a
controlled substance, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail
or limit manufacture.
(27) "Laboratory" means a laboratory approved by the Department of
Consumer Protection as proper to be entrusted with the custody of
controlled substances and the use of controlled substances for scientific
and medical purposes and for purposes of instruction, research or
analysis.
(28) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, cultivation,
Public Act No. 26-8 15 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
growing, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a
controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from
substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical
synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and
includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the
preparation or compounding of a controlled substance by an individual
for the individual's own use or the preparation, compounding,
packaging or labeling of a controlled substance: (A) By a practitioner as
an incident to the practitioner administering or dispensing [of] a
controlled substance in the course of such practitioner's professional
practice; or (B) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized
agent under such practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(29) ["Marijuana"] "Cannabis" (A) means all parts of any plant [,] or
species of the genus cannabis, or any infra specific taxon thereof,
whether growing or not; [the] (B) includes (i) every resin extracted from
any part of [the plant; every] such plant, including, but not limited to,
every resin extracted from (I) the mature stalks of such plant, (II) the
fiber produced from the mature stalks of such plant, or (III) the oil or
cake made from the seeds of such plant, (ii) every other compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of such plant [,] or
its resin, [; any] and (iii) every (I) high-THC hemp product, [;] (II)
manufactured [cannabinoids;] cannabinoid, or [cannabinon,] (III)
cannabinol or cannabidiol and chemical compounds which are similar
to [cannabinon,] cannabinol or cannabidiol in chemical structure or
which are similar thereto in physiological effect, which are controlled
substances under this chapter, except cannabidiol derived from hemp,
as defined in section 22-61l, as amended by this act, that is not a high-
THC hemp product; [. "Marijuana"] and (C) does not include [: (A) The]
(i) the mature stalks of such plant, (ii) the fiber produced from [such
stalks,] the mature stalks of such plant, (iii) the oil or cake made from
Public Act No. 26-8 16 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the seeds of such plant, (iv) any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture or preparation of [such] the mature stalks [, except
the resin extracted from such mature stalks or fiber, oil or cake; (B) the
seed] of such plant, (v) the seeds of such plant, [; (C)] (vi) hemp, as
defined in section 22-61l, as amended by this act, [(i)] (I) with a total THC
concentration of not more than three-tenths per cent on a dry-weight
basis, and [(ii)] (II) that is not a high-THC hemp product, [; (D)] (vii)
cannabinol, cannabigerol, cannabichromene or any other minor
cannabinoid derived from hemp, (viii) any substance approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration or successor agency as a drug
and reclassified in any schedule of controlled substances or
unscheduled by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or
successor agency which is included in the same schedule designated by
the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or successor agency, [;] or
[(E)] (ix) any infused [beverages] beverage, as defined in section 21a-
425, as amended by this act.
Sec. 17. Subsection (e) of section 21a-243 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(e) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall classify
[marijuana] cannabis as a controlled substance in schedule II under the
Connecticut controlled substance scheduling regulations, except that for
any [marijuana] cannabis product that has been approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration or successor agency to have a medical
use and that is reclassified in any schedule of controlled substances or
unscheduled by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or
successor agency, the commissioner shall adopt the schedule designated
by the Drug Enforcement Administration or successor agency. In the
event that [marijuana] cannabis is reclassified as a controlled substance
in schedule III, IV or V of the federal Controlled Substances Act, or is
unscheduled by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or
Public Act No. 26-8 17 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
successor agency, the commissioner shall adopt the schedule designated
by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or successor agency.
Sec. 18. Subsection (a) of section 21a-246 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) No person within this state shall manufacture, wholesale,
repackage, supply, compound, mix, cultivate or grow, or by other
process produce or prepare, controlled substances without first
obtaining a license to do so from the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection and no person within this state shall operate a laboratory for
the purpose of research or analysis using controlled substances without
first obtaining a license to do so from the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, except that such activities by pharmacists or pharmacies in
the filling and dispensing of prescriptions or activities incident thereto,
or the dispensing or administering of controlled substances by dentists,
podiatrists, physicians, physician assistants, advanced practice
registered nurses or veterinarians, or other persons acting under their
supervision, in the treatment of patients shall not be subject to the
provisions of this section, and provided laboratories for instruction in
dentistry, medicine, nursing, pharmacy, pharmacology and
pharmacognosy in institutions duly licensed for such purposes in this
state shall not be subject to the provisions of this section except with
respect to narcotic drugs and schedule I and II controlled substances.
Upon application of any physician or physician assistant licensed
pursuant to chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered nurse
licensed pursuant to chapter 378, the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection shall without unnecessary delay, (1) license such physician to
possess and supply [marijuana] cannabis for the treatment of glaucoma
or the side effects of chemotherapy, or (2) license such physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse to possess and supply
[marijuana] cannabis for the treatment of the side effects of
Public Act No. 26-8 18 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
chemotherapy. No person outside this state shall sell or supply
controlled substances within this state without first obtaining a license
to do so from the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, provided no
such license shall be required of a manufacturer whose principal place
of business is located outside this state and who is registered with the
federal Drug Enforcement Administration or other federal agency, and
who files a copy of such registration with the appropriate licensing
authority under this chapter.
Sec. 19. Section 21a-253 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any person may possess or have under [his] such person's control a
quantity of [marijuana] cannabis less than or equal to that quantity
supplied to [him] such person pursuant to a prescription made in
accordance with the provisions of section 21a-249 by (1) a physician
licensed under the provisions of chapter 370 and further authorized by
subsection (a) of section 21a-246, as amended by this act, by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection to possess and supply
[marijuana] cannabis for the treatment of glaucoma or the side effects of
chemotherapy, or (2) a physician assistant licensed under the provisions
of chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
the provisions of chapter 378, and further authorized by subsection (a)
of section 21a-246, as amended by this act, by said commissioner to
possess and supply [marijuana] cannabis for the treatment of the side
effects of chemotherapy.
Sec. 20. Subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of section 21a-277 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(3) For purposes of this subsection, "cannabis" has the same meaning
as provided in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act.
Public Act No. 26-8 19 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Sec. 21. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-279 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Any person who possesses or has under such person's control
any quantity of any controlled substance, except any quantity of
cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act,
and except as authorized in this chapter or chapter 420f, shall be guilty
of a class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 22. Subdivision (1) of subsection (j) of section 21a-279a of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(j) (1) As used in this section, "cannabis" [,] has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act, and "cannabis
flower", "cannabis trim", "cannabis concentrate" and "cannabis product"
have the same meanings as provided in section 21a-420, as amended by
this act.
Sec. 23. Section 21a-408 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this section, sections 21a-408a to 21a-408o, inclusive, as
amended by this act, and sections 21a-408r to 21a-408w, inclusive, as
amended by this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced practice
registered nurse licensed pursuant to chapter 378;
(2) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-240,
as amended by this act;
[(2)] (3) "Cannabis establishment" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-8 20 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(3)] (4) "Cannabis testing laboratory" means a person who (A) is
located in this state, (B) is licensed by the department to analyze
[marijuana] cannabis, and (C) meets the licensure requirements
established in section 21a-408r, as amended by this act, and the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of section 21a-408r, as
amended by this act;
[(4)] (5) "Cannabis testing laboratory employee" means a person who
is (A) employed at a cannabis testing laboratory, and (B) registered
pursuant to section 21a-408r, as amended by this act, and the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of section 21a-408r, as amended by
this act;
[(5)] (6) "Caregiver" means a person, other than the qualifying patient
and the qualifying patient's physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse, who is eighteen years of age or older and has
agreed to undertake responsibility for managing the well-being of the
qualifying patient with respect to the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis, provided (A) in the case of a qualifying patient (i) under
eighteen years of age and not an emancipated minor, or (ii) otherwise
lacking legal capacity, such person shall be a parent, guardian or person
having legal custody of such qualifying patient, and (B) in the case of a
qualifying patient eighteen years of age or older or an emancipated
minor, the need for such person shall be evaluated by the qualifying
patient's physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse and such need shall be documented in the written certification;
[(6)] (7) "Cultivation" includes planting, propagating, cultivating,
growing and harvesting;
[(7)] (8) "Debilitating medical condition" means (A) cancer, glaucoma,
positive status for human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune
deficiency syndrome, Parkinson's disease, multiple sclerosis, damage to
the nervous tissue of the spinal cord with objective neurological
Public Act No. 26-8 21 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
indication of intractable spasticity, epilepsy or uncontrolled intractable
seizure disorder, cachexia, wasting syndrome, Crohn's disease,
posttraumatic stress disorder, irreversible spinal cord injury with
objective neurological indication of intractable spasticity, cerebral palsy,
cystic fibrosis or terminal illness requiring end-of-life care, except, if the
qualifying patient is under eighteen years of age, "debilitating medical
condition" means terminal illness requiring end-of-life care, irreversible
spinal cord injury with objective neurological indication of intractable
spasticity, cerebral palsy, cystic fibrosis, severe epilepsy or uncontrolled
intractable seizure disorder, or (B) any medical condition, medical
treatment or disease approved for qualifying patients by the
Department of Consumer Protection and posted online pursuant to
section 21a-408l, as amended by this act;
[(8)] (9) "Dispensary facility" means a place of business, for which the
department has issued a dispensary facility license pursuant to this
chapter, where [marijuana] cannabis may be dispensed, sold or
distributed in accordance with this chapter and any regulations adopted
thereunder to qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-of-state patients,
caregivers [and for which the department has issued a dispensary
facility license pursuant to this chapter] and qualifying out-of-state
caregivers;
[(9)] (10) "Employee" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(10)] (11) "Institutional animal care and use committee" means a
committee that oversees an organization's animal program, facilities
and procedures to ensure compliance with federal policies, guidelines
and principles related to the care and use of animals in research;
[(11)] (12) "Institutional review board" means a specifically
constituted review body established or designated by an organization
to protect the rights and welfare of persons recruited to participate in
Public Act No. 26-8 22 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
biomedical, behavioral or social science research;
[(12)] (13) "Licensed dispensary" or "dispensary" means an individual
who is a licensed pharmacist employed by a dispensary facility or a
hybrid retailer, as defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(13) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240;]
(14) "Nurse" means a person who is licensed as a nurse under chapter
378;
(15) "Palliative use" (A) means (i) the acquisition, distribution,
transfer, possession, use or transportation of [marijuana] cannabis or
paraphernalia relating to [marijuana] cannabis, including the transfer of
[marijuana] cannabis and paraphernalia relating to [marijuana]
cannabis from the qualifying patient's caregiver to the qualifying
patient, to alleviate a qualifying patient's symptoms of a debilitating
medical condition or the effects of such symptoms, [but] and (ii) the
acquisition, possession, use or transportation of cannabis or
paraphernalia relating to cannabis by a qualifying out-of-state patient,
including the transfer of cannabis and paraphernalia relating to
cannabis from the qualifying out-of-state patient's caregiver to the
qualifying out-of-state patient, and (B) does not include any such use of
[marijuana] cannabis by any person other than the qualifying patient or
qualifying out-of-state patient;
(16) "Paraphernalia" means drug paraphernalia, as defined in section
21a-240, as amended by this act;
(17) "Physician" means a person who is licensed as a physician under
chapter 370;
(18) "Physician assistant" means a person who is licensed as a
physician assistant under chapter 370;
Public Act No. 26-8 23 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(19) "Producer" means a person who is licensed as a producer
pursuant to section 21a-408i, as amended by this act;
(20) "Qualifying out-of-state caregiver" means a person, other than
the qualifying out-of-state patient, who (A) is eighteen years of age or
older, (B) is a resident of another state or jurisdiction of the United
States, (C) is a parent, guardian or person having legal custody of the
qualifying out-of-state patient, and (D) holds a valid qualifying out-of-
state credential from such other state or jurisdiction that entitles such
person to undertake responsibility for managing the well-being of the
qualifying out-of-state patient with respect to the palliative use of
cannabis in such other state or jurisdiction;
(21) "Qualifying out-of-state credential" means a card or other
physical document issued by another state or jurisdiction of the United
States to a resident of such other state or jurisdiction that entitles such
resident to (A) engage in the palliative use of cannabis in such other state
or jurisdiction, or (B) undertake responsibility for managing the well-
being of a qualifying out-of-state patient with respect to the palliative
use of cannabis in such other state or jurisdiction;
(22) "Qualifying out-of-state patient" means a person who (A) is a
resident of another state or jurisdiction of the United States, and (B)
holds a valid qualifying out-of-state credential from such other state or
jurisdiction that entitles such person to engage in the palliative use of
cannabis in such other state or jurisdiction;
[(20)] (23) "Qualifying patient" means a person who (A) is a resident
of Connecticut, (B) has been diagnosed by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse as having a debilitating
medical condition, and (C) (i) is eighteen years of age or older, (ii) is an
emancipated minor, or (iii) has written consent from a custodial parent,
guardian or other person having legal custody of such person that
indicates that such person has permission from such parent, guardian
Public Act No. 26-8 24 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
or other person for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis for a
debilitating medical condition and that such parent, guardian or other
person will (I) serve as a caregiver for the qualifying patient, and (II)
control the acquisition and possession of [marijuana] cannabis and any
related paraphernalia for palliative use on behalf of such person.
"Qualifying patient" does not include an inmate confined in a
correctional institution or facility under the supervision of the
Department of Correction;
[(21)] (24) "Research program" means a study approved by the
Department of Consumer Protection in accordance with this chapter
and undertaken to increase information or knowledge regarding the
growth or processing of [marijuana] cannabis, or the medical attributes,
dosage forms, administration or use of [marijuana] cannabis to treat or
alleviate symptoms of any medical conditions or the effects of such
symptoms;
[(22)] (25) "Research program employee" means a person who (A) is
registered as a research program employee under section 21a-408t, or
(B) holds a temporary certificate of registration issued pursuant to
section 21a-408t;
[(23)] (26) "Research program subject" means a person registered as a
research program subject pursuant to section 21a-408v, as amended by
this act;
[(24) "Usable marijuana"] (27) "Usable cannabis" means the dried
leaves and flowers of the [marijuana] cannabis plant, and any mixtures
or preparations of such leaves and flowers, that are appropriate for the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis, but does not include the seeds,
stalks and roots of the [marijuana] cannabis plant; and
[(25)] (28) "Written certification" means a written certification issued
by a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
Public Act No. 26-8 25 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
nurse pursuant to section 21a-408c, as amended by this act.
Sec. 24. Section 21a-408a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A qualifying patient shall register with the Department of
Consumer Protection pursuant to section 21a-408d, as amended by this
act, prior to engaging in the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis. A
qualifying patient who has a valid registration certificate from the
Department of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 21a-408d, as amended by this act, and complies with the
requirements of sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by
this act, shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution, penalized in any
manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to any civil penalty,
or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, being
subject to any disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, for
the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis if:
(1) The qualifying patient's physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse has issued a written certification to
the qualifying patient for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis after
the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
has prescribed, or determined it is not in the best interest of the patient
to prescribe, prescription drugs to address the symptoms or effects for
which the certification is being issued;
(2) The combined amount of [marijuana] cannabis possessed by the
qualifying patient and the caregiver for palliative use does not exceed
five ounces;
(3) The qualifying patient has not more than one caregiver at any
time; and
(4) Any cannabis plants grown by the qualifying patient in [his or]
the qualifying patient's home [is] are in compliance with subsection (b)
Public Act No. 26-8 26 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
of section 21a-408d, as amended by this act, and any applicable
regulations.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to:
(1) Any palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis that endangers the
health or well-being of a person other than the qualifying patient or the
caregiver; or
(2) The ingestion of [marijuana] cannabis (A) in a motor bus or a
school bus or in any other moving vehicle, (B) in the workplace, (C) on
any school grounds or any public or private school, dormitory, college
or university property, unless such college or university is participating
in a research program and such use is pursuant to the terms of the
research program, (D) in any public place, or (E) in the presence of a
person under the age of eighteen, unless such person is a qualifying
patient or research program subject. For the purposes of this
subdivision, (i) "presence" means within the direct line of sight of the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis or exposure to second-hand
[marijuana] cannabis smoke, or both; (ii) "public place" means any area
that is used or held out for use by the public whether owned or operated
by public or private interests; (iii) "vehicle" means a vehicle, as defined
in section 14-1; (iv) "motor bus" means a motor bus, as defined in section
14-1; and (v) "school bus" means a school bus, as defined in section 14-
1.
(c) (1) A qualifying out-of-state patient who complies with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 420h shall not be subject to
arrest or prosecution, penalized in any manner, including, but not
limited to, being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or
privilege, including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary
action by a professional licensing board, for the palliative use of
cannabis if the amount of cannabis possessed by the qualifying out-of-
state patient and the qualifying out-of-state caregiver for palliative use
Public Act No. 26-8 27 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
does not exceed five ounces.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection do not apply
to (A) any palliative use of cannabis described in subdivision (1) of
subsection (b) of this section, or (B) any ingestion of cannabis described
in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 25. Section 21a-408b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No person may serve as a caregiver for a qualifying patient unless
such qualifying patient has a valid registration certificate from the
Department of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 21a-408d, as amended by this act. A caregiver may not be
responsible for the care of more than one qualifying patient at any time,
except that a caregiver may be responsible for the care of more than one
qualifying patient if the caregiver and each qualifying patient have a
parental, grandparental, guardianship, conservatorship, spousal or
sibling relationship.
(b) (1) A caregiver who has a valid registration certificate from the
Department of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 21a-408d, as amended by this act, and complies with the
requirements of sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by
this act, shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution, penalized in any
manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to any civil penalty,
or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, being
subject to any disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, for
the acquisition, distribution, possession or transportation of [marijuana]
cannabis or paraphernalia related to [marijuana] cannabis on behalf of
such caregiver's qualifying patient, provided the amount of any
[marijuana] cannabis so acquired, distributed, possessed or transported,
together with the combined amount of usable [marijuana] cannabis
possessed by the qualifying patient and the caregiver, does not exceed
Public Act No. 26-8 28 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
five ounces.
(2) A qualifying out-of-state caregiver who complies with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 420h shall not be subject to
arrest or prosecution, penalized in any manner, including, but not
limited to, being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or
privilege, including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary
action by a professional licensing board, for the acquisition, distribution,
possession or transportation of cannabis or paraphernalia related to
cannabis on behalf of such qualifying out-of-state caregiver's qualifying
out-of-state patient, provided the amount of any cannabis so acquired,
distributed, possessed or transported, together with the combined
amount of usable cannabis possessed by the qualifying out-of-state
patient and the qualifying out-of-state caregiver, does not exceed five
ounces.
(3) For the purposes of this subsection, "distribution" or "distributed"
means the transfer of [marijuana] cannabis and paraphernalia related to
[marijuana] cannabis from the caregiver to the qualifying patient or
from the qualifying out-of-state caregiver to the qualifying out-of-state
patient.
(c) A dispensary facility shall not dispense any cannabis product, as
defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act, in a smokable,
inhalable or vaporizable form (1) to a caregiver for a qualifying patient
who is under eighteen years of age, or (2) to a qualifying out-of-state
caregiver for a qualifying out-of-state patient who is under eighteen
years of age.
Sec. 26. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21a-408c of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) A physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
Public Act No. 26-8 29 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
registered nurse may issue a written certification to a qualifying patient
that authorizes the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis by the
qualifying patient. Such written certification shall be in the form
prescribed by the Department of Consumer Protection and shall include
a statement signed and dated by the qualifying patient's physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse stating that, in
such physician's, physician assistant's or advanced practice registered
nurse's professional opinion, (A) the qualifying patient has a
debilitating medical condition, and (B) the potential benefits of the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis would likely outweigh the health
risks of such use to the qualifying patient.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, any
written certification issued by a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be valid for a period not to exceed one of the following
durations, as determined by the physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse and beginning on the date on which
such written certification is signed and dated by the physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse: (A) Six
months; (B) one year; (C) eighteen months; or (D) two years.
(3) Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, not later
than ten calendar days after the expiration of the period determined by
the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
under subdivision (2) of this subsection, or at any time before the
expiration of such period should the qualifying patient no longer wish
to possess [marijuana] cannabis for palliative use, the qualifying patient
or the caregiver shall destroy all usable [marijuana] cannabis possessed
by the qualifying patient and the caregiver for palliative use.
(4) A physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution, penalized in any
manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to any civil penalty,
Public Act No. 26-8 30 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, being
subject to any disciplinary action by the Connecticut Medical Examining
Board, the Connecticut State Board of Examiners for Nursing or other
professional licensing board, for providing a written certification under
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-408a, as amended by this
act, if:
(A) The physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse has diagnosed the qualifying patient as having a
debilitating medical condition;
(B) The physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse has explained the potential risks and benefits of the palliative use
of [marijuana] cannabis to the qualifying patient and, if the qualifying
patient lacks legal capacity, to a parent, guardian or person having legal
custody of the qualifying patient, to the qualifying patient's caregiver or
to a person legally authorized to make medical decisions on behalf of
the qualifying patient;
(C) The written certification issued by the physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse is based upon the
physician's, physician assistant's or advanced practice registered nurse's
professional opinion after having completed a medically reasonable
assessment of the qualifying patient's medical history and current
medical condition made in the course of a bona fide health care
professional-patient relationship; and
(D) The physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse has no financial interest in a cannabis establishment,
except for retailers and delivery services, as such terms are defined in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act.
(5) A physician assistant or nurse shall not be subject to arrest or
prosecution, penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to,
Public Act No. 26-8 31 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by
the Connecticut Medical Examining Board, Board of Examiners for
Nursing or other professional licensing board, for administering
[marijuana] cannabis to a qualifying patient or research program subject
in a hospital or health care facility licensed by the Department of Public
Health.
(6) A licensed dispensary, acting in the course of the licensed
dispensary's employment on the premises of the dispensary facility or
hybrid retailer, as defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act,
that employs such licensed dispensary, may grant a temporary
extension of a written certification issued by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection for a period not to exceed ninety consecutive days
following expiration of such written certification.
(b) (1) A licensed dispensary, acting in the course of the licensed
dispensary's employment and on the premises of the dispensary facility
or hybrid retailer, as defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act,
that employs such licensed dispensary, may issue a temporary written
certification to an individual that authorizes the individual to engage in
the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis as a qualifying patient for a
period not to exceed ninety consecutive days, provided such licensed
dispensary has:
(A) Reasonably determined, after reviewing such individual's
medical history, that such individual is at least eighteen years of age and
has a debilitating medical condition;
(B) Conducted an in-person assessment of such individual at the
dispensary facility or on the premises of the hybrid retailer that employs
the licensed dispensary; and
Public Act No. 26-8 32 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(C) Reviewed the electronic prescription drug monitoring program
established pursuant to section 21a-254 and verified that no other
licensed dispensary had prescribed or dispensed [marijuana] cannabis
to such individual during the one-year period immediately preceding
the date of such review.
(2) Each temporary written certification issued pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be in a form prescribed by the
Department of Consumer Protection and shall include a statement
signed and dated by the licensed dispensary stating that, in such
licensed dispensary's professional opinion, (A) the individual has
provided sufficient proof that such individual has a debilitating medical
condition, and (B) the potential benefits the individual would derive
from the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis likely outweigh the
health risks that such use would pose to such individual.
(3) A licensed dispensary that issues a temporary written certification
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, or the dispensary facility
or hybrid retailer that employs such licensed dispensary, may impose a
fee for such temporary written certification, which fee shall not exceed
twenty-five dollars. Such licensed dispensary, dispensary facility or
hybrid retailer shall not impose any other fee in connection with such
temporary written certification.
(4) A licensed dispensary that issues a temporary written certification
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall maintain all patient
assessment and eligibility documentation concerning such temporary
written certification for a period of at least three years beginning on the
date on which the licensed dispensary issued such temporary written
certification. Such documentation shall be organized and maintained
(A) in hard copy at the dispensary facility or hybrid retailer premises at
which the licensed dispensary conducted an in-person assessment of the
patient, or (B) electronically in a system readily accessible by the
licensed dispensary.
Public Act No. 26-8 33 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(5) A licensed dispensary that issues a temporary written certification
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall ensure that all patient
assessment and eligibility documentation maintained pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection is made readily available to the
department, and shall submit any such documentation to the
department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, not
later than forty-eight hours after the department requests such
documentation.
(6) A licensed dispensary shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution,
penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to
any civil penalty, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not
limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by the Commission
of Pharmacy or any other professional licensing board, for providing a
temporary written certification pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection if:
(A) The licensed dispensary has reasonably determined, after
reviewing the individual's medical history, that the individual is
eighteen years of age or older and has a debilitating medical condition;
and
(B) The licensed dispensary has explained the potential risks and
benefits of the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis to the individual
and, if the individual lacks legal capacity, to a parent, guardian or
person having legal custody of the individual or to a person legally
authorized to make medical decisions on behalf of the individual.
Sec. 27. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 21a-408d of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Each qualifying patient who is issued a written certification for the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis under subdivision (1) of
Public Act No. 26-8 34 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
subsection (a) of section 21a-408a, as amended by this act, and the
caregiver of such qualifying patient, shall register with the Department
of Consumer Protection. Such registration shall be effective from the
date the Department of Consumer Protection issues a certificate of
registration until the expiration of the written certification issued by the
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
The qualifying patient and the caregiver shall provide sufficient
identifying information, as determined by the department, to establish
the personal identity of the qualifying patient and the caregiver. If the
qualifying patient is under eighteen years of age and not an
emancipated minor, the custodial parent, guardian or other person
having legal custody of the qualifying patient shall also provide a letter
from both the qualifying patient's care provider and a physician who is
board certified in an area of medicine involved in the treatment of the
debilitating condition for which the qualifying patient was certified that
confirms that the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis is in the best
interest of the qualifying patient. A physician may issue a written
certification for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis by a
qualifying patient who is under eighteen years of age, provided such
written certification shall not be for [marijuana] cannabis in a dosage
form that requires that the [marijuana] cannabis be smoked, inhaled or
vaporized. The qualifying patient or the caregiver shall report any
change in the identifying information to the department not later than
five business days after such change. The department shall issue a
registration certificate to the qualifying patient and to the caregiver.
(b) Any qualifying patient who is eighteen years of age or older may
cultivate up to three mature cannabis plants and three immature
cannabis plants in the patient's primary residence at any given time,
provided such plants are secure from access by any individual other
than the patient or patient's caregiver and no more than twelve cannabis
plants may be grown per household.
Public Act No. 26-8 35 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(c) A dispensary shall not dispense any [marijuana] cannabis
products in a smokable, inhalable or vaporizable form to (1) a qualifying
patient who is under eighteen years of age or such qualifying patient's
caregiver, or (2) a qualifying out-of-state patient who is under eighteen
years of age or such qualifying out-of-state patient's qualifying out-of-
state caregiver.
Sec. 28. Section 21a-408e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
No person shall be subject to arrest or prosecution solely for being in
the presence or vicinity of the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis as
permitted under sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by
this act.
Sec. 29. Section 21a-408f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any [marijuana] cannabis, paraphernalia relating to [marijuana]
cannabis, or other property seized by law enforcement officials from a
qualifying patient, [or a] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver in connection with the claimed
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis under sections 21a-408 to 21a-
408m, inclusive, as amended by this act, shall be returned to the
qualifying patient, [or the] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver immediately upon the determination
by a court that the qualifying patient, [or the] qualifying out-of-state
patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver is entitled to the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis under sections 21a-408 to 21a-
408m, inclusive, as amended by this act, as evidenced by a decision not
to prosecute, a dismissal of charges or an acquittal. The provisions of
this section do not apply to any qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-
of-state patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver who fails
to comply with the requirements for the palliative use of [marijuana]
Public Act No. 26-8 36 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
cannabis under sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by
this act.
Sec. 30. Section 21a-408g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person who makes a fraudulent representation to a law
enforcement official of any fact or circumstance relating to the palliative
use of [marijuana] cannabis in order to avoid arrest or prosecution
under chapter 420b or any other provision of the general statutes shall
be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who makes a fraudulent representation to a law
enforcement official of any fact or circumstance relating to the issuance,
contents or validity of a written certification for the palliative use of
[marijuana] cannabis, or a document purporting to be such a written
certification, shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 31. Section 21a-408h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) No person may act as a dispensary or represent that such person
is a licensed dispensary unless such person has obtained a license from
the Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to this section.
(b) No person may act as a dispensary facility or represent that such
person is a licensed dispensary facility unless such person has obtained
a license from the Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to
this section.
(c) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall determine the
number of dispensary facilities appropriate to meet the needs of
qualifying patients in this state and shall adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54, to provide for the licensure and standards
for dispensary facilities in this state and specify the maximum number
Public Act No. 26-8 37 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
of dispensary facilities that may be licensed in this state. On and after
the effective date of such regulations, the commissioner may license any
person who applies for a license in accordance with such regulations,
provided the commissioner deems such applicant qualified to acquire,
possess, distribute and dispense marijuana pursuant to sections 21a-408
to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this act. At a minimum, such
regulations shall:
(1) Indicate the maximum number of dispensary facilities that may
be licensed in this state;
(2) Provide that no marijuana may be dispensed from, obtained from
or transferred to a location outside of this state;
(3) Provide for renewal of dispensary facility licenses at least every
two years;
(4) Describe areas in this state where dispensary facilities may not be
located, after considering the criteria for the location of retail liquor
permit premises set forth in subsection (a) of section 30-46;
(5) Establish health, safety and security requirements for dispensary
facilities, which may include, but need not be limited to: (A) The ability
to maintain adequate control against the diversion, theft and loss of
marijuana acquired or possessed by the dispensary facility, and (B) the
ability to maintain the knowledge, understanding, judgment,
procedures, security controls and ethics to ensure optimal safety and
accuracy in the distributing, dispensing and use of palliative marijuana;
(6) Establish standards and procedures for revocation, suspension,
summary suspension and nonrenewal of dispensary facility licenses,
provided such standards and procedures are consistent with the
provisions of subsection (c) of section 4-182; and
(7) Establish other licensing, renewal and operational standards
Public Act No. 26-8 38 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
deemed necessary by the commissioner.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or chapter 420h:
(1) Only a licensed dispensary or dispensary technician under the
direction of a licensed dispensary may upload data to the electronic
prescription drug monitoring program established pursuant to section
21a-254, except such upload may be accomplished by way of an
automated upload from the dispensary facility's point-of-sale system. A
licensed dispensary shall conduct a daily audit of the data uploaded to
such program pursuant to this subdivision. All other authorized
activities of the dispensary facility, including, but not limited to, all such
activities performed in connection with the sale, handling or
management of marijuana for palliative use, may be performed by a
licensed dispensary, dispensary technician or other registered employee
of the dispensary facility.
(2) A dispensary facility shall ensure that a licensed dispensary is
available, either in-person or remotely, when the dispensary facility is
open. The dispensary facility shall ensure that a licensed dispensary is
readily available to provide telehealth consultations and, upon request
by qualifying patients or caregivers, in-person consultations. Nothing in
this subdivision shall be construed to require a dispensary facility to
maintain a licensed dispensary at the dispensary facility for more than
thirty-five hours per week either in-person or remotely.
(3) A dispensary facility that offers telehealth consultations with a
licensed dispensary shall (A) maintain technology that is capable of
facilitating such telehealth consultations, and (B) make such telehealth
consultations readily available and accessible, including, but not limited
to, by telephone from a remote location outside of the dispensary
facility.
(4) Each dispensary facility shall conspicuously post and maintain a
Public Act No. 26-8 39 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
sign (A) at the main entrance of the dispensary facility, which sign shall
(i) be at least twelve inches in height and eighteen inches in width, (ii)
incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and (iii)
state the name of the licensed dispensary who is available for
consultations either in person or through telehealth, and (B) at each
register or comparable point of sale within the dispensary facility, and
on any Internet web site maintained by such dispensary facility, which
sign shall (i) be at least eight inches in height and ten inches in width,
(ii) incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and
(iii) state "Pharmacist available for consultation" in a clear and legible
manner.
(5) No registered employee of a dispensary facility shall sell any
marijuana for palliative use, unless such registered employee has
completed at least (A) one hour of education concerning the types,
availability, dosage and methods of administration of marijuana for
palliative use, (B) one hour of education concerning professional ethics,
(C) one hour of education concerning state and federal laws and
regulations concerning patient privacy, and (D) one hour of education
concerning developments in the palliative use of marijuana.
(e) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt or amend
regulations, as applicable, to implement the provisions of subsection (d)
of this section. Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-
172, inclusive, in order to effectuate the purposes of subsection (d) of
this section and to protect public health and safety, prior to adopting
such regulations, the commissioner shall issue policies and procedures
to implement the provisions of subsection (d) of this section that shall
have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all policies
and procedures on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet
web site, and submit such policies and procedures to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection and the Secretary of the State for posting
Public Act No. 26-8 40 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective
date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy or procedure shall no
longer be effective upon the earlier of either adoption of such policy or
procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or July 1, 2028.
Sec. 32. Section 21a-408h of the general statutes, as amended by
section 31 of this act, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No person may act as a dispensary or represent that such person
is a licensed dispensary unless such person has obtained a license from
the Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to this section.
(b) No person may act as a dispensary facility or represent that such
person is a licensed dispensary facility unless such person has obtained
a license from the Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to
this section.
(c) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall determine the
number of dispensary facilities appropriate to meet the needs of
qualifying patients in this state and shall adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54, to provide for the licensure and standards
for dispensary facilities in this state and specify the maximum number
of dispensary facilities that may be licensed in this state. On and after
the effective date of such regulations, the commissioner may license any
person who applies for a license in accordance with such regulations,
provided the commissioner deems such applicant qualified to acquire,
possess, distribute and dispense [marijuana] cannabis pursuant to
sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this act. At a
minimum, such regulations shall:
(1) Indicate the maximum number of dispensary facilities that may
be licensed in this state;
(2) Provide that no [marijuana] cannabis may be dispensed from,
Public Act No. 26-8 41 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
obtained from or transferred to a location outside of this state;
(3) Provide for renewal of dispensary facility licenses at least every
two years;
(4) Describe areas in this state where dispensary facilities may not be
located, after considering the criteria for the location of retail liquor
permit premises set forth in subsection (a) of section 30-46;
(5) Establish health, safety and security requirements for dispensary
facilities, which may include, but need not be limited to: (A) The ability
to maintain adequate control against the diversion, theft and loss of
[marijuana] cannabis acquired or possessed by the dispensary facility,
and (B) the ability to maintain the knowledge, understanding,
judgment, procedures, security controls and ethics to ensure optimal
safety and accuracy in the distributing, dispensing and use of palliative
[marijuana] cannabis;
(6) Establish standards and procedures for revocation, suspension,
summary suspension and nonrenewal of dispensary facility licenses,
provided such standards and procedures are consistent with the
provisions of subsection (c) of section 4-182; and
(7) Establish other licensing, renewal and operational standards
deemed necessary by the commissioner.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, a retailer or hybrid retailer, as such terms are defined in section
21a-420, as amended by this act, may use the term "dispensary" in any
marketing, advertising or promotional material or in any signage,
branding item, logo or label.
[(d)] (e) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or chapter
420h:
Public Act No. 26-8 42 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(1) Only a licensed dispensary or dispensary technician under the
direction of a licensed dispensary may upload data to the electronic
prescription drug monitoring program established pursuant to section
21a-254, except such upload may be accomplished by way of an
automated upload from the dispensary facility's point-of-sale system. A
licensed dispensary shall conduct a daily audit of the data uploaded to
such program pursuant to this subdivision. All other authorized
activities of the dispensary facility, including, but not limited to, all such
activities performed in connection with the sale, handling or
management of [marijuana] cannabis for palliative use, may be
performed by a licensed dispensary, dispensary technician or other
registered employee of the dispensary facility.
(2) A dispensary facility shall ensure that a licensed dispensary is
available, either in-person or remotely, when the dispensary facility is
open. The dispensary facility shall ensure that a licensed dispensary is
readily available to provide telehealth consultations and, upon request
by qualifying patients, [or] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers
or qualifying out-of-state caregivers, in-person consultations. Nothing
in this subdivision shall be construed to require a dispensary facility to
maintain a licensed dispensary at the dispensary facility for more than
thirty-five hours per week either in-person or remotely.
(3) A dispensary facility that offers telehealth consultations with a
licensed dispensary shall (A) maintain technology that is capable of
facilitating such telehealth consultations, and (B) make such telehealth
consultations readily available and accessible, including, but not limited
to, by telephone from a remote location outside of the dispensary
facility.
(4) Each dispensary facility shall conspicuously post and maintain a
sign (A) at the main entrance of the dispensary facility, which sign shall
(i) be at least twelve inches in height and eighteen inches in width, (ii)
incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and (iii)
Public Act No. 26-8 43 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
state the name of the licensed dispensary who is available for
consultations either in person or through telehealth, and (B) at each
register or comparable point of sale within the dispensary facility, and
on any Internet web site maintained by such dispensary facility, which
sign shall (i) be at least eight inches in height and ten inches in width,
(ii) incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and
(iii) state "Pharmacist available for consultation" in a clear and legible
manner.
(5) No registered employee of a dispensary facility shall sell any
[marijuana] cannabis for palliative use, unless such registered employee
has completed at least (A) one hour of education concerning the types,
availability, dosage and methods of administration of [marijuana]
cannabis for palliative use, (B) one hour of education concerning
professional ethics, (C) one hour of education concerning state and
federal laws and regulations concerning patient privacy, and (D) one
hour of education concerning developments in the palliative use of
[marijuana] cannabis.
(6) Dispensary facilities and hybrid retailers may dispense, sell or
distribute cannabis for palliative use to qualifying out-of-state patients
and qualifying out-of-state caregivers, provided:
(A) A qualifying out-of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state
caregiver who purchases cannabis for palliative use submits to the
dispensary facility or hybrid retailer, at the time of purchase, (i) the valid
qualifying out-of-state credential that was issued to the qualifying out-
of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state caregiver, and (ii) a
registration form, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, that (I) is signed by the qualifying out-of-state patient or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver, (II) includes the name of the qualifying
out-of-state patient and qualifying out-of-state caregiver, (III) includes
an acknowledgment by the qualifying out-of-state patient or qualifying
out-of-state caregiver that the qualifying out-of-state patient or
Public Act No. 26-8 44 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
qualifying out-of-state caregiver understands the laws and regulations
of this state concerning the palliative use of cannabis by qualifying out-
of-state patients and qualifying out-of-state caregivers, shall be
ineligible to engage in the palliative use of cannabis in this state if the
qualifying out-of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state caregiver
violates any such law or regulation and shall not transport cannabis
across any state or international boundary, and (IV) includes any other
information the commissioner may reasonably require for the purposes
of this chapter or chapter 420h; and
(B) A qualifying out-of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state
caregiver who purchases cannabis for palliative use possesses the valid
qualifying out-of-state credential that was issued to the qualifying out-
of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state caregiver at all times while
such qualifying out-of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state caregiver
is in this state and in possession of cannabis for palliative use; and
(C) A dispensary facility or hybrid retailer submits the registration
form described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this subdivision to the
Department of Consumer Protection in a form and manner prescribed
by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection.
[(e)] (f) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt or
amend regulations, as applicable, to implement the provisions of
subsection [(d)] (e) of this section. Notwithstanding the requirements of
sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to effectuate the purposes of
subsection [(d)] (e) of this section and to protect public health and safety,
prior to adopting such regulations, the commissioner shall issue policies
and procedures to implement the provisions of subsection [(d)] (e) of
this section that shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner
shall post all policies and procedures on the Department of Consumer
Protection's Internet web site, and submit such policies and procedures
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to consumer protection and the Secretary
Public Act No. 26-8 45 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
of the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days
prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy
or procedure shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either
adoption of such policy or procedure as a final regulation under section
4-172 or July 1, 2028.
Sec. 33. Subsection (b) of section 21a-408i of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall determine the
number of producers appropriate to meet the needs of qualifying
patients in this state and shall adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to provide for the licensure, standards and locations for
producers in this state and specify the maximum number of producers
that may be licensed in this state at any time. On and after the effective
date of such regulations, the commissioner may license any person who
applies for a license in accordance with such regulations, provided (1)
such person is organized for the purpose of cultivating [marijuana]
cannabis for palliative use in this state, (2) the commissioner finds that
such applicant has appropriate expertise in agriculture and that such
applicant is qualified to cultivate [marijuana] cannabis and sell, deliver,
transport or distribute [marijuana] cannabis solely within this state
pursuant to sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this
act, and (3) the number of producer licenses issued does not exceed the
number appropriate to meet the needs of qualifying patients in this
state, as determined by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection.
At a minimum, such regulations shall:
(A) Indicate the maximum number of producers that may be licensed
in this state at any time, which number shall not be less than three nor
more than ten producers;
(B) Provide that no [marijuana] cannabis may be sold, delivered,
Public Act No. 26-8 46 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
transported or distributed by a producer from or to a location outside of
this state;
(C) Establish a nonrefundable application fee of not less than twenty-
five thousand dollars for each application submitted for a producer
license;
(D) Establish a license fee and renewal fee for each licensed producer,
provided the aggregate amount of such license and renewal fees shall
not be less than the amount necessary to cover the direct and indirect
cost of licensing and regulating producers pursuant to sections 21a-408
to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this act;
(E) Provide for renewal of such producer licenses at least every five
years;
(F) Provide that no producer may cultivate [marijuana] cannabis for
palliative use outside of this state and designate permissible locations
for licensed producers in this state;
(G) Establish financial requirements for producers, under which (i)
each applicant demonstrates the financial capacity to build and operate
a [marijuana] cannabis production facility, and (ii) each licensed
producer may be required to maintain an escrow account in a financial
institution in this state in an amount of two million dollars;
(H) Establish health, safety and security requirements for licensed
producers, which shall include, but need not be limited to, a
requirement that the applicant or licensed producer demonstrate: (i) The
ability to maintain adequate control against the diversion, theft and loss
of [marijuana] cannabis cultivated by the producer, and (ii) the ability
to cultivate pharmaceutical grade [marijuana] cannabis for palliative
use in a secure indoor facility;
(I) Define "pharmaceutical grade [marijuana] cannabis for palliative
Public Act No. 26-8 47 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
use" for the purposes of this section;
(J) Establish standards and procedures for revocation, suspension,
summary suspension and nonrenewal of producer licenses, provided
such standards and procedures are consistent with the provisions of
subsection (c) of section 4-182; and
(K) Establish other licensing, renewal and operational standards
deemed necessary by the commissioner.
Sec. 34. Section 21a-408j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No dispensary facility or employee of the dispensary facility may:
(1) Acquire [marijuana] cannabis from a person other than a producer,
[from a] cultivator, micro-cultivator, product manufacturer, food and
beverage manufacturer, product packager [,] or transporter, as such
terms are defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act; (2) transfer
or transport [marijuana] cannabis to a person who is not (A) a qualifying
patient registered under section 21a-408d, as amended by this act; (B) a
caregiver of [such] a qualifying patient [; (C)] registered under section
21a-408d, as amended by this act; (C) a qualifying out-of-state patient;
(D) a qualifying out-of-state caregiver of a qualifying out-of-state
patient; (E) a hospice or other inpatient care facility licensed by the
Department of Public Health pursuant to chapter 368v that has a
protocol for the handling and distribution of [marijuana] cannabis that
has been approved by the Department of Consumer Protection; [(D)] (F)
a cannabis testing laboratory; [(E)] (G) an organization engaged in a
research program; [(F)] (H) a delivery service, as defined in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act; or [(G)] (I) a transporter, as defined in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act; or (3) obtain or transport
[marijuana] cannabis outside of this state in violation of state or federal
law.
Public Act No. 26-8 48 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(b) No dispensary or employee of the dispensary facility acting
within the scope of his or her employment shall be subject to arrest or
prosecution or penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to,
being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by
a professional licensing board, for acquiring, possessing, distributing or
dispensing [marijuana] cannabis pursuant to sections 21a-408 to 21a-
408m, inclusive, as amended by this act.
Sec. 35. Section 21a-408k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No producer or employee of the producer may: (1) Sell, deliver,
transport or distribute [marijuana] cannabis to a person who is not (A)
a cannabis establishment, (B) a cannabis testing laboratory, or (C) an
organization engaged in a research program, or (2) obtain or transport
[marijuana] cannabis outside of this state in violation of state or federal
law.
(b) No licensed producer or employee of the producer acting within
the scope of such employee's employment shall be subject to arrest or
prosecution or penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to,
being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by
a professional licensing board, for cultivating [marijuana] cannabis or
selling, delivering, transferring, transporting or distributing [marijuana]
cannabis to a cannabis establishment, cannabis testing laboratory or
research program.
Sec. 36. Section 21a-408l of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall establish a Board
of Physicians consisting of eight physicians or surgeons who are
Public Act No. 26-8 49 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
knowledgeable about the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis and
certified by the appropriate American board in the medical specialty in
which they practice, at least one of whom shall be a board certified
pediatrician appointed in consultation with the Connecticut Chapter of
the American Academy of Pediatrics. Four of the members of the board
first appointed shall serve for a term of three years and four of the
members of the board first appointed shall serve for a term of four years.
Thereafter, members of the board shall serve for a term of four years and
shall be eligible for reappointment. Any member of the board may serve
until a successor is appointed. The Commissioner of Consumer
Protection shall serve as an ex-officio member of the board, and shall
select a chairperson from among the members of the board.
(b) A quorum of the Board of Physicians shall consist of four
members.
(c) The Board of Physicians shall:
(1) Review and recommend to the Department of Consumer
Protection for approval the debilitating medical conditions, medical
treatments or diseases to be added to the list of debilitating medical
conditions that qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis for
qualifying patients eighteen years of age or older;
(2) Review and recommend to the Department of Consumer
Protection for approval any illnesses that are severely debilitating, as
defined in 21 CFR 312.81(b), to be added to the list of debilitating
medical conditions that qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis for qualifying patients under eighteen years of age, taking into
account, among other things, the effect of the palliative use of
[marijuana] cannabis on the brain development of such patients, which
recommendations shall be accepted or rejected by the commissioner in
[his or her] the commissioner's discretion;
Public Act No. 26-8 50 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(3) Accept and review petitions to add medical conditions, medical
treatments or diseases to the list of debilitating medical conditions that
qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis;
(4) Convene as necessary to conduct public hearings and to evaluate
petitions, which shall be maintained as confidential pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section, for the purpose of adding medical
conditions, medical treatments or diseases to the list of debilitating
medical conditions that qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis;
(5) Review and recommend to the Department of Consumer
Protection protocols for determining the amounts of [marijuana]
cannabis that may be reasonably necessary to ensure uninterrupted
availability for a period of one month for qualifying patients, including
amounts for topical treatments; and
(6) Perform other duties related to the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis upon the request of the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection.
(d) The Board of Physicians may review the list of debilitating
medical conditions that qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis and make recommendations to the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
[general law] consumer protection and public health for the removal of
a debilitating medical condition, medical treatment or disease from such
list.
(e) Any individually identifiable health information contained in a
petition received under this section shall be confidential and shall not
be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, as
defined in section 1-200.
(f) [On and after October 1, 2021, conditions] Conditions added
Public Act No. 26-8 51 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
pursuant to this section to the list of debilitating medical conditions that
qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis shall be posted by
the commissioner on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet
web site. Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172,
inclusive, the list of debilitating medical conditions that qualify for the
palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis shall be deemed approved and
effective without further action as of the date such conditions are posted
on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site.
Sec. 37. Section 21a-408m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to establish (1) a standard
form for written certifications for the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis issued by physicians, physician assistants and advanced
practice registered nurses under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
section 21a-408a, as amended by this act, and (2) procedures for
registrations under section 21a-408d, as amended by this act. Such
regulations, if any, shall be adopted after consultation with the Board of
Physicians established in section 21a-408l, as amended by this act.
(b) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt or amend
regulations, as applicable, in accordance with chapter 54, to implement
the provisions of sections 21a-408 to 21a-408g, inclusive, as amended by
this act, and section 21a-408l, as amended by this act. Notwithstanding
the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to
effectuate the purposes of sections 21a-408 to 21a-408g, inclusive, as
amended by this act, and section 21a-408l, as amended by this act, and
protect public health and safety, prior to adopting or amending such
regulations the commissioner shall adopt policies and procedures to
implement the provisions of sections 21a-408 to 21a-408g, inclusive, as
amended by this act, and section [21a-408] 21a-408l, as amended by this
act, that shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall
Public Act No. 26-8 52 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
post all policies and procedures on the department's Internet web site,
and submit such policies and procedures to the Secretary of the State for
posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the
effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy or procedure
shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either adoption of such
policies or procedures as a final regulation pursuant to section 4-172 or
forty-eight months from October 1, 2021, if such policies or procedures
have not been submitted to the legislative regulation review committee
for consideration under section 4-170. Such policies and procedures and
regulations shall include, but not be limited to, how the department
shall:
(1) Accept applications for the issuance and renewal of registration
certificates for qualifying patients and caregivers;
(2) Establish criteria for adding medical conditions, medical
treatments or diseases to the list of debilitating medical conditions that
qualify for the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis;
(3) Establish a petition process under which members of the public
may submit petitions [,] regarding the addition of medical conditions,
medical treatments or diseases to the list of debilitating medical
conditions;
(4) Establish requirements for the growing of cannabis plants by a
qualifying patient in his or her primary residence as authorized under
section 21a-408d, as amended by this act, including requirements for
securing such plants to prevent access by any individual other than the
patient or the patient's caregiver, the location of such plants and any
other requirements necessary to protect public health or safety;
(5) Develop a distribution system for [marijuana] cannabis for
palliative use that provides for:
(A) [Marijuana] Cannabis production facilities within this state that
Public Act No. 26-8 53 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
are housed on secured grounds and operated by producers;
(B) The transfer of [marijuana] cannabis between dispensary
facilities; and
(C) Distribution of [marijuana] cannabis for palliative use to
qualifying patients or their caregivers by dispensary facilities, hybrid
retailers and delivery services, as such terms are defined in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act; and
(6) Ensure an adequate supply and variety of [marijuana] cannabis to
dispensary facilities and hybrid retailers to ensure uninterrupted
availability for qualifying patients, based on historical [marijuana]
cannabis purchase patterns by qualifying patients.
Sec. 38. Section 21a-408o of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Nothing in sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by
this act, or section 21a-243, as amended by this act, shall be construed to
require health insurance coverage for the palliative use of [marijuana]
cannabis.
Sec. 39. Section 21a-408p of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Action" has the meaning provided in section 47a-1;
(2) "Dwelling unit" has the meaning provided in section 47a-1;
(3) "Employer" means a person engaged in business who has one or
more employees, including the state and any political subdivision of the
state;
Public Act No. 26-8 54 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(4) "Landlord" has the meaning provided in section 47a-1;
(5) "Palliative use" has the meaning provided in section 21a-408, as
amended by this act;
(6) "Caregiver" has the meaning provided in section 21a-408, as
amended by this act;
(7) "Qualifying out-of-state caregiver" has the meaning provided in
section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
(8) "Qualifying out-of-state patient" has the meaning provided in
section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
[(7)] (9) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in section 21a-
408, as amended by this act;
[(8)] (10) "School" means a public or private elementary or secondary
school in this state or a public or private institution of higher education
in this state; and
[(9)] (11) "Tenant" has the meaning provided in section 47a-1.
(b) Unless required by federal law or required to obtain federal
funding:
(1) No school may refuse to enroll any person or discriminate against
any student solely on the basis of such person's or student's status as a
qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver under sections 21a-408 to 21a-408m,
inclusive, as amended by this act;
(2) No landlord may refuse to rent a dwelling unit to a person or take
action against a tenant solely on the basis of such person's or tenant's
status as a qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient,
caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver under sections 21a-408 to
Public Act No. 26-8 55 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this act; and
(3) No employer may refuse to hire a person or may discharge,
penalize or threaten an employee solely on the basis of such person's or
employee's status as a qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state
patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver under sections
21a-408 to 21a-408m, inclusive, as amended by this act. Nothing in this
subdivision shall restrict an employer's ability to prohibit the use of
intoxicating substances during work hours or restrict an employer's
ability to discipline an employee for being under the influence of
intoxicating substances during work hours.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the palliative
use of [marijuana] cannabis in violation of subsection (b) or (c) of section
21a-408a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 40. Subsection (d) of section 21a-408r of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to (1) provide for the
licensure or registration of cannabis testing laboratories and cannabis
testing laboratory employees, (2) establish standards and procedures for
the revocation, suspension, summary suspension and nonrenewal of
cannabis testing laboratory licenses and cannabis testing laboratory
employee registrations, provided such standards and procedures are
consistent with the provisions of subsection (c) of section 4-182, (3)
establish a registration renewal fee for each registered cannabis testing
laboratory employee, provided the aggregate amount of such fees shall
not be less than the amount necessary to cover the direct and indirect
cost of registering and regulating cannabis testing laboratory employees
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, (4) establish
procedures by which cannabis testing laboratories shall accept
Public Act No. 26-8 56 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[marijuana] cannabis samples from caregivers, qualifying patients and
consumers for testing, and (5) establish other licensing, registration,
renewal and operational standards deemed necessary by the
commissioner. For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer" has the
same meaning as provided in section 21a-420, as amended by this act.
Sec. 41. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 21a-408s of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No cannabis testing laboratory or cannabis testing laboratory
employee may (1) acquire [marijuana] cannabis from a person other
than (A) a cannabis establishment or an organization engaged in a
research program, or (B) a caregiver, a qualifying patient or a consumer,
as defined in section 21a-420, as amended by this act, providing a
[marijuana] cannabis sample under regulations adopted by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (d) of
section 21a-408r, as amended by this act, (2) deliver, transport or
distribute [marijuana] cannabis to (A) a person who is not a cannabis
establishment from which the [marijuana] cannabis was originally
acquired by the cannabis testing laboratory or cannabis testing
laboratory employee, or (B) an organization not engaged in a research
program, or (3) obtain or transport [marijuana] cannabis outside of this
state in violation of state or federal law.
(b) (1) No cannabis testing laboratory employee acting within the
scope of such cannabis testing laboratory employee's employment shall
be subject to arrest or prosecution, penalized in any manner, including,
but not limited to, being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right
or privilege, including, but not limited to, being subject to any
disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, for acquiring,
possessing, delivering, transporting or distributing [marijuana]
cannabis to a cannabis establishment or an organization engaged in an
approved research program under the provisions of this chapter.
Public Act No. 26-8 57 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(2) No cannabis testing laboratory shall be subject to prosecution,
penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to
any civil penalty or denied any right or privilege, for acquiring,
possessing, delivering, transporting or distributing [marijuana]
cannabis to a cannabis establishment or an organization engaged in an
approved research program under the provisions of this chapter.
(c) A cannabis testing laboratory shall be independent from all other
persons involved in the [marijuana] cannabis industry in Connecticut,
which shall mean that no person with a direct or indirect financial,
managerial or controlling interest in the cannabis testing laboratory
shall have a direct or indirect financial, managerial or controlling
interest in a cannabis establishment or any other entity that may benefit
from the laboratory test results for a cannabis [or marijuana] sample or
product.
Sec. 42. Section 21a-408u of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No research program or research program employee may (1)
acquire [marijuana] cannabis from a person other than a cannabis
establishment or cannabis testing laboratory, (2) deliver, transport or
distribute [marijuana] cannabis to a person who is not (A) a cannabis
establishment, (B) a cannabis testing laboratory, or (C) a research
program subject, (3) distribute or administer [marijuana] cannabis to an
animal unless such animal is an animal research subject, or (4) obtain or
transport [marijuana] cannabis outside of this state in violation of state
or federal law.
(b) No research program employee acting within the scope of such
research program employee's employment shall be subject to arrest or
prosecution, penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to,
being subject to any civil penalty, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by
Public Act No. 26-8 58 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
a professional licensing board, for acquiring, possessing, delivering,
transporting or distributing [marijuana] cannabis to a cannabis
establishment or cannabis testing laboratory, or a research program
subject or distributing or administering [marijuana] cannabis to an
animal research subject under the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 43. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 21a-408v of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) A research program subject who has a valid registration certificate
from the Department of Consumer Protection and is acting within the
scope of [his or her] the research program subject's involvement in an
approved research program shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution,
penalized in any manner, including, but not limited to, being subject to
any civil penalty or denied any right or privilege, including, but not
limited to, being subject to any disciplinary action by a professional
licensing board, for the use of [marijuana] cannabis.
(c) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section do not apply to:
(1) Any use of [marijuana] cannabis that endangers the health or well-
being of a person other than the research program subject or a research
program employee; or
(2) The ingestion of [marijuana] cannabis (A) in a motor bus or a
school bus or in any other moving vehicle, (B) in the workplace, (C) on
any school grounds or any public or private school, dormitory, college
or university property unless such college or university is participating
in a research program and such use is pursuant to the terms of the
research program, (D) in any public place, or (E) in the presence of a
person under eighteen years of age unless such person is a qualifying
patient or research program subject. For purposes of this subdivision, (i)
"presence" means within the direct line of sight of the palliative use of
Public Act No. 26-8 59 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[marijuana] cannabis or exposure to second-hand [marijuana] cannabis
smoke, or both; (ii) "public place" means any area that is used or held
out for use by the public, whether owned or operated by public or
private interests; (iii) "vehicle" means a vehicle, as defined in section 14-
1; (iv) "motor bus" means a motor bus, as defined in section 14-1; and (v)
"school bus" means a school bus, as defined in section 14-1.
Sec. 44. Section 21a-408w of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Each cannabis establishment shall submit [marijuana] cannabis
samples to a cannabis testing laboratory for testing [as set forth in
subsection (b) of this section] in accordance with the laboratory testing
standards established in the regulations adopted by the Commissioner
of Consumer Protection pursuant to section 21a-421j, as amended by
this act. The quantity and number of cannabis samples submitted shall
be sufficient to ensure representative sampling of the corresponding
cannabis batch size.
[(b) (1) A cannabis testing laboratory shall test each marijuana sample
submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section (A) for
microbiological contaminants, mycotoxins, heavy metals and pesticide
chemical residue, and (B) for purposes of conducting an active
ingredient analysis, if applicable.
(2) Microbiological contaminant testing conducted pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include, but
not be limited to, microbiological contaminant testing for Aspergillus
species as set forth by the Department of Consumer Protection and
posted on the department's Internet web site.
(c) When conducting microbiological testing as set forth in subsection
(b) of this section, the marijuana sample shall be tested by using (1) a
molecular method that (A) includes quantitative polymerase chain
Public Act No. 26-8 60 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
reaction, (B) is certified for identifying microbiological DNA, and (C) is
approved by (i) the Association of Official Analytical Collaboration
International, or (ii) a comparable national or international standards
organization designated by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection,
or (2) an alternative testing method approved by the Department of
Consumer Protection and posted on the department's Internet web site.
(d) If a marijuana sample does not pass the testing set forth in
subsection (b) of this section, the cannabis establishment that submitted
such failing marijuana sample to the cannabis testing laboratory shall:
(1) Repeat testing as set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section
on the marijuana batch from which such marijuana sample was taken,
in a form and manner approved by the Department of Consumer
Protection. If all repeated testing yields satisfactory results, the
marijuana batch from which the marijuana samples were taken shall be
released for sale;
(2) If such cannabis establishment submits to the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection a remediation plan that is sufficient to ensure
public health and safety, and the commissioner approves such
remediation plan, remediate the marijuana batch from which such
marijuana sample was taken and repeat all testing as set forth in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section on such remediated marijuana
batch, in a form and manner approved by the Department of Consumer
Protection. If all repeated testing yields satisfactory results, the
marijuana batch from which the marijuana samples were taken shall be
released for sale; or
(3) If such cannabis establishment does not comply with subdivision
(1) or (2) of this subsection, or if any subsequent laboratory testing does
not yield satisfactory results for the testing set forth in subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, dispose of the entire marijuana batch from which
the marijuana sample was taken in accordance with procedures
Public Act No. 26-8 61 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
established by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, as published
on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site.
(e) For purposes of the testing set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of
this section, the quantity and number of marijuana samples taken shall
be sufficient to ensure representative sampling of the corresponding
marijuana batch size.]
(2) If the cannabis samples taken from a cannabis batch pass the
laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
cannabis batch shall be released for sale.
(3) If the cannabis samples taken from a cannabis batch fail the
laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
cannabis establishment that submitted the failing cannabis samples to
the cannabis testing laboratory shall, not later than sixty days after the
date of such failed laboratory testing:
(A) Repeat the laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of
this subsection on the cannabis batch in a form and manner approved
by the commissioner;
(B) Submit to the Department of Consumer Protection a remediation
plan for the cannabis batch, in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (c) of this section; or
(C) Dispose of the entire cannabis batch in accordance with
procedures established by the commissioner and published on the
department's Internet web site, unless the cannabis establishment
submits to the department during such sixty-day period, and the
commissioner approves, a request to extend the disposal period by sixty
days. The commissioner shall not grant more than two such requests for
any cannabis batch.
(b) Not later than sixty days after any repeated laboratory testing
Public Act No. 26-8 62 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
performed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of this section:
(1) If the cannabis samples pass such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis batch from which such cannabis samples were taken shall be
released for sale; or
(2) If the cannabis samples fail such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis establishment that submitted such failing cannabis samples
shall:
(A) Submit to the Department of Consumer Protection a remediation
plan for the cannabis batch from which such failing cannabis samples
were taken, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this
section; or
(B) Dispose of the entire cannabis batch from which such failing
cannabis samples were taken in accordance with procedures established
by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection and published on the
department's Internet web site, unless the cannabis establishment
submits to the department during such sixty-day period, and the
commissioner approves, a request to extend the disposal period by sixty
days. The commissioner shall not grant more than two such requests for
any cannabis batch.
(c) (1) Each remediation plan submitted to the Department of
Consumer Protection under subparagraph (B) of subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of this section or subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section shall be submitted in a form and manner
prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection.
(2) Not later than sixty days after the commissioner receives a
remediation plan described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
commissioner shall:
Public Act No. 26-8 63 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(A) Review the remediation plan to determine whether such
remediation plan is sufficient to ensure public health and safety;
(B) On the basis of such determination, approve or reject such
remediation plan; and
(C) Send to the cannabis establishment that submitted such
remediation plan, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, a written notice disclosing such approval or rejection
and, in the case of a rejection, the reasons for such rejection.
(3) If the commissioner does not send a written notice to the cannabis
establishment pursuant to subparagraph (C) of subdivision (2) of this
subsection within the sixty-day period required under subdivision (2)
of this subsection, such cannabis establishment's remediation plan shall
be deemed approved.
(4) If the commissioner approves the remediation plan under
subdivision (2) of this subsection, or if such remediation plan is deemed
approved under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the cannabis
establishment shall remediate the cannabis batch from which the failing
cannabis samples were taken and repeat all laboratory testing required
under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section in a form and
manner approved by the commissioner; and:
(A) If the cannabis samples pass such repeated laboratory testing,
such cannabis batch shall be released for sale; or
(B) If the cannabis samples fail such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis establishment that submitted such failing cannabis samples for
such repeated laboratory testing shall, not later than sixty days after the
date of such failed repeated laboratory testing, dispose of such cannabis
batch in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner
and published on the department's Internet web site, unless the
cannabis establishment submits to the department during such sixty-
Public Act No. 26-8 64 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
day period, and the commissioner approves, a request to extend the
disposal period by an additional sixty days. The commissioner shall not
grant more than two such requests for any cannabis batch.
Sec. 45. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 21a-409 of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) Hemp or manufacturer hemp products purchased by producers
from third parties shall be tracked as a separate batch throughout the
manufacturing process in order to document the disposition of such
hemp or manufacturer hemp products. Hemp or manufacturer hemp
products obtained, manufactured, marketed, cultivated or stored by a
producer shall be deemed [marijuana] cannabis and shall comply with
the requirements for [marijuana] cannabis contained in the applicable
provisions of the general statutes and any regulations adopted pursuant
to such provisions. Producers shall retain a copy of the certificate of
analysis for purchased hemp or manufacturer hemp products and
invoice and transport documents that evidence the quantity purchased
and date received.
(c) (1) No hemp or producer hemp products shall be sold or
distributed within a dispensary facility that is licensed pursuant to this
chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, manufacturer
hemp products may be sold within a dispensary facility that is licensed
pursuant to this chapter, provided such manufacturer hemp products
are:
(A) Stored separately from [marijuana] cannabis;
(B) Separated, by a physical separation, from [marijuana] cannabis in
any display area;
Public Act No. 26-8 65 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(C) Displayed with signage approved by the department;
(D) Tested by a laboratory that meets the standards for accreditation
and testing, and sampling methods, set forth for an independent testing
laboratory in section 22-61m, as amended by this act, which laboratory
may be located outside of this state;
(E) Clearly labeled to distinguish the product as (i) a manufacturer
hemp product, (ii) subject to different testing standards than cannabis,
[or marijuana,] and (iii) not cannabis; [or marijuana;] and
(F) Sold in accordance with this chapter, chapter 424 and any
regulations adopted pursuant to said chapters.
Sec. 46. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21a-410 of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Material change" means: (A) The addition of a dispensary facility
backer or producer backer, (B) a change in the ownership interest of an
existing dispensary facility backer or producer backer, (C) the merger,
consolidation or other affiliation of a medical [marijuana] cannabis
business with another person, (D) the acquisition of all or part of a
medical [marijuana] cannabis business by another person, and (E) the
transfer of assets or security interests from a medical [marijuana]
cannabis business to another person;
(2) ["Medical marijuana business"] "Medical cannabis business"
means a medical [marijuana] cannabis dispensary facility or production
facility, licensed pursuant to this chapter and the regulations adopted
under this chapter;
(3) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
Public Act No. 26-8 66 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
company, association, trust or other business or tribal entity; and
(4) "Transfer" means to sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey,
give or otherwise dispose of or transfer control over, including, but not
limited to, transfer by way of merger or joint venture not in the ordinary
course of business.
(b) No person shall, directly or indirectly, enter into a transaction that
results in a material change to a medical [marijuana] cannabis business,
unless all persons involved in the transaction file a written notification
with the Attorney General pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and
the waiting period described in subsection (d) of this section has
expired.
Sec. 47. Section 21a-420 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
As used in RERACA, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Responsible and Equitable Regulation of Adult-Use Cannabis
Act" or "RERACA" means this section, sections 2-56j, 7-294kk, 7-294ll,
12-330ll to 12-330nn, inclusive, as amended by this act, 14-227p, 21a-
278b, 21a-278c, 21a-279c, 21a-279d, 21a-408w, as amended by this act,
21a-420a to 21a-420j, inclusive, as amended by this act, 21a-420l to 21a-
421u, inclusive, as amended by this act, 21a-421aa to 21a-421ff, inclusive,
as amended by this act, 21a-421aaa to 21a-421iii, inclusive, 21a-422 to
21a-422c, inclusive, 21a-422e to 21a-422g, inclusive, as amended by this
act, 21a-422j to 21a-422s, inclusive, 21a-422u, 22-61n, as amended by this
act, 23-4b, 47a-9a, 53-247a, as amended by this act, 53a-213a, as amended
by this act, 53a-213b, as amended by this act, 54-33p, 54-56q, 54-56r, 54-
125k and 54-142u, sections 23, 60, 63 to 65, inclusive, 124, 144 and 165 of
public act 21-1, as amended by this act, of the June special session, and
the amendments in public act 21-1, as amended by this act, of the June
Public Act No. 26-8 67 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
special session to sections 7-148, as amended by this act, 10-221, 12-30a,
12-35b, 12-412, as amended by this act, 12-650, as amended by this act,
12-704d, as amended by this act, 14-44k, 14-111e, 14-227a to 14-227c,
inclusive, as amended by this act, 14-227j, 15-140q, 15-140r, as amended
by this act, 18-100h, 19a-342, as amended by this act, 19a-342a, as
amended by this act, 21a-267, 21a-277, as amended by this act, 21a-279,
as amended by this act, 21a-279a, as amended by this act, 21a-408 to 21a-
408f, inclusive, as amended by this act, 21a-408h to 21a-408p, inclusive,
as amended by this act, 21a-408r to 21a-408v, inclusive, as amended by
this act, 30-89a, 31-40q, as amended by this act, 32-39, 46b-120, 51-164n,
53-394, 53a-39c, 54-1m, 54-33g, 54-41b, 54-56e, 54-56g, 54-56i, 54-56k, 54-
56n, 54-63d, 54-66a and 54-142e, [and] section 22 of public act 25-101 and
sections 48 to 52, inclusive, of this act;
(2) "Backer" means any individual with a direct or indirect financial
interest in a cannabis establishment. "Backer" does not include (A) a
bank, bank and trust company, bank holding company, Connecticut
bank, Connecticut credit union, federal bank, federal branch, federal
credit union, financial institution, foreign bank, holding company, out-
of-state bank, out-of-state credit union, out-of-state trust company,
savings and loan association, savings bank or savings and loan holding
company, as such terms are defined in section 36a-2, or a wholly-owned
subsidiary thereof, that provides nonequity financing to a cannabis
establishment and does not directly participate in the control,
management or operation of the cannabis establishment, or (B) an
individual with an investment interest in a cannabis establishment if (i)
the interest held by such individual and such individual's spouse,
parent or child, in the aggregate, does not exceed five per cent of the
total ownership or interest rights in such cannabis establishment, and
(ii) such individual does not participate directly or indirectly in the
control, management or operation of the cannabis establishment;
(3) "Cannabis" [means marijuana, as defined] has the same meaning
Public Act No. 26-8 68 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
as provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act;
(4) "Cannabis establishment" means a producer, dispensary facility,
cultivator, micro-cultivator, retailer, hybrid retailer, food and beverage
manufacturer, product manufacturer, product packager, delivery
service or transporter;
(5) "Cannabis flower" means the flower, including abnormal and
immature flowers, of a plant of the genus cannabis that has been
harvested, dried, cured, chopped or ground, and prior to any processing
whereby the flower material is transformed into a cannabis product.
"Cannabis flower" does not include (A) the leaves or stem of such plant,
or (B) hemp, as defined in section 22-61l, as amended by this act;
(6) "Cannabis testing laboratory" means a laboratory that (A) is
located in this state, (B) is licensed by the department to analyze
cannabis, and (C) meets the licensure requirements established in
section 21a-408r, as amended by this act, and the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection (d) of section 21a-408r, as amended by this act;
(7) "Cannabis testing laboratory employee" means an individual who
is (A) employed at a cannabis testing laboratory, and (B) registered
pursuant to section 21a-408r, as amended by this act, and the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of section 21a-408r, as amended by
this act;
(8) "Cannabis trim" means all parts, including abnormal or immature
parts, of a plant of the genus cannabis, other than cannabis flower, that
have been harvested, dried and cured, and prior to any processing,
excluding chopping or grinding, whereby the plant material is
transformed into a cannabis product. "Cannabis trim" does not include
hemp, as defined in section 22-61l, as amended by this act;
(9) "Cannabis product" means cannabis, intended for use or
consumption, that is in the form of (A) a cannabis concentrate, or (B) a
Public Act No. 26-8 69 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
product that contains cannabis and at least one other cannabis or
noncannabis ingredient or component, excluding cannabis flower;
(10) "Cannabis concentrate" means any form of concentration,
including, but not limited to, extracts, oils, tinctures, [shatter] shatters
and waxes, that is extracted from cannabis;
(11) "Cannabis-type substances" [have] has the same meaning as
["marijuana"] cannabis, as defined in section 21a-240, as amended by
this act;
(12) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection and includes any designee of the commissioner;
(13) "Consumer" means an individual who is twenty-one years of age
or older;
(14) "Control" means the power to direct, or cause the direction of, the
management and policies of a cannabis establishment, regardless of
whether such power is possessed directly or indirectly;
(15) "Cultivation" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
408, as amended by this act;
(16) "Cultivator" means a person that is licensed to engage in the
cultivation, growing and propagation of the cannabis plant at an
establishment with not less than fifteen thousand square feet of grow
space;
(17) "Delivery service" means a person that is licensed to deliver
cannabis from (A) micro-cultivators, retailers and hybrid retailers to
consumers and research program subjects, and (B) hybrid retailers and
dispensary facilities to qualifying patients, caregivers and research
program subjects, as defined in section 21a-408, as amended by this act,
or to hospices or other inpatient care facilities licensed by the
Public Act No. 26-8 70 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Department of Public Health pursuant to chapter 368v that have a
protocol for the handling and distribution of cannabis that has been
approved by the department, or a combination thereof;
(18) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
(19) "Dispensary facility" means a place of business, for which the
department has issued a dispensary facility license pursuant to chapter
420f, where cannabis may be dispensed, sold or distributed in
accordance with chapter 420f and any regulations adopted pursuant to
said chapter, to qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-of-state
patients, caregivers [, and to which the department has issued a
dispensary facility license pursuant to chapter 420f and any regulations
adopted pursuant to said chapter] and qualifying out-of-state
caregivers;
(20) "Disproportionately impacted area" means (A) for the period
beginning July 1, 2021, and ending July 31, 2023, a United States census
tract in the state that has, as determined by the Social Equity Council
under subdivision (1) of subsection (i) of section 21a-420d, as amended
by this act, (i) a historical conviction rate for drug-related offenses
greater than one-tenth, or (ii) an unemployment rate greater than ten
per cent, and (B) on and after August 1, 2023, a United States census tract
in this state that has been identified by the Social Equity Council
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (i) of section 21a-420d, as
amended by this act;
(21) "Disqualifying conviction" means a conviction within the last ten
years which has not been the subject of an absolute pardon under the
provisions of section 54-130a, or an equivalent pardon process under the
laws of another state or the federal government, for an offense under (A)
section 53a-276, 53a-277 or 53a-278, (B) section 53a-291, 53a-292 or 53a-
293, (C) section 53a-215, (D) section 53a-138 or 53a-139, (E) section 53a-
142a, (F) sections 53a-147 to 53a-162, inclusive, (G) sections 53a-125c to
Public Act No. 26-8 71 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
53a-125f, inclusive, (H) section 53a-129b, 53a-129c or 53a-129d, (I)
subsection (b) of section 12-737, (J) section 53a-48 or 53a-49, if the offense
which is attempted or is an object of the conspiracy is an offense under
the statutes listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of this
subdivision, or (K) the law of any other state or of the federal
government, if the offense on which such conviction is based is defined
by elements that substantially include the elements of an offense under
the statutes listed in subparagraphs (A) to (J), inclusive, of this
subdivision;
(22) "Dispensary technician" means an individual who has had an
active pharmacy technician or dispensary technician registration in this
state within the past five years, is affiliated with a dispensary facility or
hybrid retailer and is registered with the department in accordance with
chapter 420f and any regulations adopted pursuant to said chapter;
(23) "Edible cannabis product" means a cannabis product intended
for humans to eat or drink;
(24) "Employee" means any person who is not a backer, but is a
member of the board of a company with an ownership interest in a
cannabis establishment, and any person employed by a cannabis
establishment or who otherwise has access to such establishment or the
vehicles used to transport cannabis, including, but not limited to, an
independent contractor who has routine access to the premises of such
establishment or to the cannabis handled by such establishment;
(25) "Equity" and "equitable" means efforts, regulations, policies,
programs, standards, processes and any other functions of government
or principles of law and governance intended to (A) identify and
remedy past and present patterns of discrimination and disparities of
race, ethnicity, gender and sexual orientation, (B) ensure that such
patterns of discrimination and disparities, whether intentional or
unintentional, are neither reinforced nor perpetuated, and (C) prevent
Public Act No. 26-8 72 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the emergence and persistence of foreseeable future patterns of
discrimination or disparities of race, ethnicity, gender and sexual
orientation;
(26) "Equity joint venture" means a business entity that is controlled,
and at least fifty per cent owned, by an individual or individuals, or such
applicant is an individual, who meets the criteria of subparagraphs (A)
and (B) of subdivision [(51)] (54) of this section;
(27) "Extract" means the preparation, compounding, conversion or
processing of cannabis, either directly or indirectly by extraction or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis to produce a cannabis concentrate;
(28) "Financial interest" means any right to, ownership, an investment
or a compensation arrangement with another person, directly, through
business, investment or family. "Financial interest" does not include
ownership of investment securities in a publicly-held corporation that
is traded on a national exchange or over-the-counter market, provided
the investment securities held by such person and such person's spouse,
parent or child, in the aggregate, do not exceed one-half of one per cent
of the total number of shares issued by the corporation;
(29) "Food and beverage manufacturer" means a person that is
licensed to own and operate a place of business that acquires cannabis
and creates food and beverages;
(30) "Grow space" means the portion of a premises owned and
controlled by a producer, cultivator or micro-cultivator that is utilized
for the cultivation, growing or propagation of the cannabis plant, and
contains cannabis plants in an active stage of growth, measured starting
from the outermost wall of the room containing cannabis plants and
continuing around the outside of the room. "Grow space" does not
include space used to cure, process, store harvested cannabis or
Public Act No. 26-8 73 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
manufacture cannabis once the cannabis has been harvested;
(31) "Historical conviction count for drug-related offenses" means, for
a given area, the number of convictions of residents of such area (A) for
violations of sections 21a-267, 21a-277, as amended by this act, 21a-278,
21a-279, as amended by this act, and 21a-279a, as amended by this act,
and (B) who were arrested for such violations between January 1, 1982,
and December 31, 2020, inclusive, where such arrest was recorded in
databases maintained by the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection;
(32) "Historical conviction rate for drug-related offenses" means, for
a given area, the historical conviction count for drug-related offenses
divided by the population of such area, as determined by the five-year
estimates of the most recent American Community Survey conducted
by the United States Census Bureau;
(33) "Hybrid retailer" means a person that is licensed to purchase
cannabis and sell cannabis and medical [marijuana] cannabis products;
(34) "Infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-425, as amended by this act;
(35) "Key employee" means an employee with the following
management position or an equivalent title within a cannabis
establishment: (A) President or chief officer, who is the top ranking
individual at the cannabis establishment and is responsible for all staff
and overall direction of business operations; (B) financial manager, who
is the individual who reports to the president or chief officer and who is
responsible for oversight of the financial operations of the cannabis
establishment, which financial operations include one or more of the
following: (i) Revenue and expense management; (ii) distributions; (iii)
tax compliance; (iv) budget development; and (v) budget management
and implementation; or (C) compliance manager, who is the individual
Public Act No. 26-8 74 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
who reports to the president or chief officer and who is generally
responsible for ensuring the cannabis establishment complies with all
laws, regulations and requirements related to the operation of the
cannabis establishment;
(36) "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a
cannabis establishment and a bona fide labor organization under section
21a-421d, as amended by this act, pursuant to which the owners and
management of the cannabis establishment agree not to lock out
employees and that prohibits the bona fide labor organization from
engaging in picketing, work stoppages or boycotts against the cannabis
establishment;
(37) "Manufacture" means to add or incorporate cannabis into other
products or ingredients or create a cannabis product;
(38) ["Medical marijuana product"] "Medical cannabis product"
means cannabis that may be exclusively sold to qualifying patients,
[and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-
state caregivers by dispensary facilities and hybrid retailers and which
are designated by the commissioner as reserved for sale to qualifying
patients, [and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and
qualifying out-of-state caregivers and published on the department's
Internet web site;
(39) "Micro-cultivator" means a person licensed to engage in the
cultivation, growing and propagation of the cannabis plant at an
establishment containing not less than two thousand square feet and not
more than ten thousand square feet of grow space, prior to any
expansion authorized by the commissioner;
(40) "Municipality" means any town, city or borough, consolidated
town and city or consolidated town and borough;
(41) "Paraphernalia" means drug paraphernalia, as defined in section
Public Act No. 26-8 75 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
21a-240, as amended by this act;
(42) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability
company, society, association, joint stock company, corporation, estate,
receiver, trustee, assignee, referee or any other legal entity and any other
person acting in a fiduciary or representative capacity, whether
appointed by a court or otherwise, and any combination thereof;
(43) "Personal data" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-
515;
[(43)] (44) "Producer" means a person that is licensed as a producer
pursuant to section 21a-408i, as amended by this act, and any
regulations adopted pursuant to said section;
[(44)] (45) "Product manufacturer" means a person that is licensed to
obtain cannabis, extract and manufacture products;
[(45)] (46) "Product packager" means a person that is licensed to
package and label cannabis;
(47) "Qualifying out-of-state caregiver" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
(48) "Qualifying out-of-state patient" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
[(46)] (49) "Qualifying patient" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
[(47)] (50) "Research program" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
[(48)] (51) "Retailer" means a person, excluding a dispensary facility
and hybrid retailer, that is licensed to purchase cannabis from
producers, cultivators, micro-cultivators, product manufacturers and
Public Act No. 26-8 76 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
food and beverage manufacturers and to sell cannabis to consumers and
research programs;
[(49)] (52) "Sale" or "sell" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-240, as amended by this act;
[(50)] (53) "Social Equity Council" or "council" means the council
established under section 21a-420d, as amended by this act;
[(51)] (54) "Social equity applicant" means a person that has applied
for a license for a cannabis establishment, where such applicant is
controlled, and at least sixty-five per cent owned, by an individual or
individuals, or such applicant is an individual, who:
(A) Had an average household income of less than three hundred per
cent of the state median household income over the three tax years
immediately preceding such individual's application; and
(B) (i) Was a resident of a disproportionately impacted area for not
less than five of the ten years immediately preceding the date of such
application; or
(ii) Was a resident of a disproportionately impacted area for not less
than nine years prior to attaining the age of eighteen;
[(52)] (55) "THC" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240, as amended by this act;
[(53)] (56) "Third-party lottery operator" means a person, or a
constituent unit of the state system of higher education, that conducts
lotteries pursuant to section 21a-420g, as amended by this act, identifies
the cannabis establishment license applications for consideration
without performing any review of the applications that are identified
for consideration, and that has no direct or indirect oversight of or
investment in a cannabis establishment or a cannabis establishment
Public Act No. 26-8 77 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
applicant;
[(54)] (57) "Transfer" means to transfer, change, give or otherwise
dispose of control over or interest in;
[(55)] (58) "Transport" means to physically move from one place to
another;
[(56)] (59) "Transporter" means a person licensed to transport
cannabis between cannabis establishments, cannabis testing
laboratories and research programs; and
[(57)] (60) "Unemployment rate" means, in a given area, the number
of people sixteen years of age or older who are in the civilian labor force
and unemployed divided by the number of people sixteen years of age
or older who are in the civilian labor force.
Sec. 48. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
cannabis regulatory working group to (1) study regulations adopted or
proposed, and policies and procedures issued or proposed, by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection and the Social Equity Council
concerning cannabis, (2) recommend the adoption or amendment of
regulations concerning cannabis, (3) recommend the issuance or
amendment of policies and procedures concerning cannabis, and (4)
propose legislation concerning cannabis.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) One appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection;
(2) One appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection;
Public Act No. 26-8 78 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(3) One appointed by the House ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection; and
(4) One appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection.
(c) Any member of the working group appointed under subsection
(b) of this section may be a member of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the working group shall be made not
later than October 31, 2026. Any vacancy shall be filled by the
appointing authority.
(e) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to consumer protection
shall select the chairpersons of the working group from among the
members of the working group. The chairpersons of the working group
shall schedule the first meeting of the working group, which shall be
held not later than December 1, 2026.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to consumer
protection shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, and periodically thereafter as the
working group deems appropriate, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 49. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) No retailer, hybrid retailer
or dispensary facility shall borrow money or receive credit, directly or
Public Act No. 26-8 79 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
indirectly, in any form for a period in excess of thirty days from any
cultivator, micro-cultivator or producer.
Sec. 50. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding any
provision of chapter 420f or 420h of the general statutes, no cannabis
establishment licensed to deliver or transport cannabis shall be required
to staff any cannabis delivery or transport vehicle with more than one
employee in order to deliver or transport cannabis to another cannabis
establishment, a cannabis testing laboratory or a research program
location if such vehicle is equipped with the following devices and
container for the purpose of preventing any diversion, theft or loss of
cannabis:
(1) An electronic recording device that electronically records video of
such vehicle's interior at all times while such vehicle is used to deliver
or transport cannabis;
(2) An electronic tracking device that tracks, in real time, the
geospatial location of such vehicle by means of the global positioning
system at all times while such vehicle is used to deliver or transport
cannabis; and
(3) A secure container that is permanently affixed to such vehicle and
contains all cannabis delivered or transported by such vehicle.
(b) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
general statutes to implement the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, and may adopt policies and procedures as set forth in section
21a-421j of the general statutes, as amended by this act, prior to adopting
such regulations.
Sec. 51. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Notwithstanding any
provision of chapter 420f or 420h of the general statutes, no producer,
cultivator or micro-cultivator engaged in the outdoor cultivation of
Public Act No. 26-8 80 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
cannabis shall be required to maintain a fence on the perimeter of the
outdoor cannabis cultivation area that is more than eight feet in height.
Sec. 52. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) Each cannabis
establishment shall submit cannabis samples to a cannabis testing
laboratory for testing in accordance with the laboratory testing
standards established in the regulations adopted by the Commissioner
of Consumer Protection pursuant to section 21a-421j of the general
statutes, as amended by this act. The quantity and number of cannabis
samples submitted shall be sufficient to ensure representative sampling
of the corresponding cannabis batch size.
(2) If the cannabis samples taken from a cannabis batch pass the
laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
cannabis batch shall be released for sale.
(3) If the cannabis samples taken from a cannabis batch fail the
laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
cannabis establishment that submitted the failing cannabis samples to
the cannabis testing laboratory shall, not later than sixty days after the
date of such failed laboratory testing:
(A) Repeat the laboratory testing required under subdivision (1) of
this subsection on the cannabis batch in a form and manner approved
by the commissioner;
(B) Submit to the Department of Consumer Protection a remediation
plan for the cannabis batch, in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (c) of this section; or
(C) Dispose of the entire cannabis batch in accordance with
procedures established by the commissioner and published on the
department's Internet web site, unless the cannabis establishment
submits to the department during such sixty-day period, and the
commissioner approves, a request to extend the disposal period by sixty
Public Act No. 26-8 81 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
days. The commissioner shall not grant more than two such requests for
any cannabis batch.
(b) Not later than sixty days after any repeated laboratory testing
performed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of this section:
(1) If the cannabis samples pass such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis batch from which such cannabis samples were taken shall be
released for sale; or
(2) If the cannabis samples fail such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis establishment that submitted such failing cannabis samples
shall:
(A) Submit to the Department of Consumer Protection a remediation
plan for the cannabis batch from which such failing cannabis samples
were taken, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this
section; or
(B) Dispose of the entire cannabis batch from which such failing
cannabis samples were taken in accordance with procedures established
by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection and published on the
department's Internet web site, unless the cannabis establishment
submits to the department during such sixty-day period, and the
commissioner approves, a request to extend the disposal period by sixty
days. The commissioner shall not grant more than two such requests for
any cannabis batch.
(c) (1) Each remediation plan submitted to the Department of
Consumer Protection under subparagraph (B) of subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of this section or subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section shall be submitted in a form and manner
prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection.
Public Act No. 26-8 82 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(2) Not later than sixty days after the commissioner receives a
remediation plan described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
commissioner shall:
(A) Review the remediation plan to determine whether such
remediation plan is sufficient to ensure public health and safety;
(B) On the basis of such determination, approve or reject such
remediation plan; and
(C) Send to the cannabis establishment that submitted such
remediation plan, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, a written notice disclosing such approval or rejection
and, in the case of a rejection, the reasons for such rejection.
(3) If the commissioner does not send a written notice to the cannabis
establishment pursuant to subparagraph (C) of subdivision (2) of this
subsection within the sixty-day period required under subdivision (2)
of this subsection, such cannabis establishment's remediation plan shall
be deemed approved.
(4) If the commissioner approves the remediation plan under
subdivision (2) of this subsection, or if such remediation plan is deemed
approved under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the cannabis
establishment shall remediate the cannabis batch from which the failing
cannabis samples were taken and repeat all laboratory testing required
under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section in a form and
manner approved by the commissioner; and:
(A) If the cannabis samples pass such repeated laboratory testing,
such cannabis batch shall be released for sale; or
(B) If the cannabis samples fail such repeated laboratory testing, the
cannabis establishment that submitted such failing cannabis samples for
such repeated laboratory testing shall, not later than sixty days after the
Public Act No. 26-8 83 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
date of such failed repeated laboratory testing, dispose of such cannabis
batch in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner
and published on the department's Internet web site, unless the
cannabis establishment submits to the department during such sixty-
day period, and the commissioner approves, a request to extend the
disposal period by an additional sixty days. The commissioner shall not
grant more than two such requests for any cannabis batch.
Sec. 53. Subsections (a) to (e), inclusive, of section 21a-420c of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as provided in section 4-28h;
(2) "Electronic cigarette liquid" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-415;
(3) "Electronic nicotine delivery system" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-415;
(4) "Immediate threat to public health and safety" includes, but is not
limited to, (A) the presence of [(A)] (i) any cannabis or cannabis product
in connection with a violation of this section, [or (B)] (ii) any cigarette,
tobacco product, electronic cigarette liquid, electronic nicotine delivery
system, [or] liquid nicotine container or nicotine product stored or
displayed adjacent or proximate to any cannabis or cannabis product or
otherwise being sold unlawfully, (iii) any controlled substance in
schedule I or II, (iv) any product offered or sold for human consumption
that any federal, state or local government agency acting within the
scope of its authority has deemed unsafe based on reports that such
product has caused personal injury or illness, or (v) any unlawful
firearm, or (B) any documented sale of any product to an individual who
is under the minimum age to purchase such product;
Public Act No. 26-8 84 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(5) "Liquid nicotine container" has the same meaning as provided in
section 19a-342a, as amended by this act; [and]
(6) "Nicotine product" means any product, regardless of form, that is
made from or otherwise contains nicotine; and
[(6)] (7) "Tobacco product" has the same meaning as provided in
section 12-330a.
(b) Except as provided in RERACA and chapter 420b or 420f, (1) no
person, other than a retailer, hybrid retailer, micro-cultivator or delivery
service, or an employee thereof in the course of such employee's
employment, may sell or offer any cannabis or cannabis product to a
consumer, [and] (2) no person, other than a hybrid retailer, dispensary
facility or a delivery service, or an employee thereof in the course of such
employee's employment, may sell or offer any cannabis or cannabis
product to a qualifying patient or caregiver, and (3) no person, other
than a hybrid retailer or dispensary facility, or an employee thereof in
the course of such employee's employment, may sell or offer any
cannabis or cannabis product to a qualifying out-of-state patient or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver.
(c) No person except a delivery service, or an employee of a delivery
service, subject to the restrictions set forth in section 21a-420z, as
amended by this act, acting in the course of such employee's
employment, may deliver any cannabis or cannabis product to a
consumer, qualifying patient or caregiver.
(d) Any violation of the provisions of subsection (b) or (c) of this
section shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive trade practice under
subsection (a) of section 42-110b.
(e) (1) Any municipality may, by vote of its legislative body, prohibit
the operation of any business within such municipality that is found to
be in violation of the provisions of this section or if such operation poses
Public Act No. 26-8 85 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
an immediate threat to public health and safety.
(2) If the chief executive officer of a municipality determines that a
business within the municipality is operating in violation of the
provisions of this section or poses an immediate threat to public health
and safety, the chief executive officer may apply to the Superior Court
for an order under subdivision (3) of this subsection and, upon making
such application, submit a written copy of such application to the
Attorney General and the Commissioner of Consumer Protection.
(3) Upon an application under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
Superior Court, upon a finding that a business within the municipality
is operating in violation of the provisions of this section or poses an
immediate threat to public health and safety, may issue forthwith, ex
parte and without a hearing, an order that shall direct the chief law
enforcement officer of the municipality to summarily close such
business, seal the premises of such business and take from such business
possession and control of any merchandise related to such violation or
immediate threat to public health and safety, which merchandise shall
include, but need not be limited to, (A) any cannabis or cannabis
product, (B) any cigarette, tobacco, tobacco product, electronic cigarette
liquid, electronic nicotine delivery system, [or] liquid nicotine container
or nicotine product, (C) any merchandise related to the merchandise
described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision, and (D) any
proceeds related to the merchandise described in subparagraphs (A) to
(C), inclusive, of this subdivision.
(4) As used in this subsection, "operation" and "operating" mean
engaging in the sale of goods and services to the general public,
including, but not limited to, through indirect retail sales.
Sec. 54. Section 21a-420d of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-8 86 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(a) There is established a Social Equity Council, which shall be within
the Department of Economic and Community Development for
administrative purposes only.
(b) The Social Equity Council shall consist of seventeen members as
follows:
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who has a professional background of not less than five years working
in the field of either social justice or civil rights;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, who
has a professional background of not less than five years working in the
field of either social justice or civil rights;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who has a professional background of not less than five
years working in the field of economic development to help minority-
owned businesses;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who has a
professional background of not less than five years in providing access
to capital to minorities, as defined in section 32-9n;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is from a community that has been
disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and enforcement;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who has a
professional background of not less than five years in providing access
to capital to minorities, as defined in section 32-9n;
(7) Two appointed by the chairperson of the Black and Puerto Rican
Caucus of the General Assembly, one of whom shall be designated by
the chairperson of the Black Caucus of the General Assembly and one of
Public Act No. 26-8 87 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
whom shall be designated by the chairperson of the Puerto Rican and
Latino Caucus of the General Assembly;
(8) Five appointed by the Governor, one who is from a community
that has been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement, one who has a professional background of not less than
five years working in the field of economic development and one who
is an executive branch official focused on workforce development;
(9) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the commissioner's
designee;
(10) The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development,
or the commissioner's designee;
(11) The State Treasurer, or the State Treasurer's designee; and
(12) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee.
(c) (1) In making the appointments in subsection (b) of this section,
the appointing authority shall use best efforts to make appointments
that reflect the racial, gender and geographic diversity of the population
of the state.
(2) Members appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of four
years from the time of appointment and members appointed by any
other appointing authority shall serve a term of three years from the
time of appointment. The appointing authority shall fill any vacancy for
the unexpired term.
(3) (A) The Governor shall appoint an interim executive director to
operationalize and support the Social Equity Council until,
notwithstanding the provisions of section 4-9a, the council appoints an
executive director. Subject to the provisions of chapter 67, and within
Public Act No. 26-8 88 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
available appropriations, the council may thereafter appoint an
executive director and such other employees as may be necessary for the
discharge of the duties of the council.
(B) Not later than July 1, 2024, the council shall adopt bylaws
specifying which duties are retained by the members of the council and
which duties are delegated to the executive director.
(C) The council may, by a simple majority vote of the members of the
council, take any formal personnel action concerning the executive
director for any reason.
(D) In addition to the council's authority under subparagraph (C) of
this subdivision, if a final review board consisting of the chairperson
and the members of the council appointed under subdivisions (1), (2),
(5) and (6) of subsection (b) of this section determines, by a simple
majority vote of the members of the final review board, that removing
the executive director is in the best interest of serving the council's
mission, such final review board shall issue a letter to the council
recommending that the council remove the executive director.
(4) The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the council from
among the members of the council. The chairperson shall directly
supervise, establish annual goals for and conduct an annual
performance review of the executive director.
(5) The chairperson and executive director shall jointly develop, and
the council shall review and approve, (A) allocations of moneys in the
social equity and innovation account established under section 21a-420f,
for the purposes that the council determines under subsection (a) of
section 21a-420f, further the principles of equity, and (B) any plans for
expenditures to provide (i) access to capital for businesses, (ii) technical
assistance for the start-up and operation of a business, (iii) funding for
workforce education, (iv) funding for community investments, and (v)
Public Act No. 26-8 89 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
funding for investments in disproportionately impacted areas.
(d) A majority of the members of the Social Equity Council shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. The members
of the council shall serve without compensation, but shall, within
available appropriations, be reimbursed for expenses necessarily
incurred in the performance of their duties. Any member who fails to
attend three consecutive meetings, or who fails to attend fifty per cent
of all meetings held during any calendar year, may be removed from
office by a simple majority vote of the members of the council. The
appointing authority shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of any
member who is removed from office under this subsection, and shall
use best efforts to ensure such appointment reflects the racial, gender
and geographic diversity of the population of the state.
(e) The Social Equity Council may (1) request, and shall receive, from
any state agency such information and assistance as the council may
require to carry out its duties, (2) use such funds as may be available
from federal, state or other sources [and may] to carry out its duties, (3)
enter into contracts or agreements to carry out [the purposes of the
council] its duties, including, but not limited to, contracts or agreements
with Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, constituent units of the
state system of higher education, regional workforce development
boards and community development financial institutions, [(3)] (4)
utilize such voluntary and uncompensated services of private
individuals, state or federal agencies and organizations as may, from
time to time, be offered and needed [, (4)] to carry out its duties, (5)
accept any gift, donation or bequest [for the purpose of performing the]
to carry out its duties, [of the council, (5)] (6) conduct such investigations
as the council may deem necessary to carry out its duties, provided such
investigations concern matters, complaints or concerns that (A) are
brought before the council by individuals who meet the criteria
established in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision (51) of section
Public Act No. 26-8 90 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
21a-420, as amended by this act, and (B) relate to the protection,
enforcement or advancement of equity under this chapter, (7) hold
public hearings, [(6)] (8) establish such standing committees, as
necessary, to [perform the] carry out its duties, [of the council,] and [(7)]
(9) adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
as the council may deem necessary to carry out [the] its duties. [of the
council.]
(f) The Social Equity Council shall promote and encourage full
participation in the cannabis industry by persons from communities
that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement.
(g) Not later than forty-five days after June 22, 2021, or at a later date
determined by the Social Equity Council, the council shall establish
criteria for proposals to conduct a study under this section and the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall post on the State
Contracting Portal a request for proposals to conduct a study, and shall
select an independent third party to conduct such study and provide
detailed findings of fact regarding the following matters in the state or
other matters determined by the council:
(1) Historical and present-day social, economic and familial
consequences of cannabis prohibition, the criminalization and
stigmatization of cannabis use and related public policies;
(2) Historical and present-day structures, patterns, causes and
consequences of intentional and unintentional racial discrimination and
racial disparities in the development, application and enforcement of
cannabis prohibition and related public policies;
(3) Foreseeable long-term social, economic and familial consequences
of unremedied past racial discrimination and disparities arising from
past and continued cannabis prohibition, stigmatization and
Public Act No. 26-8 91 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
criminalization;
(4) Existing patterns of racial discrimination and racial disparities in
access to entrepreneurship, employment and other economic benefits
arising in the lawful palliative use cannabis sector as established
pursuant to chapter 420f; and
(5) Any other matters that the council deems relevant and feasible for
study for the purpose of making reasonable and practical
recommendations for the establishment of an equitable and lawful
adult-use cannabis business sector in this state.
(h) Not later than January 1, 2022, the Social Equity Council shall,
taking into account the results of the study conducted in accordance
with subsection (g) of this section, make written recommendations, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the Governor and the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding, consumer
protection and the judiciary regarding legislation to implement the
provisions of this section. The council shall make recommendations
regarding:
(1) Creating programs to ensure that individuals from communities
that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement are provided equal access to licenses for cannabis
establishments;
(2) Specifying additional qualifications for social equity applicants;
(3) Providing for expedited or priority license processing for each
license as a retailer, hybrid retailer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product
manufacturer, food and beverage manufacturer, product packager,
transporter and delivery service license for social equity applicants;
(4) Establishing minimum criteria for any cannabis establishment
Public Act No. 26-8 92 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
licensed on or after January 1, 2022, to comply with an approved
workforce development plan to reinvest or provide employment and
training opportunities for individuals in disproportionately impacted
areas;
(5) Establishing criteria for a social equity plan for any cannabis
establishment licensed on or after January 1, 2022, to further the
principles of equity;
(6) Recruiting individuals from communities that have been
disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and enforcement to
enroll in the workforce training program established pursuant to section
21a-421g;
(7) Potential uses for revenue generated under RERACA to further
equity;
(8) Encouraging participation of investors, cannabis establishments
and entrepreneurs in the cannabis business accelerator program
established pursuant to section 21a-421f;
(9) Establishing a process to best ensure that social equity applicants
have access to the capital and training needed to own and operate a
cannabis establishment; and
(10) Developing a vendor list of women-owned and minority-owned
businesses that cannabis establishments may contract with for necessary
services, including, but not limited to, office supplies, information
technology infrastructure and cleaning services.
(i) (1) Not later than August 1, 2021, and annually thereafter until July
31, 2023, the Social Equity Council shall use the most recent five-year
United States Census Bureau American Community Survey estimates
or any successor data to determine one or more United States census
tracts in the state that are a disproportionately impacted area and shall
Public Act No. 26-8 93 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
publish a list of such tracts on the council's Internet web site.
(2) Not later than August 1, 2023, the council shall use poverty rate
data from the most recent five-year United States Census Bureau
American Community Survey estimates, population data from the most
recent decennial census and conviction information from databases
managed by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection to identify all United States census tracts in the state that are
disproportionately impacted areas and shall publish a list of such tracts
on the council's Internet web site. In identifying which census tracts in
this state are disproportionately impacted areas and preparing such list,
the council shall:
(A) Not deem any census tract with a poverty rate that is less than the
state-wide poverty rate to be a disproportionately impacted area;
(B) After eliminating the census tracts described in subparagraph (A)
of this subdivision, rank the remaining census tracts in order from the
census tract with the greatest historical conviction rate for drug-related
offenses to the census tract with the lowest historical conviction rate for
drug-related offenses; and
(C) Include census tracts in the order of rank described in
subparagraph (B) of this subdivision until including the next census
tract would cause the total population of all included census tracts to
exceed twenty-five per cent of the state's population.
(j) After developing criteria for workforce development plans as
described in subdivision (4) of subsection (h) of this section, the Social
Equity Council shall review and approve or deny in writing any such
plan submitted by an applicant for a final license. If the Social Equity
Council does not approve a workforce development plan for a cannabis
establishment on or before July 1, 2025, the cannabis establishment shall
submit a workforce development plan to the council not later than
Public Act No. 26-8 94 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
October 1, 2025, or sixty days prior to the next renewal date for such
cannabis establishment's license, whichever is earlier. Not later than
sixty days after the cannabis establishment submits the workforce
development plan to the council, the council shall send notice to the
cannabis establishment disclosing whether such workforce
development plan has been approved, rejected or requires modification.
(k) (1) The Social Equity Council shall develop criteria for evaluating
the ownership and control of any equity joint venture created under
section 21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as amended by this
act, 21a-420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as amended by this act,
[21a-420bbb] 21a-420bb, as amended by this act, or [21a-420ccc] 21a-
420cc, as amended by this act, and shall review and approve or deny in
writing such equity joint venture prior to such equity joint venture being
licensed under section 21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as
amended by this act, 21a-420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as
amended by this act, [21a-420bbb] 21a-420bb, as amended by this act, or
[21a-420ccc] 21a-420cc, as amended by this act. The council shall not
approve any equity joint venture applicant which shares with an equity
joint venture any individual owner who meets the criteria established
in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision (51) of section 21a-420, as
amended by this act, other than an individual owner in their capacity as
a backer licensed under section 21a-420o.
(2) No contract entered into or renewed on or after the effective date
of this section shall provide that any change may be made in the
ownership or control of any equity joint venture created under section
21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as amended by this act, 21a-
420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as amended by this act, 21a-
420bb, as amended by this act, or 21a-420cc, as amended by this act, that
would cause such equity joint venture not to be controlled, and at least
fifty per cent owned, by an individual who meets the criteria established
in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision (51) of section 21a-420, as
Public Act No. 26-8 95 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
amended by this act, unless:
(A) At least five years have elapsed since a final license was issued to
the equity joint venture;
(B) At least ninety days before the effective date of such change, the
equity joint venture (i) submits a written notice to the council, in a form
and manner prescribed by the council, disclosing that the equity joint
venture intends to make such change, and (ii) sends a written notice to
the individual who meets the criteria established in subparagraphs (A)
and (B) of subdivision (51) of section 21a-420, as amended by this act,
disclosing that such individual may, not later than sixty days before the
effective date of such change, submit a written request to the council, in
a form and manner prescribed by the council, that the council perform
an optional nonfinancial review of such change pursuant to
subparagraph (C) of this subdivision;
(C) If the council receives a written request submitted under
subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision, the council, not later than thirty
days before the effective date of such change, (i) completes the optional
nonfinancial review to determine (I) whether the individual described
in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision has retained legal counsel to
advise such individual regarding such change, understands the
structure and implications of such change, understands the financial
terms of such change, has engaged with such individual's business
partners, if any, to ensure that such change is appropriate and consents
to such change free of any coercion or undue pressure, and (II) whether
such change complies with the organizational documents of the equity
joint venture, and (ii) sends a written notice to the individual described
in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision and the equity joint venture,
in a form and manner prescribed by the council, disclosing the results
of such optional nonfinancial review; and
(D) The person acquiring ownership or control of the equity joint
Public Act No. 26-8 96 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
venture from the individual described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this
subdivision has paid to the council, in a form and manner prescribed by
the council, (i) a nonrefundable transaction processing fee in the amount
of eight thousand dollars, which the council shall deposit in the social
equity and innovation account established under section 21a-420f, and
(ii) the outstanding balance of all loans issued to the equity joint venture,
or the individual described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision,
as part of the revolving loan program established pursuant to section
21a-421i.
(3) Nothing in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be construed to
authorize the council to delay or reject any change described in said
subdivision due to the results of an optional nonfinancial review
performed pursuant to subparagraph (C) of said subdivision. Any
change made in violation of subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
void and of no effect.
(l) The Social Equity Council shall, upon receipt of funds from
producers in accordance with subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of section
21a-420l, as amended by this act, develop a program to assist social
equity applicants to open not more than two micro-cultivator
establishment businesses in total. Producers shall provide mentorship
to such social equity applicants. The council shall, with the department,
determine a system to select social equity applicants to participate in
such program without participating in a lottery or request for proposals.
(m) (1) The Social Equity Council shall review and either approve or
deny, in writing, any social equity plan submitted by a cannabis
establishment as part of the cannabis establishment's final license
application. The council shall approve or deny such social equity plan
not later than thirty days after such social equity plan is submitted to
the council. If the council denies any such social equity plan, the
applicant may revise and resubmit such social equity plan without
prejudice.
Public Act No. 26-8 97 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(2) (A) Each licensed cannabis establishment shall (i) maintain an
active social equity plan at all times while such cannabis establishment
is in operation, and (ii) not later than March [1, 2026, and annually
thereafter] first, annually, submit to the council a report disclosing the
impact such social equity plan had on the disproportionately impacted
area in which such cannabis establishment is located during the
preceding calendar year.
(B) The council shall review each report submitted pursuant to
subparagraph (A)(ii) of this subdivision and may, not later than sixty
days after completing such review, request that the licensed cannabis
establishment that submitted such report revise such cannabis
establishment's social equity plan to ensure that such social equity plan
furthers the principles of equity.
(3) Not later than July 1, 2024, the council shall update the criteria for
social equity plans described in subdivision (5) of subsection (h) of this
section to include a specific, points-based rubric to evaluate social equity
plans.
(n) The Social Equity Council shall approve the amounts, grantees
and purposes of any grants made by the council from the social equity
and innovation account or the Cannabis Social Equity and Innovation
Fund, established under section 21a-420f, and any contract executed by
and between the council and a grant maker shall require that the
amounts, grantees and purposes of any subgrants made by such grant
maker shall be approved by the council.
(o) Not later than [July 1, 2024, and quarterly thereafter] the first days
of January, April, July and October for the preceding calendar quarter,
the Social Equity Council shall prepare and submit a quarterly report,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the Governor, the
speaker of the House of Representatives, the president pro tempore of
the Senate, the majority leader of the House of Representatives, the
Public Act No. 26-8 98 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
majority leader of the Senate, the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, the minority leader of the Senate, [and] the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to appropriations and consumer protection and the
chairperson of the Black and Puerto Rican Caucus of the General
Assembly. The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The fiscal-year-to-date expenditures of the council, which
expenditures shall disclose, at a minimum: (A) All expenditures made
for personal services and the fringe benefit costs associated therewith;
(B) all expenditures made for consultants retained for the purpose of
reviewing applications for social equity applicant status; (C) all
expenditures made to provide businesses with access to capital and the
number of businesses that received access to such capital; (D) all
expenditures made to provide technical assistance for the start-up and
operation of businesses and the number of businesses that received such
assistance; (E) all expenditures made to fund workforce education, the
number of persons served by the workforce education programs
supported by such expenditures and the number of persons successfully
placed in relevant professional roles after completing such workforce
education programs; (F) all expenditures made to fund community
investment grants, the amounts, grantees and purposes of such grants
and, if any of such grants were made to a grant maker, the amounts,
grantees and purposes of any subgrants made by such grant maker; (G)
all expenditures made for promotional or branding items and which
promotional or branding items were purchased; (H) all expenditures
made for advertising or marketing campaigns; (I) all expenditures made
to advertising or marketing firms; (J) all expenditures made for
sponsorships; (K) all expenditures made for other community outreach;
(L) all expenditures made for travel; and (M) all other expenditures not
described in subparagraphs (A) to (L), inclusive, of this subdivision; and
(2) The status of the council's performance of the council's
Public Act No. 26-8 99 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
responsibilities in the licensing process under RERACA, including, but
not limited to: (A) The number of applications for social equity applicant
status, social equity plans and workforce development plans pending
before the council, categorized into the number of applications, social
equity plans and workforce development plans pending before the
council for (i) less than thirty days, (ii) at least thirty days but less than
sixty days, (iii) at least sixty days but less than ninety days, and (iv) at
least ninety days; (B) the number of applications for social equity
applicant status, social equity plans and workforce development plans
approved during the then current fiscal year, broken down by license
type; and (C) the number of applications for social equity applicant
status, social equity plans and workforce development plans denied
during the then current fiscal year, broken down by license type.
[(p) Not later than July 1, 2024, and monthly thereafter, the executive
director of the council shall prepare and submit a report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the council and the Black and
Puerto Rican Caucus of the General Assembly. The report shall include,
but need not be limited to:
(1) The expenditures the council plans to make during the month
immediately following submission of such report, which expenditures
shall disclose, at a minimum: (A) All expenditures the council plans to
make for consultants retained for the purpose of reviewing applications
for social equity applicant status; (B) all expenditures the council plans
to make to fund community investment grants, the amounts, grantees
and purposes of such grants and, if any of such grants are to be made to
a grant maker, the amounts, grantees and purposes of any subgrants to
be made by such grant maker; (C) all expenditures the council plans to
make for promotional or branding items, for advertising or marketing
campaigns, to advertising or marketing firms and for sponsorships; (D)
all expenditures the council plans to make for community outreach; and
(E) all expenditures the council plans to make for travel; and
Public Act No. 26-8 100 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(2) The status of the council's performance of the council's
responsibilities in the licensing process under RERACA, including, but
not limited to, the following information for the date of such report: (A)
The number of applications for social equity applicant status that are
pending before the council and the date each such application was
submitted, broken down by license type, municipality, assembly district
and senate district; (B) the number of social equity plans that are
pending before the council and the date each such social equity plan was
submitted, broken down by license type; and (C) the number of
workforce development plans that are pending before the council and
the date each such workforce development plan was submitted, broken
down by license type.]
[(q)] (p) Not later than October 1, 2025, the council shall develop and
submit a strategic plan to the Governor and the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and consumer protection. The strategic plan
shall include a framework that outlines the council's goals, planned
actions and priorities for the three-year period beginning October 1,
2025, and ending September 30, 2028.
[(r)] (q) Not later than October 1, 2025, the council shall develop and
adopt an ethical code of conduct for council members and staff.
[(s)] (r) Not later than January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
members of the council and council staff shall complete an ethics
training course focusing on disproportionately impacted areas and the
cannabis industry.
(s) The council shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of subsection (k)
of this section and subsection (a) of section 21a-420g, as amended by this
act. Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172,
inclusive, in order to implement the provisions of subsection (k) of this
Public Act No. 26-8 101 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
section and subsection (a) of section 21a-420g, as amended by this act,
prior to adopting such regulations the council shall, not later than
October 1, 2026, issue policies and procedures to implement the
provisions of subsection (k) of this section and subsection (a) of section
21a-420g, as amended by this act, that shall have the force and effect of
law. The council shall post all policies and procedures on its Internet
web site, and submit such policies and procedures to the Secretary of
the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days
prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy
or procedure shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either the
adoption of such policy or procedure as a final regulation under section
4-172 or October 1, 2027, if such regulations have not been submitted to
the legislative regulation review committee for consideration under
section 4-170. Any violation of such policies and procedures or any
violation of such regulations related to any change in ownership or
control may be referred by the council to the Department of Consumer
Protection for administrative enforcement action, which may result in a
fine of not more than ten million dollars or action against the cannabis
establishment's license.
Sec. 55. Subsections (e) to (s), inclusive, of section 21a-420d of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section 54 of this act,
are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(e) The Social Equity Council may (1) request, and shall receive, from
any state agency such information and assistance as the council may
require to carry out its duties, (2) use such funds as may be available
from federal, state or other sources to carry out its duties, (3) enter into
contracts or agreements to carry out its duties, including, but not limited
to, contracts or agreements with Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated,
constituent units of the state system of higher education, regional
workforce development boards and community development financial
Public Act No. 26-8 102 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
institutions, (4) utilize such voluntary and uncompensated services of
private individuals, state or federal agencies and organizations as may,
from time to time, be offered and needed to carry out its duties, (5)
accept any gift, donation or bequest to carry out its duties, (6) conduct
such investigations as the council may deem necessary to carry out its
duties, provided such investigations concern matters, complaints or
concerns that (A) are brought before the council by individuals who
meet the criteria established in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision
[(51)] (54) of section 21a-420, as amended by this act, and (B) relate to the
protection, enforcement or advancement of equity under this chapter,
(7) hold public hearings, (8) establish such standing committees, as
necessary, to carry out its duties, and (9) adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, as the council may deem
necessary to carry out its duties.
(f) The Social Equity Council shall promote and encourage full
participation in the cannabis industry by persons from communities
that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement.
(g) Not later than forty-five days after June 22, 2021, or at a later date
determined by the Social Equity Council, the council shall establish
criteria for proposals to conduct a study under this section and the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall post on the State
Contracting Portal a request for proposals to conduct a study, and shall
select an independent third party to conduct such study and provide
detailed findings of fact regarding the following matters in the state or
other matters determined by the council:
(1) Historical and present-day social, economic and familial
consequences of cannabis prohibition, the criminalization and
stigmatization of cannabis use and related public policies;
(2) Historical and present-day structures, patterns, causes and
Public Act No. 26-8 103 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
consequences of intentional and unintentional racial discrimination and
racial disparities in the development, application and enforcement of
cannabis prohibition and related public policies;
(3) Foreseeable long-term social, economic and familial consequences
of unremedied past racial discrimination and disparities arising from
past and continued cannabis prohibition, stigmatization and
criminalization;
(4) Existing patterns of racial discrimination and racial disparities in
access to entrepreneurship, employment and other economic benefits
arising in the lawful palliative use cannabis sector as established
pursuant to chapter 420f; and
(5) Any other matters that the council deems relevant and feasible for
study for the purpose of making reasonable and practical
recommendations for the establishment of an equitable and lawful
adult-use cannabis business sector in this state.
(h) Not later than January 1, 2022, the Social Equity Council shall,
taking into account the results of the study conducted in accordance
with subsection (g) of this section, make written recommendations, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the Governor and the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding, consumer
protection and the judiciary regarding legislation to implement the
provisions of this section. The council shall make recommendations
regarding:
(1) Creating programs to ensure that individuals from communities
that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement are provided equal access to licenses for cannabis
establishments;
(2) Specifying additional qualifications for social equity applicants;
Public Act No. 26-8 104 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(3) Providing for expedited or priority license processing for each
license as a retailer, hybrid retailer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product
manufacturer, food and beverage manufacturer, product packager,
transporter and delivery service license for social equity applicants;
(4) Establishing minimum criteria for any cannabis establishment
licensed on or after January 1, 2022, to comply with an approved
workforce development plan to reinvest or provide employment and
training opportunities for individuals in disproportionately impacted
areas;
(5) Establishing criteria for a social equity plan for any cannabis
establishment licensed on or after January 1, 2022, to further the
principles of equity;
(6) Recruiting individuals from communities that have been
disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and enforcement to
enroll in the workforce training program established pursuant to section
21a-421g;
(7) Potential uses for revenue generated under RERACA to further
equity;
(8) Encouraging participation of investors, cannabis establishments
and entrepreneurs in the cannabis business accelerator program
established pursuant to section 21a-421f;
(9) Establishing a process to best ensure that social equity applicants
have access to the capital and training needed to own and operate a
cannabis establishment; and
(10) Developing a vendor list of women-owned and minority-owned
businesses that cannabis establishments may contract with for necessary
services, including, but not limited to, office supplies, information
technology infrastructure and cleaning services.
Public Act No. 26-8 105 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(i) (1) Not later than August 1, 2021, and annually thereafter until July
31, 2023, the Social Equity Council shall use the most recent five-year
United States Census Bureau American Community Survey estimates
or any successor data to determine one or more United States census
tracts in the state that are a disproportionately impacted area and shall
publish a list of such tracts on the council's Internet web site.
(2) Not later than August 1, 2023, the council shall use poverty rate
data from the most recent five-year United States Census Bureau
American Community Survey estimates, population data from the most
recent decennial census and conviction information from databases
managed by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection to identify all United States census tracts in the state that are
disproportionately impacted areas and shall publish a list of such tracts
on the council's Internet web site. In identifying which census tracts in
this state are disproportionately impacted areas and preparing such list,
the council shall:
(A) Not deem any census tract with a poverty rate that is less than the
state-wide poverty rate to be a disproportionately impacted area;
(B) After eliminating the census tracts described in subparagraph (A)
of this subdivision, rank the remaining census tracts in order from the
census tract with the greatest historical conviction rate for drug-related
offenses to the census tract with the lowest historical conviction rate for
drug-related offenses; and
(C) Include census tracts in the order of rank described in
subparagraph (B) of this subdivision until including the next census
tract would cause the total population of all included census tracts to
exceed twenty-five per cent of the state's population.
(j) After developing criteria for workforce development plans as
described in subdivision (4) of subsection (h) of this section, the Social
Public Act No. 26-8 106 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Equity Council shall review and approve or deny in writing any such
plan submitted by an applicant for a final license. If the Social Equity
Council does not approve a workforce development plan for a cannabis
establishment on or before July 1, 2025, the cannabis establishment shall
submit a workforce development plan to the council not later than
October 1, 2025, or sixty days prior to the next renewal date for such
cannabis establishment's license, whichever is earlier. Not later than
sixty days after the cannabis establishment submits the workforce
development plan to the council, the council shall send notice to the
cannabis establishment disclosing whether such workforce
development plan has been approved, rejected or requires modification.
(k) (1) The Social Equity Council shall develop criteria for evaluating
the ownership and control of any equity joint venture created under
section 21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as amended by this
act, 21a-420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as amended by this act,
21a-420bb, as amended by this act, or 21a-420cc, as amended by this act,
and shall review and approve or deny in writing such equity joint
venture prior to such equity joint venture being licensed under section
21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as amended by this act, 21a-
420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as amended by this act, 21a-
420bb, as amended by this act, or 21a-420cc, as amended by this act. The
council shall not approve any equity joint venture applicant which
shares with an equity joint venture any individual owner who meets the
criteria established in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision [(51)]
(54) of section 21a-420, as amended by this act, other than an individual
owner in their capacity as a backer licensed under section 21a-420o.
(2) No contract entered into or renewed on or after the effective date
of this section shall provide that any change may be made in the
ownership or control of any equity joint venture created under section
21a-420j, as amended by this act, 21a-420m, as amended by this act, 21a-
420u, as amended by this act, 21a-420aa, as amended by this act, 21a-
Public Act No. 26-8 107 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
420bb, as amended by this act, or 21a-420cc, as amended by this act, that
would cause such equity joint venture not to be controlled, and at least
fifty per cent owned, by an individual who meets the criteria established
in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision [(51)] (54) of section 21a-
420, as amended by this act, unless:
(A) At least five years have elapsed since a final license was issued to
the equity joint venture;
(B) At least ninety days before the effective date of such change, the
equity joint venture (i) submits a written notice to the council, in a form
and manner prescribed by the council, disclosing that the equity joint
venture intends to make such change, and (ii) sends a written notice to
the individual who meets the criteria established in subparagraphs (A)
and (B) of subdivision [(51)] (54) of section 21a-420, as amended by this
act, disclosing that such individual may, not later than sixty days before
the effective date of such change, submit a written request to the council,
in a form and manner prescribed by the council, that the council perform
an optional nonfinancial review of such change pursuant to
subparagraph (C) of this subdivision;
(C) If the council receives a written request submitted under
subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision, the council, not later than thirty
days before the effective date of such change, (i) completes the optional
nonfinancial review to determine (I) whether the individual described
in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision has retained legal counsel to
advise such individual regarding such change, understands the
structure and implications of such change, understands the financial
terms of such change, has engaged with such individual's business
partners, if any, to ensure that such change is appropriate and consents
to such change free of any coercion or undue pressure, and (II) whether
such change complies with the organizational documents of the equity
joint venture, and (ii) sends a written notice to the individual described
in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision and the equity joint venture,
Public Act No. 26-8 108 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
in a form and manner prescribed by the council, disclosing the results
of such optional nonfinancial review; and
(D) The person acquiring ownership or control of the equity joint
venture from the individual described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this
subdivision has paid to the council, in a form and manner prescribed by
the council, (i) a nonrefundable transaction processing fee in the amount
of eight thousand dollars, which the council shall deposit in the social
equity and innovation account established under section 21a-420f, and
(ii) the outstanding balance of all loans issued to the equity joint venture,
or the individual described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision,
as part of the revolving loan program established pursuant to section
21a-421i.
(3) Nothing in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be construed to
authorize the council to delay or reject any change described in said
subdivision due to the results of an optional nonfinancial review
performed pursuant to subparagraph (C) of said subdivision. Any
change made in violation of subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
void and of no effect.
(l) The Social Equity Council shall, upon receipt of funds from
producers in accordance with subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of section
21a-420l, as amended by this act, develop a program to assist social
equity applicants to open not more than two micro-cultivator
establishment businesses in total. Producers shall provide mentorship
to such social equity applicants. The council shall, with the department,
determine a system to select social equity applicants to participate in
such program without participating in a lottery or request for proposals.
(m) (1) The Social Equity Council shall review and either approve or
deny, in writing, any social equity plan submitted by a cannabis
establishment as part of the cannabis establishment's final license
application. The council shall approve or deny such social equity plan
Public Act No. 26-8 109 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
not later than thirty days after such social equity plan is submitted to
the council. If the council denies any such social equity plan, the
applicant may revise and resubmit such social equity plan without
prejudice.
(2) (A) Each licensed cannabis establishment shall (i) maintain an
active social equity plan at all times while such cannabis establishment
is in operation, and (ii) not later than March first, annually, submit to
the council a report disclosing the impact such social equity plan had on
the disproportionately impacted area in which such cannabis
establishment is located during the preceding calendar year.
(B) The council shall review each report submitted pursuant to
subparagraph (A)(ii) of this subdivision and may, not later than sixty
days after completing such review, request that the licensed cannabis
establishment that submitted such report revise such cannabis
establishment's social equity plan to ensure that such social equity plan
furthers the principles of equity.
(3) Not later than July 1, 2024, the council shall update the criteria for
social equity plans described in subdivision (5) of subsection (h) of this
section to include a specific, points-based rubric to evaluate social equity
plans.
(n) The Social Equity Council shall approve the amounts, grantees
and purposes of any grants made by the council from the social equity
and innovation account or the Cannabis Social Equity and Innovation
Fund, established under section 21a-420f, and any contract executed by
and between the council and a grant maker shall require that the
amounts, grantees and purposes of any subgrants made by such grant
maker shall be approved by the council.
(o) Not later than the first days of January, April, July and October
for the preceding calendar quarter, the Social Equity Council shall
Public Act No. 26-8 110 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
prepare and submit a quarterly report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, to the Governor, the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the president pro tempore of the Senate, the majority
leader of the House of Representatives, the majority leader of the Senate,
the minority leader of the House of Representatives, the minority leader
of the Senate, the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and consumer
protection and the chairperson of the Black and Puerto Rican Caucus of
the General Assembly. The report shall include, but need not be limited
to:
(1) The fiscal-year-to-date expenditures of the council, which
expenditures shall disclose, at a minimum: (A) All expenditures made
for personal services and the fringe benefit costs associated therewith;
(B) all expenditures made for consultants retained for the purpose of
reviewing applications for social equity applicant status; (C) all
expenditures made to provide businesses with access to capital and the
number of businesses that received access to such capital; (D) all
expenditures made to provide technical assistance for the start-up and
operation of businesses and the number of businesses that received such
assistance; (E) all expenditures made to fund workforce education, the
number of persons served by the workforce education programs
supported by such expenditures and the number of persons successfully
placed in relevant professional roles after completing such workforce
education programs; (F) all expenditures made to fund community
investment grants, the amounts, grantees and purposes of such grants
and, if any of such grants were made to a grant maker, the amounts,
grantees and purposes of any subgrants made by such grant maker; (G)
all expenditures made for promotional or branding items and which
promotional or branding items were purchased; (H) all expenditures
made for advertising or marketing campaigns; (I) all expenditures made
to advertising or marketing firms; (J) all expenditures made for
sponsorships; (K) all expenditures made for other community outreach;
Public Act No. 26-8 111 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(L) all expenditures made for travel; and (M) all other expenditures not
described in subparagraphs (A) to (L), inclusive, of this subdivision; and
(2) The status of the council's performance of the council's
responsibilities in the licensing process under RERACA, including, but
not limited to: (A) The number of applications for social equity applicant
status, social equity plans and workforce development plans pending
before the council, categorized into the number of applications, social
equity plans and workforce development plans pending before the
council for (i) less than thirty days, (ii) at least thirty days but less than
sixty days, (iii) at least sixty days but less than ninety days, and (iv) at
least ninety days; (B) the number of applications for social equity
applicant status, social equity plans and workforce development plans
approved during the then current fiscal year, broken down by license
type; and (C) the number of applications for social equity applicant
status, social equity plans and workforce development plans denied
during the then current fiscal year, broken down by license type.
(p) Not later than October 1, 2025, the council shall develop and
submit a strategic plan to the Governor and the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and consumer protection. The strategic plan
shall include a framework that outlines the council's goals, planned
actions and priorities for the three-year period beginning October 1,
2025, and ending September 30, 2028.
(q) Not later than October 1, 2025, the council shall develop and adopt
an ethical code of conduct for council members and staff.
(r) Not later than January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
members of the council and council staff shall complete an ethics
training course focusing on disproportionately impacted areas and the
cannabis industry.
Public Act No. 26-8 112 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(s) The council shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of subsection (k)
of this section and subsection (a) of section 21a-420g, as amended by this
act. Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172,
inclusive, in order to implement the provisions of subsection (k) of this
section and subsection (a) of section 21a-420g, as amended by this act,
prior to adopting such regulations the council shall, not later than
October 1, 2026, issue policies and procedures to implement the
provisions of subsection (k) of this section and subsection (a) of section
21a-420g, as amended by this act, that shall have the force and effect of
law. The council shall post all policies and procedures on its Internet
web site, and submit such policies and procedures to the Secretary of
the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days
prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy
or procedure shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either the
adoption of such policy or procedure as a final regulation under section
4-172 or October 1, 2027, if such regulations have not been submitted to
the legislative regulation review committee for consideration under
section 4-170. Any violation of such policies and procedures or any
violation of such regulations related to any change in ownership or
control may be referred by the council to the Department of Consumer
Protection for administrative enforcement action, which may result in a
fine of not more than ten million dollars or action against the cannabis
establishment's license.
Sec. 56. Subsection (a) of section 21a-420g of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The Social Equity Council shall review the ownership information
and any other information necessary to confirm that an applicant
qualifies as a social equity applicant for all cannabis establishment
license type applications submitted to the department and designated
Public Act No. 26-8 113 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
by the applicant as a social equity applicant. The Social Equity Council
shall prescribe the documentation necessary for applicants to submit to
establish that the ownership, residency and income requirements for
social equity applicants are met. On or before September 1, 2021, the
Social Equity Council shall post such necessary documentation
requirements on its Internet web site to inform applicants of such
requirements prior to the start of the application period. Except as
provided in the regulations adopted by the council pursuant to section
21a-420h, as amended by this act, no change shall be made in the
ownership or control of a social equity applicant that has been approved
by the council during the period of provisional licensure and for three
years following issuance of a final license.
Sec. 57. Subsection (g) of section 21a-420g of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(g) (1) No additional backers may be added to a cannabis
establishment application between the time of lottery entry, or any
initial application for a license, and when a final license is awarded to
the cannabis establishment, except: [, if]
(A) If a backer of an applicant or provisional licensee dies, the
applicant or provisional licensee may apply to the commissioner, in a
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, to replace the
deceased backer, provided if such applicant or provisional licensee is a
social equity applicant, the Social Equity Council shall review
ownership to ensure such replacement would not [cause the applicant
to no longer qualify] disqualify such applicant or provisional licensee as
a social equity applicant; and
(B) An applicant or provisional licensee that is a social equity
applicant may apply to the commissioner, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, for a one-time replacement of an
Public Act No. 26-8 114 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
original backer, provided the original backer to be replaced is not an
individual who meets the criteria of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of
subdivision (54) of section 21a-420, as amended by this act.
(2) A backer may be removed from a cannabis establishment
application selected through the general lottery at any time upon notice
to the department.
Sec. 58. Section 21a-420h of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The Social Equity Council shall adopt regulations, in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 54, to prevent the sale or change in ownership
or control of a cannabis establishment license awarded to a social equity
applicant to someone other than another qualifying social equity
applicant during the period of provisional licensure, and for three years
following the issuance of a final license, unless the backer of such
licensee has died or has a condition, including, but not limited to, a
physical illness or loss of skill or deterioration due to the aging process,
emotional disorder or mental illness that would interfere with the
backer's ability to operate. If the council approves any sale or change in
ownership or control of a cannabis establishment license awarded to a
social equity applicant during the three-year period following issuance
of a final license, and such sale or change in ownership or control is
made to anyone other than another qualifying social equity applicant,
the cannabis establishment licensee shall be treated as a cannabis
establishment licensee without social equity status beginning on the
date of such approval and such cannabis licensee shall no longer be
eligible to pay a reduced license renewal fee. Notwithstanding the
requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to effectuate
this section, prior to adopting such regulations and not later than
October 1, 2021, the council shall issue policies and procedures to
implement the provisions of this section that shall have the force and
Public Act No. 26-8 115 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
effect of law. The council shall post all policies and procedures on its
Internet web site and submit such policies and procedures to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to consumer protection and the Secretary of the State
for posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the
effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policy or procedure
shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either the adoption of the
policy or procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or [sixty-
three months from July 1, 2021] July 1, 2028. Any violation of such
policies and procedures or any violation of such regulations related to
the sale or change in ownership may be referred by the Social Equity
Council to the department for administrative enforcement action, which
may result in a fine of not more than ten million dollars or action against
the establishment's license.
Sec. 59. Subsection (d) of section 21a-420j of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection or
subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of section 21a-420d, as amended by this
act, a cultivator licensed under section 21a-420o, including the backer of
such cultivator, shall not increase its ownership in an equity joint
venture in excess of fifty per cent during the seven-year period after a
license is issued by the department under this section.
(2) A cultivator licensed under section 21a-420o who satisfies the
criteria established in subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of subsection
(b) of section 21a-420o, including the backer of such cultivator, shall not,
except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of section 21a-
420d, as amended by this act, increase its ownership in an equity joint
venture in excess of fifty per cent during the seven-year period
beginning on the date on which a final license is issued by the
department under subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 21a-420o.
Public Act No. 26-8 116 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Sec. 60. Subsection (b) of section 21a-420l of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) To obtain approval from the commissioner to engage in expanded
activity as described in subsection (a) of this section, a producer shall
submit (1) a complete license expansion application on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, (2) a medical cannabis preservation
plan, to ensure against supply shortages of medical [marijuana]
cannabis products, which shall be approved or denied at the
commissioner's discretion, (3) payment of a conversion fee of three
million dollars, provided, if the producer participates in at least two
approved equity joint ventures as described in section 21a-420m, as
amended by this act, such fee shall be one million five hundred
thousand dollars, (4) a workforce development plan in accordance with
requirements developed by the Social Equity Council, that has been
reviewed and approved by the Social Equity Council in accordance with
section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, and (5) (A) a contribution of
five hundred thousand dollars to the Social Equity Council for the
program established by the council in accordance with subsection (l) of
section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, or (B) evidence of an
agreement with a social equity partner pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
Sec. 61. Subsection (b) of section 21a-420m of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) The equity joint venture shall be in any cannabis establishment
licensed business, other than a cultivator license, provided such equity
joint venture is at least fifty per cent owned and controlled by an
individual or individuals who meet, or the equity joint venture
applicant is an individual who meets, the criteria established in
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision [(51)] (54) of section 21a-420,
Public Act No. 26-8 117 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
as amended by this act.
Sec. 62. Subsection (e) of section 21a-420m of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(e) [A] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of
section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, a producer, including the
backer of such producer, shall not increase its ownership in an equity
joint venture in excess of fifty per cent during the seven-year period after
a license is issued by the department under this section.
Sec. 63. Subsection (d) of section 21a-420n of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) A cultivator may sell, transfer or transport its cannabis to a
cannabis establishment, research program or cannabis testing
laboratory utilizing its own employees or a transporter. A cultivator
shall not sell, transfer or deliver to consumers, qualifying patients, [or]
qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state
caregivers, directly or through a delivery service.
Sec. 64. Subsections (f) and (g) of section 21a-420p of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) (1) A micro-cultivator may sell cannabis seedlings cultivated at its
micro-cultivator establishment directly to consumers, excluding
qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers
and qualifying out-of-state caregivers, solely through delivery by either
utilizing a delivery service or its own employees, subject to the
requirements of subsection (c) of section 21a-420c, as amended by this
act. No cannabis establishment other than a micro-cultivator shall sell
cannabis seedlings to consumers, and no cannabis establishment other
Public Act No. 26-8 118 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
than a delivery service or a micro-cultivator utilizing its own employees
shall deliver cannabis seedlings cultivated and sold by a micro-
cultivator to consumers.
(2) No micro-cultivator shall sell a cannabis seedling to a consumer
unless:
(A) The micro-cultivator cultivated the cannabis seedling in this state
from seed or clone;
(B) The cannabis seedling (i) has a standing height of not more than
six inches measured from the base of the stem to the tallest point of the
plant, (ii) does not contain any bud or flower, and (iii) has been tested
for pesticides and heavy metals in accordance with the laboratory
testing standards established in the policies and procedures issued, and
final regulations adopted, by the commissioner pursuant to section 21a-
421j, as amended by this act; and
(C) A label or informational tag is affixed to the cannabis seedling
disclosing the following in legible English, black lettering, Times New
Roman font, flat regular typeface, on a contrasting background and in
uniform size of not less than one-tenth of one inch, based on a capital
letter "K":
(i) The name of the micro-cultivator;
(ii) A product description for the cannabis seedling;
(iii) One of the following chemotypes anticipated after flowering: (I)
"High THC, Low CBD"; (II) "Low THC, High CBD"; or (III) "50/50 THC
and CBD";
(iv) The results of the testing required under subparagraph (B)(iii) of
this subdivision;
(v) Directions for optimal care of the cannabis seedling;
Public Act No. 26-8 119 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(vi) Unobscured symbols, in a size of not less than one-half inch by
one-half inch and in a format approved by the commissioner, which
symbols shall indicate that the cannabis seedling contains THC and is
not legal or safe for individuals younger than twenty-one years of age;
and
(vii) A unique identifier generated by a cannabis analytic tracking
system maintained by the department and used to track cannabis under
the policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted, by
the commissioner pursuant to section 21a-421j, as amended by this act.
(3) Notwithstanding section 21a-421j, as amended by this act, no
cannabis seedling shall be required to be sold in child-resistant
packaging.
(4) No micro-cultivator shall knowingly sell more than three cannabis
seedlings to a consumer in any six-month period.
(5) No micro-cultivator shall accept any returned cannabis seedling.
(g) (1) A micro-cultivator that has obtained a final license from the
department pursuant to this section and maintains an exclusively
indoor grow facility may submit an application to the department, in a
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, for a retailer or
hybrid retailer endorsement to such final license under this subsection.
Such endorsement, if issued, shall authorize the micro-cultivator to
operate a retailer or hybrid retailer pursuant to this subsection. An
applicant micro-cultivator shall submit a complete application for an
endorsement under this subsection, along with the endorsement
application fee, to the department not later than one year after the date
on which the applicant micro-cultivator obtained a final micro-
cultivator license from the department pursuant to this section or June
30, 2026, whichever is later. The department shall not accept an
application submitted pursuant to this subsection after such time period
Public Act No. 26-8 120 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
has expired. The amount of the application fee for an endorsement
under this subsection shall be the same as the fee imposed to receive a
final retailer license or a final hybrid retailer license set forth in
subsections (c) and (d) of section 21a-420e. All application fees for an
initial endorsement under this subsection shall be deposited in the
consumer protection enforcement account established in section 21a-8a.
The annual renewal fee for an endorsement issued under this subsection
shall be the same as the renewal fee for a final retailer license or a final
hybrid retailer license set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of section 21a-
420e.
(2) The department shall issue an endorsement to a micro-cultivator
pursuant to this subsection if the micro-cultivator:
(A) Submits a timely and complete endorsement application to the
department, in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner;
(B) Attests that the retailer or hybrid retailer created pursuant to the
endorsement shall be operated in compliance with all requirements
established in this chapter for a licensed retailer or a licensed hybrid
retailer; and
(C) Acknowledges and attests that such micro-cultivator shall not
engage in any outdoor cultivation of cannabis.
(3) Each micro-cultivator that is issued an endorsement under this
subsection shall have twenty-four months from the date such
endorsement is issued to (A) satisfy the requirements established in
section 21a-420g, as amended by this act, for a retailer or hybrid retailer
that has been issued a final license, and (B) seek and obtain a written
statement from the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, confirming that such micro-cultivator satisfies such
requirements and is authorized to engage in the activities of a retailer or
hybrid retailer.
Public Act No. 26-8 121 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(4) An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection shall expire
and shall not be eligible for reapplication or renewal if the micro-
cultivator (A) fails to satisfy the requirements established in subdivision
(3) of this subsection, or (B) allows such endorsement to lapse.
(5) The facility of a retailer or hybrid retailer established pursuant to
an endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection shall be located (A)
on the same premises as the micro-cultivator, [or] (B) on a tract of land
or parcel that abuts [such] the premises of the micro-cultivator or is
located within one hundred feet of such premises measured from the
point on such tract of land or parcel that is closest to such premises, or
(C) on a tract of land or parcel that abuts the premises of the micro-
cultivator or is located within the same disproportionately impacted
area as such premises.
(6) Upon receipt of a written statement from the department as set
forth in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (3) of this subsection, the
micro-cultivator shall:
(A) (i) In the case of a retailer endorsement, be authorized to sell
cannabis cultivated indoors by the micro-cultivator to consumers, or (ii)
in the case of a hybrid retailer endorsement, be authorized to sell (I)
cannabis cultivated indoors by the micro-cultivator to consumers, and
(II) medical [marijuana] cannabis products to qualifying patients, [and]
qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state
caregivers;
(B) Acknowledge and agree that such micro-cultivator is not eligible
to expand to a cultivator license, as provided in this section;
(C) Maintain the retailer's or hybrid-retailer's activities and facility in
accordance with the requirements established in this chapter, chapter
420f and the regulations, policies and procedures adopted or issued
pursuant to said chapters, as applicable; and
Public Act No. 26-8 122 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(D) Acknowledge and agree that in the event that an administrative
agency or court of competent jurisdiction issues a suspension,
revocation, cease and desist order or other order halting the micro-
cultivator's operations, the micro-cultivator shall cease all public retailer
or hybrid-retailer activities associated with the retailer or hybrid retailer
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection.
(7) A micro-cultivator that is issued an endorsement under this
subsection may (A) in the case of a retailer endorsement, sell cannabis
cultivated by the micro-cultivator directly to consumers by utilizing a
delivery service or its own employees, subject to the provisions of
subsection (c) of section 21a-420c, as amended by this act, provided such
micro-cultivator shall exclusively sell cannabis cultivated by such
micro-cultivator, and (B) in the case of a hybrid retailer endorsement, (i)
sell medical [marijuana] cannabis products directly to qualifying
patients and caregivers by utilizing a delivery service, subject to the
provisions of subsection (c) of section 21a-420c, as amended by this act,
(ii) sell medical cannabis products directly to qualifying out-of-state
patients and qualifying out-of-state caregivers, and (iii) sell cannabis
cultivated by such micro-cultivator directly to consumers, by utilizing a
delivery service or its own employees, subject to the provisions of
subsection (c) of section 21a-420c, as amended by this act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a micro-cultivator
with an active endorsement issued under this subsection shall not
exceed twenty-five thousand square feet of grow space and shall not be
eligible to convert to a cultivator unless the micro-cultivator
permanently surrenders such endorsement and ceases all retailer and
hybrid retailer activities at the cannabis establishment.
(9) An endorsement issued under this subsection shall not impact any
right a micro-cultivator may have to create an equity joint venture.
Sec. 65. Section 21a-420q of the 2026 supplement to the general
Public Act No. 26-8 123 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to establish the maximum grow space
permitted by a cultivator and micro-cultivator. In adopting such
regulations, the commissioner shall seek to ensure an adequate supply
of cannabis for the market. Notwithstanding the requirements of
sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to effectuate this section, prior
to adopting such regulations, the commissioner shall issue policies and
procedures to implement the provisions of this section that shall have
the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all policies and
procedures on the department's Internet web site and submit such
policies and procedures to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to consumer protection
and the Secretary of the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at
least fifteen days prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure.
Any such policy or procedure shall no longer be effective upon the
earlier of either the adoption of the policy or procedure as a final
regulation under section 4-172 or [sixty-three months from July 1, 2021]
July 1, 2028.
Sec. 66. Section 21a-420r of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [On and after July 1, 2021, the] The department may issue or renew
a license for a person to be a retailer. No person may act as a retailer or
represent that such person is a retailer unless such person has obtained
a license from the department pursuant to this section.
(b) A retailer may obtain cannabis from a cultivator, micro-cultivator,
producer, product packager, food and beverage manufacturer, product
manufacturer or transporter or an undeliverable return from a delivery
Public Act No. 26-8 124 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
service. A retailer may sell, transport or transfer cannabis or cannabis
products to a cannabis establishment, cannabis testing laboratory or
research program. A retailer may sell cannabis to a consumer or research
program. A retailer may not conduct sales of medical [marijuana]
cannabis products, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section,
nor offer discounts or other inducements to qualifying patients, [or]
qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state
caregivers. A retailer shall not gift or transfer cannabis at no cost to a
consumer as part of a commercial transaction.
(c) Retailers shall maintain a secure location, in a manner approved
by the commissioner, at the licensee's premises where cannabis that is
unable to be delivered by an employee or delivery service may be
returned to the retailer. Such secure cannabis return location shall meet
specifications set forth by the commissioner and published on the
department's Internet web site or included in regulations adopted by
the department.
(d) A retailer may deliver cannabis through a delivery service or by
utilizing its own employees, subject to the provisions of subsection (c)
of section 21a-420c, as amended by this act.
(e) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter and chapter
420f, and except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a
retailer may sell the following palliative use cannabis products to
consumers:
(A) Cannabis concentrates;
(B) Topical treatments, excluding transdermal patches;
(C) Creams;
(D) Tablets and capsules;
Public Act No. 26-8 125 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(E) Rosins; and
(F) Products intended for sublingual absorption.
(2) Producers, cultivators, micro-cultivators, product packagers,
product manufacturers and food and beverage manufacturers shall
reserve the palliative use cannabis products set forth in subdivision (1)
of this subsection for sale exclusively to dispensary facilities and hybrid
retailers for at least fourteen days after such palliative use cannabis
products are released to the market.
(3) The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to allow sales of additional palliative use cannabis products
to consumers in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
[(e)] (f) Manufacturer hemp products, as defined in section 22-61l, as
amended by this act, may be sold within a retailer facility, provided such
manufacturer hemp products are:
(1) Stored separately from cannabis and cannabis products;
(2) Separated, by a physical separation, from cannabis and cannabis
products in any display area;
(3) Displayed with signage approved by the department;
(4) Tested by a laboratory that meets the standards for accreditation
and testing, and sampling methods, set forth for an independent testing
laboratory in section 22-61m, as amended by this act, which laboratory
may be located outside of this state;
(5) Clearly labeled to distinguish the product as (A) a manufacturer
hemp product, (B) subject to different testing standards than cannabis,
and (C) not cannabis or a cannabis product; and
Public Act No. 26-8 126 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(6) Sold in accordance with this chapter, chapter 424 and any
regulations adopted pursuant to said chapters.
(g) No retailer shall retain any personal data the retailer obtains from
a consumer for the purposes of age verification for longer than twenty-
four hours without the consumer's express written consent.
Sec. 67. Subsections (c) to (g), inclusive, of section 21a-420s of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(c) In addition to conducting general retail sales, a hybrid retailer may
sell cannabis and medical marijuana products to qualifying patients and
caregivers. Any cannabis or medical marijuana products sold to
qualifying patients and caregivers shall be [dispensed by a licensed
pharmacist and shall be] recorded in the electronic prescription drug
monitoring program, established pursuant to section 21a-254, in real-
time or immediately upon completion of the transaction, unless not
reasonably feasible for a specific transaction, but in no case longer than
one hour after completion of the transaction. Only a licensed pharmacist
or dispensary technician under the direction of a licensed pharmacist
may upload [or access data in the prescription drug monitoring] data to
such program, except such upload may be accomplished by way of an
automated upload from the hybrid retailer's point-of-sale system. A
licensed pharmacist shall conduct a daily audit of the data uploaded to
such program pursuant to this subsection. All other authorized
activities of the hybrid retailer, including, but not limited to, all such
activities performed in connection with the sale, handling or
management of cannabis or medical marijuana products, may be
performed by a licensed pharmacist, dispensary technician or other
registered employee of the hybrid retailer.
(d) (1) A hybrid retailer shall [maintain] ensure that a licensed
pharmacist [on premises for at least eight consecutive hours per
Public Act No. 26-8 127 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
calendar week] is available, either in-person or remotely, when the
hybrid [retail] retailer location is open to the public or to qualifying
patients and caregivers. [At all times while a hybrid retailer location is
open to the public and a licensed pharmacist is not physically present
on premises and available for qualifying patient and caregiver
consultations, the] The hybrid retailer shall ensure that a licensed
pharmacist is readily available to [(A)] provide telehealth consultations
for qualifying patients and caregivers [, and (B) conduct remote order
entry verification in accordance with regulations adopted by the
commissioner pursuant to section 20-576, which remote order entry
verification shall only be conducted by a licensed pharmacist in
compliance with all remote order entry verification requirements
established in regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to
section 20-576] and, upon request by qualifying patients or caregivers,
in-person consultations for qualifying patients or caregivers. Nothing in
this subdivision shall be construed to require a hybrid retailer to
maintain a licensed pharmacist at the hybrid retailer location for more
than thirty-five hours per week either in-person or remotely.
(2) A hybrid retailer that offers telehealth consultations with a
licensed pharmacist shall (A) [employ such pharmacist for at least
twenty hours per calendar week, (B)] maintain technology that is
capable of facilitating such telehealth consultations, and [(C)] (B) make
such telehealth consultations readily available and accessible to
qualifying patients and caregivers, including, but not limited to, by
telephone from a remote location outside of the hybrid retailer location
and from the private consultation space required under subsection (e)
of this section.
(3) Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously post and maintain a sign
at the main entrance of the hybrid retailer location, which sign shall (A)
be at least twelve inches in height and eighteen inches in width, (B)
incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and (C)
Public Act No. 26-8 128 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
state the name of the licensed pharmacist who is available for qualifying
patient and caregiver consultations either in-person or through
telehealth.
(4) Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously post and maintain a sign
at each register or comparable point of sale within the hybrid retailer
location, and on any Internet web site maintained by such hybrid
retailer, which sign shall (A) be at least eight inches in height and ten
inches in width, (B) incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear
and legible, and (C) state "Pharmacist available for consultation" in a
clear and legible manner.
[(5) Each licensed pharmacist who consults with qualifying patients
or caregivers shall annually complete not less than five contact hours of
continuing professional education, as set forth in section 20-600, related
to the cannabis industry, the pharmacy laws of this state or the
treatment of debilitating medical conditions, as defined in section 21a-
408. Such contact hours shall be included in, and not be in addition to,
the fifteen contact hours required under section 20-600.]
(5) No registered employee of a hybrid retailer shall sell any cannabis
or medical marijuana product to a qualifying patient or caregiver, unless
such registered employee has completed at least (A) one hour of
education concerning the types, availability, dosage and methods of
administration of cannabis products, (B) one hour of education
concerning professional ethics, (C) one hour of education concerning
state and federal laws and regulations concerning patient privacy, and
(D) one hour of education concerning developments in the use of
medical marijuana products.
(e) The hybrid retailer location shall include a private consultation
space for pharmacists to meet with qualifying patients and caregivers.
Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously display, on the exterior of the
hybrid retailer location, a symbol that denotes the sale of medical
Public Act No. 26-8 129 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
marijuana products, which symbol shall be in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner and posted on the department's
Internet web site. Additionally, the hybrid retailer premises shall
accommodate an expedited method of entry that allows for priority
entrance into the premises for qualifying patients and caregivers.
(f) Hybrid retailers shall maintain a secure location, in a manner
approved by the commissioner, at the licensee's premises where
cannabis that is unable to be delivered may be returned to the hybrid
retailer. Such secure cannabis return location shall meet specifications
set forth by the commissioner and published on the department's
Internet web site or included in regulations adopted by the department.
(g) Cannabis [dispensed] sold to a qualifying patient or caregiver that
is unable to be delivered and is returned by the delivery service to the
hybrid retailer shall be returned to the licensee inventory system and
removed from the prescription drug monitoring program not later than
forty-eight hours after receipt of the cannabis from the delivery service.
Sec. 68. Section 21a-420s of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 67 of this act, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The department may issue or renew a license for a hybrid retailer.
No person may act as a hybrid retailer or represent that such person is
a hybrid retailer unless such person has obtained a license from the
department pursuant to this section.
(b) A hybrid retailer may obtain cannabis from a cultivator, micro-
cultivator, producer, product packager, food and beverage
manufacturer, product manufacturer or transporter. In addition to the
activities authorized under section 21a-420t, as amended by this act, a
hybrid retailer may sell, transport or transfer cannabis to a cannabis
establishment, cannabis testing laboratory or research program. A
Public Act No. 26-8 130 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
hybrid retailer may sell cannabis products to a consumer or research
program. A hybrid retailer shall not gift or transfer cannabis at no cost
to a consumer, qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient,
caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver as part of a commercial
transaction.
(c) In addition to conducting general retail sales, a hybrid retailer may
sell cannabis and medical [marijuana] cannabis products to qualifying
patients, [and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and
qualifying out-of-state caregivers. Any cannabis or medical [marijuana]
cannabis products sold to qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-of-
state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state caregivers shall be
recorded in the electronic prescription drug monitoring program,
established pursuant to section 21a-254, in real-time or immediately
upon completion of the transaction, unless not reasonably feasible for a
specific transaction, but in no case longer than one hour after completion
of the transaction. Only a licensed pharmacist or dispensary technician
under the direction of a licensed pharmacist may upload data to such
program, except such upload may be accomplished by way of an
automated upload from the hybrid retailer's point-of-sale system. A
licensed pharmacist shall conduct a daily audit of the data uploaded to
such program pursuant to this subsection. All other authorized
activities of the hybrid retailer, including, but not limited to, all such
activities performed in connection with the sale, handling or
management of cannabis or medical [marijuana] cannabis products,
may be performed by a licensed pharmacist, dispensary technician or
other registered employee of the hybrid retailer.
(d) (1) A hybrid retailer shall ensure that a licensed pharmacist is
available, either in-person or remotely, when the hybrid retailer location
is open to the public or to qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-of-
state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state caregivers. The
hybrid retailer shall ensure that a licensed pharmacist is readily
Public Act No. 26-8 131 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
available to provide telehealth consultations for qualifying patients,
[and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-
state caregivers and upon request by qualifying patients, [or] qualifying
out-of-state patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state caregivers, in-
person consultations for qualifying patients, [or] qualifying out-of-state
patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state caregivers. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to require a hybrid retailer to maintain a
licensed pharmacist at the hybrid retailer location for more than thirty-
five hours per week either in-person or remotely.
(2) A hybrid retailer that offers telehealth consultations with a
licensed pharmacist shall (A) maintain technology that is capable of
facilitating such telehealth consultations, and (B) make such telehealth
consultations readily available and accessible to qualifying patients,
[and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-
state caregivers, including, but not limited to, by telephone from a
remote location outside of the hybrid retailer location and from the
private consultation space required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously post and maintain a sign
at the main entrance of the hybrid retailer location, which sign shall (A)
be at least twelve inches in height and eighteen inches in width, (B)
incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear and legible, and (C)
state the name of the licensed pharmacist who is available for qualifying
patient, [and] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver and qualifying
out-of-state caregiver consultations either in-person or through
telehealth.
(4) Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously post and maintain a sign
at each register or comparable point of sale within the hybrid retailer
location, and on any Internet web site maintained by such hybrid
retailer, which sign shall (A) be at least eight inches in height and ten
inches in width, (B) incorporate lettering in a size and style that is clear
and legible, and (C) state "Pharmacist available for consultation" in a
Public Act No. 26-8 132 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
clear and legible manner.
(5) No registered employee of a hybrid retailer shall sell any cannabis
or medical [marijuana] cannabis product to a qualifying patient, [or]
qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state
caregiver, unless such registered employee has completed at least (A)
one hour of education concerning the types, availability, dosage and
methods of administration of cannabis products, (B) one hour of
education concerning professional ethics, (C) one hour of education
concerning state and federal laws and regulations concerning patient
privacy, and (D) one hour of education concerning developments in the
use of medical [marijuana] cannabis products.
(e) The hybrid retailer location shall include a private consultation
space for pharmacists to meet with qualifying patients, [and] qualifying
out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state caregivers.
Each hybrid retailer shall conspicuously display, on the exterior of the
hybrid retailer location, a symbol that denotes the sale of medical
[marijuana] cannabis products, which symbol shall be in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner and posted on the department's
Internet web site. Additionally, the hybrid retailer premises shall
accommodate an expedited method of entry that allows for priority
entrance into the premises for qualifying patients, [and] qualifying out-
of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state caregivers.
(f) Hybrid retailers shall maintain a secure location, in a manner
approved by the commissioner, at the licensee's premises where
cannabis that is unable to be delivered may be returned to the hybrid
retailer. Such secure cannabis return location shall meet specifications
set forth by the commissioner and published on the department's
Internet web site or included in regulations adopted by the department.
(g) Cannabis sold to a qualifying patient or caregiver that is unable to
be delivered and is returned by the delivery service to the hybrid retailer
Public Act No. 26-8 133 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
shall be returned to the licensee inventory system and removed from the
prescription drug monitoring program not later than forty-eight hours
after receipt of the cannabis from the delivery service.
(h) A hybrid retailer may not convert its license to a retailer license.
To obtain a retailer license, a hybrid retailer shall apply through the
lottery application process. A hybrid retailer may convert to a
dispensary facility, provided the hybrid retailer complies with all
applicable provisions of chapter 420f and has received written approval
from the department.
(i) A retailer may apply to the department to convert its license to a
hybrid retailer license, without applying through the lottery application
system. To convert a retailer license to a hybrid retailer license, a retailer
shall submit a complete application to the department, in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner. Prior to issuing a hybrid
retailer license pursuant to this section, the department shall conduct an
inspection of the converting retailer establishment. Upon a satisfactory
inspection, the department shall deactivate the converting retailer
license and issue a new hybrid retailer license to the applicant.
(j) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter and chapter
420f, and except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a
hybrid retailer may sell the following palliative use cannabis products
to consumers:
(A) Cannabis concentrates;
(B) Topical treatments, excluding transdermal patches;
(C) Creams;
(D) Tablets and capsules;
(E) Rosins; and
Public Act No. 26-8 134 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(F) Products intended for sublingual absorption.
(2) Producers, cultivators, micro-cultivators, product packagers,
product manufacturers and food and beverage manufacturers shall
reserve the palliative use cannabis products set forth in subdivision (1)
of this subsection for sale exclusively to dispensary facilities and hybrid
retailers for at least fourteen days after such palliative use cannabis
products are released to the market, and a hybrid retailer shall reserve
such palliative use cannabis products for sale exclusively to qualifying
patients, qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-
of-state caregivers for at least fourteen days after the hybrid retailer
receives each shipment of such palliative use cannabis products.
(3) The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to allow sales of additional palliative use cannabis products
to consumers in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
[(j)] (k) Manufacturer hemp products, as defined in section 22-61l, as
amended by this act, may be sold within a hybrid retailer facility,
provided such manufacturer hemp products are:
(1) Stored separately from cannabis and cannabis products;
(2) Separated, by a physical separation, from cannabis and cannabis
products in any display area;
(3) Displayed with signage approved by the department;
(4) Tested by a laboratory that meets the standards for accreditation
and testing, and sampling methods, set forth for an independent testing
laboratory in section 22-61m, as amended by this act, which laboratory
may be located outside of this state;
(5) Clearly labeled to distinguish the product as (A) a manufacturer
Public Act No. 26-8 135 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
hemp product, (B) subject to different testing standards than cannabis,
and (C) not cannabis or a cannabis product;
(6) Sold in accordance with this chapter, chapter 424 and any
regulations adopted pursuant to said chapters; and
(7) Derived from hemp grown by a United States Department of
Agriculture hemp producer licensee under an approved state or tribal
hemp production plan.
(l) No hybrid retailer shall retain any personal data the hybrid retailer
obtains from a consumer, qualifying patient, qualifying out-of-state
patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver for the purposes
of age verification for longer than twenty-four hours without the
consumer's, qualifying patient's, qualifying out-of-state patient's,
caregiver's or qualifying out-of-state caregiver's express written
consent.
Sec. 69. Subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of section 21a-420t of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A dispensary facility may apply to the department, on a form and
in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, to convert its license to a
hybrid retailer license [on or after September 1, 2021,] without applying
through the lottery application system. The license conversion
application shall require a dispensary facility to submit to, and obtain
approval from the department for, a detailed medical preservation plan
for how [it] the dispensary facility will prioritize sales and access to
medical [marijuana] cannabis products for qualifying patients and
qualifying out-of-state patients, including, but not limited to, managing
customer traffic flow, preventing supply shortages, providing delivery
services and ensuring appropriate staffing levels.
(b) [After October 1, 2021, qualifying] Qualifying patients and
Public Act No. 26-8 136 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
qualifying out-of-state patients shall not be required to designate a
dispensary facility or hybrid retailer as [its] their exclusive location to
purchase cannabis or medical [marijuana] cannabis products, nor shall
the department require any future change of designated dispensary
facility applications. [If all dispensary facilities demonstrate to the
department's satisfaction that they are adhering to the real-time upload
requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this section prior to October
1, 2021, the commissioner may eliminate the requirement for designated
dispensary facilities prior to said date.]
(c) [On and after September 1, 2021, dispensary] Dispensary facilities
and hybrid retailers shall [be required to] perform real-time uploads to
the prescription drug monitoring program. Any cannabis or medical
[marijuana] cannabis products sold to qualifying patients, [or]
qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state
caregivers shall be dispensed by a licensed pharmacist and shall be
recorded into the prescription drug monitoring program, established
pursuant to section 21a-254, in real-time or immediately upon
completion of the transaction, unless not reasonably feasible for a
specific transaction, but in no case longer than one hour after completion
of the transaction.
(d) A dispensary facility or hybrid retailer may apply to the
department, in a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner,
to provide delivery services through a delivery service or utilizing its
own employees, subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of section 21a-
420c, as amended by this act, to qualifying patients, caregivers, research
program subjects, as defined in section 21a-408, as amended by this act,
and hospice and other inpatient care facilities licensed by the
Department of Public Health pursuant to chapter 368v that have a
protocol for the handling and distribution of cannabis that has been
approved by the Department of Consumer Protection. A dispensary
facility or hybrid retailer may deliver cannabis or medical [marijuana]
Public Act No. 26-8 137 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
cannabis products only from its own inventory to qualifying patients
and caregivers. If such application is approved by the commissioner, the
dispensary facility or hybrid retailer may commence delivery services.
[on and after January 1, 2022, provided the commissioner may authorize
dispensary facilities or hybrid retailers to commence delivery services
prior to January 1, 2022, upon forty-five days advance written notice,
published on the department's Internet web site.]
Sec. 70. Subsection (b) of section 21a-420u of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) Any equity joint venture created under this section shall be
created for the development of a cannabis establishment, other than a
cultivator, provided such equity joint venture is at least fifty per cent
owned and controlled by an individual or individuals who meet, or the
equity joint venture applicant is an individual who meets, the criteria
established in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subdivision [(51)] (54) of
section 21a-420, as amended by this act.
Sec. 71. Subsection (e) of section 21a-420u of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(e) [A] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of
section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, a dispensary facility, including
the backers of such dispensary facility, shall not increase its ownership
in an equity joint venture in excess of fifty per cent during the seven-
year period after a license is issued by the department under this section.
Sec. 72. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 21a-420z of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) A delivery service may (1) deliver cannabis from a micro-
Public Act No. 26-8 138 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
cultivator, retailer, or hybrid retailer directly to a consumer, and (2)
deliver cannabis and medical [marijuana] cannabis products from a
hybrid retailer or dispensary facility directly to a qualifying patient,
caregiver, or hospice or other inpatient care facility licensed by the
Department of Public Health pursuant to chapter 368v that has
protocols for the handling and distribution of cannabis that have been
approved by the Department of Consumer Protection. A delivery
service may not store or maintain control of cannabis or medical
[marijuana] cannabis products for more than twenty-four hours
between the point when a consumer, qualifying patient, caregiver or
facility places an order, until the time that the cannabis or medical
[marijuana] cannabis product is delivered to such consumer, qualifying
patient, caregiver or facility.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a
transporter may deliver cannabis between cannabis establishments,
research programs and cannabis testing laboratories and shall not store
or maintain control of cannabis for more than twenty-four hours from
the time the transporter obtains the cannabis from a cannabis
establishment, research program or cannabis testing laboratory until the
time such cannabis is delivered to the destination.
(2) (A) A transporter may expand the transporter's authorized
activities to store, maintain and handle cannabis in accordance with the
provisions of this subsection, provided such transporter:
(i) Possesses each unit of cannabis for a period not to exceed [thirty]
one hundred eighty days beginning on the date on which the
transporter receives such cannabis;
(ii) Complies with all security requirements established pursuant to
section 21a-421l and the policies, procedures and regulations adopted
pursuant to section 21a-421j, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-8 139 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(iii) Attests that such transporter shall not open or remove any
cannabis from individual child-resistant packaging, provided nothing
in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit a transporter from
consolidating or separating bulk packaged cannabis for the purposes of
commercial distribution;
(iv) Attests that such transporter shall comply with all requirements
set forth in section 21a-421n, as amended by this act, and all policies,
procedures and regulations adopted pursuant to section 21a-421j, as
amended by this act, for the electronic tracking system concerning the
receipt, storage, repackaging and distribution of cannabis;
(v) Pays to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, a one-time expansion authorization payment of five
thousand dollars, to be deposited in the consumer protection
enforcement account established in section 21a-8a;
(vi) Notifies the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, at least thirty days before the date on which the
transporter intends to commence the storage of cannabis for a period
exceeding twenty-four hours; and
(vii) Receives written confirmation from the department that the
transporter meets the security requirements described in subparagraph
(A)(ii) of this subdivision.
(B) The department shall take all reasonable efforts to schedule an
inspection of the cannabis establishment facility not later than sixty days
after the department receives an application for transporter expansion
pursuant to this subdivision. Upon completion of such inspection, the
department shall promptly provide to the transporter (i) written
confirmation of compliance with the security requirements set forth in
subparagraph (A)(ii) of this subdivision, or (ii) notice of noncompliance
with the security requirements set forth in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this
Public Act No. 26-8 140 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
subdivision.
(C) A transporter that expands the transporter's authorized activities
under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall (i) comply with all
provisions of this chapter, and all regulations, policies and procedures
prescribed pursuant to this chapter, concerning product packagers, and
(ii) not open or remove any cannabis from individual child-resistant
packaging, provided nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
prohibit a transporter from consolidating or separating bulk packaged
cannabis for the purposes of commercial distribution on a scale that is
greater than commercial distribution on an individual and final
packaging basis.
(D) In the event of a conflict between any provision of this chapter, or
any regulation, policy or procedure prescribed pursuant to this chapter,
concerning transporters and any such provision, regulation, policy or
procedure concerning product packagers, the provision, regulation,
policy or procedure imposing the more stringent public health and
safety standard shall prevail.
Sec. 73. Subsection (e) of section 21a-420z of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(e) The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to implement the provisions of RERACA. Notwithstanding
the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to
effectuate the purposes of RERACA and protect public health and
safety, prior to adopting such regulations the commissioner shall issue
policies and procedures to implement the provisions of this section that
shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all
policies and procedures on the department's Internet web site, and
submit such policies and procedures to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
Public Act No. 26-8 141 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
consumer protection and the Secretary of the State for posting on the
eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective date of
any policy or procedure. Any such policy or procedure shall no longer
be effective upon the earlier of either adoption of such policy or
procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or [sixty-three
months from July 1, 2021] July 1, 2028. The commissioner shall issue
policies and procedures, and thereafter adopt final regulations: [,] (1)
For the purpose of ensuring the public health, safety and welfare,
establishing storage, recall and other requirements for a transporter that
expands its authorized activities as set forth in subdivision (2) of
subsection (d) of this section; and (2) requiring that [: (1) The] (A) the
delivery service and transporter meet certain security requirements
related to the storage, handling and transport of cannabis, the vehicles
employed, the conduct of employees and agents, and the
documentation that shall be maintained by the delivery service,
transporter and its drivers, [; (2)] (B) a delivery service that delivers
cannabis to consumers maintain an online interface that verifies the age
of consumers ordering cannabis for delivery and meets certain
specifications and data security standards, [;] and [(3)] (C) a delivery
service that delivers cannabis to consumers, qualifying patients or
caregivers, and all employees and agents of such licensee, to verify the
identity of the qualifying patient, caregiver or consumer and the age of
the consumer upon delivery of cannabis to the end consumer, qualifying
patient or caregiver, in a manner acceptable to the commissioner. The
individual placing the cannabis order shall be the individual accepting
delivery of the cannabis except, in the case of a qualifying patient, the
individual accepting the delivery may be the caregiver of such
qualifying patient.
Sec. 74. Subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of
section 21a-420aa of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-8 142 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(A) Such change in ownership or control is allowed under (i) section
21a-420g, as amended by this act, or 21a-420h, as amended by this act,
and (ii) any regulation adopted, or policy or procedure issued, pursuant
to section 21a-420g, as amended by this act, or 21a-420h, as amended by
this act; and
Sec. 75. Subsections (b) to (g), inclusive, of section 21a-420bb of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) During the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending March 31,
2027, the department shall issue a provisional micro-cultivator license
to a social equity applicant pursuant to this section:
(1) If the social equity applicant meets the eligibility criteria
established in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section;
(2) If during the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending December
31, 2026, the social equity applicant submits to the department, in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner:
(A) A completed micro-cultivator license application and other
documentation required to determine eligibility as set forth in
subsections (e) to (l), inclusive, of section 21a-420g;
(B) A written statement by the social equity applicant disclosing
whether any change occurred in the ownership or control of the social
equity applicant after the Social Equity Council verified that the
applicant met the criteria for a social equity applicant pursuant to
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-420o; and
(C) The application fee required under subdivision (1) of subsection
(c) of this section; and
(3) If any change described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (2) of
Public Act No. 26-8 143 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
this subsection has occurred:
(A) Such change in ownership or control is allowed under (i) section
21a-420g, as amended by this act, or 21a-420h, as amended by this act,
and (ii) any regulation adopted, or policy or procedure issued, pursuant
to section 21a-420g, as amended by this act, or 21a-420h, as amended by
this act; and
(B) Pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, (i) the Social Equity
Council has determined that the social equity applicant continues to
meet the criteria for a social equity applicant, and (ii) the department
has received a written notice from the Social Equity Council affirming
that the Social Equity Council has determined that the social equity
applicant continues to meet the criteria for a social equity applicant.
(c) (1) A social equity applicant that has not obtained a provisional
cultivator license under subsection (a) of section 21a-420o and submits
a micro-cultivator license application pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section shall submit to the department an application fee in the amount
of five hundred thousand dollars. The three-million-dollar fee paid by
the social equity applicant pursuant to section 21a-420o to receive a
provisional cultivator license shall be considered the application fee to
convert to a micro-cultivator license pursuant to this section. All
application fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited
in the consumer protection enforcement account established in section
21a-8a.
(2) The fee to renew a final micro-cultivator license issued pursuant
to this section shall be the same as the fee to renew a final micro-
cultivator license as set forth in section 21a-420e. All renewal fees
collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid to the State
Treasurer and credited to the General Fund.
(d) If any change described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (2) of
Public Act No. 26-8 144 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
subsection (b) of this section has occurred, the Social Equity Council
shall (1) determine whether the social equity applicant continues to meet
the criteria for a social equity applicant, and (2) submit to the
department, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, a
written notice disclosing such determination.
(e) No social equity applicant that receives a micro-cultivator license
under this section shall be eligible to apply for a provisional license and
a final license to create more than one equity joint venture to be
approved by the Social Equity Council under section 21a-420d, as
amended by this act, and no such social equity applicant shall operate
any such equity joint venture unless such social equity applicant has
received a micro-cultivator license under this section, commenced
cultivation activities under such micro-cultivator license and submitted
to the department both the application fee required under subdivision
(1) of subsection (c) of this section and a conversion fee in the amount of
five hundred thousand dollars. The conversion fee collected pursuant to
this subsection shall be deposited in the social equity and innovation
account established in section 21a-420f. The three-million-dollar fee paid
by the social equity applicant pursuant to section 21a-420o to receive a
provisional cultivator license shall be considered the conversion fee to
convert to a micro-cultivator license pursuant to this section. Cultivators
that paid the three-million-dollar fee under section 21a-420o and
received license conversion approval under section 21a-420aa, as
amended by this act, may create not more than two equity joint
ventures. No such cultivator shall apply for, or create, any additional
equity joint venture if, on July 1, 2025, such cultivator has created at least
two equity joint ventures that have each received a provisional license.
(f) Each application submitted to the department pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, and all information included in, or
submitted with, any application submitted pursuant to said subsection,
shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of section 21a-420e.
Public Act No. 26-8 145 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(g) [A] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of
section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, a micro-cultivator licensed
under this section, including the backer of such micro-cultivator, shall
not increase its ownership in an equity joint venture in excess of fifty per
cent during the seven-year period beginning on the date on which a final
micro-cultivator license is issued by the department under this section.
Sec. 76. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21a-420cc of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) During the period beginning January 1, 2026, and ending
December 31, 2027, the department shall issue a cultivator license or
micro-cultivator license to a social equity applicant, which permits such
applicant to locate such applicant's cultivator or micro-cultivator facility
outside of a disproportionately impacted area, provided:
(1) On or before July 1, 2026, the social equity applicant submits to
the department a complete application for a provisional cultivator or
micro-cultivator license pursuant to subsection (a) of section 21a-420o;
(2) On or before June 30, 2027, the Social Equity Council verifies,
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-420o, that
such applicant meets the criteria established for a social equity
applicant;
(3) On or before June 30, 2027, the department issues a provisional
cultivator or micro-cultivator license to the social equity applicant
pursuant to section 21a-420o; and
(4) On or before July 1, 2027, the provisional licensee submits to the
department a complete application for a final cultivator or micro-
cultivator license, as prescribed in section 21a-420g, as amended by this
act, which application shall include:
Public Act No. 26-8 146 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(A) A copy of a fully executed lease agreement between the
provisional licensee and a hemp producer, which hemp producer has
been continually licensed under section 22-61l, as amended by this act,
since January 1, 2024, and which agreement provides:
(i) For the use of the hemp producer's lot, as defined in section 22-61l,
as amended by this act, that is on record with the Department of
Agriculture on January 1, 2024, and may be located outside of a
disproportionately impacted area; and
(ii) That the hemp producer does not currently hold a position of
ownership, control or management of the provisional licensee, and if a
final cultivator or micro-cultivator license is issued to the provisional
licensee pursuant to this section, the hemp producer shall not, except as
provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k) of section 21a-420d, as
amended by this act, hold a position of ownership, control or
management of the licensee for a period of seven years commencing on
the date on which such final license is issued pursuant to this section;
and
(iii) An express acknowledgment by the parties that if the department
issues a final cultivator or micro-cultivator license to the provisional
licensee pursuant to this section, the hemp producer shall immediately
be deemed to have automatically surrendered such hemp producer's
license;
(B) Evidence sufficient for the department to verify that the hemp
producer that is a party to the lease has been continually licensed as a
hemp producer since January 1, 2024;
(C) An acknowledgment by the provisional licensee that, if the
department issues a final cultivator or micro-cultivator license to such
provisional licensee pursuant to this section, such licensee shall (i) in the
case of a final cultivator license, be eligible to create not more than one
Public Act No. 26-8 147 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
equity joint venture after such licensee receives such license and
commences cultivation activities under such license, or (ii) in the case of
a final micro-cultivator license, be ineligible to create an equity joint
venture after such licensee receives such license; and
(D) An attestation by the provisional licensee that (i) the hemp
producer from which such provisional licensee is leasing land shall have
no ownership interest in, or managerial control over, such licensee,
other than any ownership interest or control previously disclosed to the
Social Equity Council for the purpose of determining that the social
equity applicant meets the criteria for a social equity applicant pursuant
to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-420o, and (ii) all hemp
has been harvested from the lot subject to the lease between the
provisional licensee and the hemp producer.
(b) [During] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (k)
of section 21a-420d, as amended by this act, during the seven-year
period commencing on the date on which a final cultivator license or
final micro-cultivator license is issued pursuant to this section, the
cultivator or micro-cultivator issued such final license shall:
(1) Not enter into any business arrangement with the hemp producer,
other than for the lease of the hemp producer's lot, or any affiliate,
subsidiary or entity controlled by the hemp producer if such business
arrangement may result in such hemp producer, affiliate, subsidiary or
entity holding a position of ownership, control or management of the
cultivator or micro-cultivator; and
(2) Disclose any direct or indirect business interest or relationship
between the cultivator or micro-cultivator and the hemp producer or
any affiliate, subsidiary or entity controlled by the hemp producer or
any key participant, as defined in section 22-61l, as amended by this act.
Sec. 77. Subsection (f) of section 21a-421d of the general statutes is
Public Act No. 26-8 148 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(f) A producer, cultivator or micro-cultivator may sell, transport or
transfer cannabis to a product packager, food or beverage manufacturer,
product manufacturer, dispensary facility or hybrid retailer for the sale
of products to [qualified] qualifying patients, [or] qualifying out-of-state
patients, caregivers or qualifying out-of-state caregivers, as applicable,
which products shall be labeled "For Medical Use Only".
Sec. 78. Subsection (b) of section 21a-421j of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The commissioner shall adopt regulations in accordance with
chapter 54 to implement the provisions of RERACA. Notwithstanding
the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to
effectuate the purposes of RERACA and protect public health and
safety, prior to adopting such regulations the commissioner shall issue
policies and procedures to implement the provisions of RERACA that
shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all
policies and procedures on the department's Internet web site and
submit such policies and procedures to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
consumer protection and the Secretary of the State for posting on the
eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective date of
any policy or procedure. The commissioner shall also provide such
policies and procedures, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner,
to each licensee. Any such policy or procedure shall no longer be
effective upon the earlier of either the adoption of the policy or
procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or [sixty-three
months from June 22, 2021] July 1, 2028. The commissioner shall issue
policies and procedures and thereafter final regulations that include, but
are not limited to, the following:
Public Act No. 26-8 149 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(1) Setting appropriate dosage, potency, concentration and serving
size limits and delineation requirements for cannabis, provided a
standardized serving of edible cannabis product or beverage, other than
a medical marijuana product, shall contain not more than five
milligrams of THC.
(2) Requiring that each single standardized serving of cannabis
product in a multiple-serving edible product or beverage is physically
demarked in a way that enables a reasonable person to determine how
much of the product constitutes a single serving and a maximum
amount of THC per multiple-serving edible cannabis product or
beverage.
(3) Requiring that, if it is impracticable to clearly demark every
standardized serving of cannabis product or to make each standardized
serving easily separable in an edible cannabis product or beverage, the
product, other than cannabis concentrate or medical marijuana product,
shall contain not more than five milligrams of THC per unit of sale.
(4) Establishing, in consultation with the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services, consumer health materials that shall be
posted or distributed, as specified by the commissioner, by cannabis
establishments to maximize dissemination to cannabis consumers.
Consumer health materials may include pamphlets, packaging inserts,
signage, online and printed advertisements and advisories and printed
health materials.
(5) Imposing labeling and packaging requirements for cannabis sold
by a cannabis establishment that include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(A) Inclusion of universal symbols to indicate that cannabis, or a
cannabis product, contains THC and is not legal or safe for individuals
younger than twenty-one years of age, and prescribe how such product
Public Act No. 26-8 150 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
and product packaging shall utilize and exhibit such symbols.
(B) A disclosure concerning the length of time it typically takes for
the cannabis to affect an individual, including that certain forms of
cannabis take longer to have an effect.
(C) A notation of the amount of cannabis the cannabis product is
considered the equivalent to.
(D) A list of ingredients and additives for cannabis.
(E) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section
21a-420p, as amended by this act, child-resistant, tamper-resistant and
light-resistant packaging. For the purposes of this subparagraph,
packaging shall be deemed to be (i) child-resistant if the packaging
satisfies the standard for special packaging established in 16 CFR
1700.1(b)(4), as amended from time to time, (ii) tamper-resistant if the
packaging has at least one barrier to, or indicator of, entry that would
preclude the contents of such packaging from being accessed or
adulterated without indicating to a reasonable person that such
packaging has been breached, and (iii) light-resistant if the packaging is
entirely and uniformly opaque and protects the entirety of the contents
of such packaging from the effects of light.
(F) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section
21a-420p, as amended by this act, (i) packaging for cannabis intended
for multiple servings to be resealable in such a manner so as to render
such packaging continuously child-resistant, as described in
subparagraph (E)(i) of this subdivision, and preserve the integrity of the
contents of such packaging, and (ii) if packaging for cannabis intended
for multiple servings contains any edible cannabis product, for each
single standardized serving to be easily discernible and (I) individually
wrapped, or (II) physically demarked and delineated as required under
this subsection.
Public Act No. 26-8 151 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(G) Impervious packaging that protects the contents of such
packaging from contamination and exposure to any toxic or harmful
substance, including, but not limited to, any glue or other adhesive or
substance that is incorporated in such packaging.
(H) Product tracking information sufficient to determine where and
when the cannabis was grown and manufactured such that a product
recall could be effectuated.
(I) A net weight statement.
(J) A recommended use by or expiration date.
(K) Standard and uniform packaging and labeling, including, but not
limited to, requirements (i) regarding branding or logos, (ii) that all
packaging be opaque, and (iii) that amounts and concentrations of THC
and cannabidiol, per serving and per package, be clearly marked on the
packaging or label of any cannabis product sold.
(L) For any cannabis concentrate cannabis product that contains a
total THC percentage greater than thirty per cent, a warning that such
cannabis product is a high-potency product and may increase the risk
of psychosis.
(M) Chemotypes, which shall be displayed as (i) "High THC, Low
CBD" where the ratio of THC to CBD is greater than five to one and the
total THC percentage is at least fifteen per cent, (ii) "Moderate THC,
Moderate CBD" where the ratio of THC to CBD is at least one to five but
not greater than five to one and the total THC percentage is greater than
five per cent but less than fifteen per cent, (iii) "Low THC, High CBD"
where the ratio of THC to CBD is less than one to five and the total THC
percentage is not greater than five per cent, or (iv) the chemotype
described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subparagraph that most closely
fits the cannabis or cannabis product, as determined by mathematical
analysis of the ratio of THC to CBD, where such cannabis or cannabis
Public Act No. 26-8 152 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
product does not fit a chemotype described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of
this subparagraph.
(N) A requirement that, prior to being sold and transferred to a
consumer, qualifying patient or caregiver, cannabis packaging be
clearly labeled, whether printed directly on such packaging or affixed
by way of a separate label, other than an extended content label, with:
(i) A unique identifier generated by a cannabis analytic tracking
system maintained by the department and used to track cannabis under
the policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted, by
the commissioner pursuant to this section; and
(ii) The following information concerning the cannabis contained in
such packaging, which shall be in legible English, black lettering, Times
New Roman font, flat regular typeface, on a contrasting background
and in uniform size of not less than one-tenth of one inch, based on a
capital letter "K", which information shall also be available on the
Internet web site of the cannabis establishment that sells and transfers
such cannabis:
(I) The name of such cannabis, as registered with the department
under the policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted,
by the commissioner pursuant to this section.
(II) The expiration date, which shall not account for any refrigeration
after such cannabis is sold and transferred to the consumer, qualifying
patient or caregiver.
(III) The net weight or volume, expressed in metric and imperial
units.
(IV) The standardized serving size, expressed in customary units, and
the number of servings included in such packaging, if applicable.
Public Act No. 26-8 153 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(V) Directions for use and storage.
(VI) Each active ingredient comprising at least one per cent of such
cannabis, including cannabinoids, isomers, esters, ethers and salts and
salts of isomers, esters and ethers, and all quantities thereof expressed
in metric units and as a percentage of volume.
(VII) A list of all known allergens, as identified by the federal Food
and Drug Administration, contained in such cannabis, or the denotation
"no known FDA identified allergens" if such cannabis does not contain
any allergen identified by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(VIII) The following warning statement within, and outlined by, a red
box:
"This product is not FDA-approved, may be intoxicating, cause long-
term physical and mental health problems, and have delayed side
effects. It is illegal to operate a vehicle or machinery under the influence
of cannabis. Keep away from children."
(IX) At least one of the following warning statements, rotated
quarterly on an alternating basis:
"Warning: Frequent and prolonged use of cannabis can contribute to
mental health problems over time, including anxiety, depression,
stunted brain development and impaired memory."
"Warning: Consumption while pregnant or breastfeeding may be
harmful."
"Warning: Cannabis has intoxicating effects and may be habit-
forming and addictive."
"Warning: Consuming more than the recommended amount may
result in adverse effects requiring medical attention.".
Public Act No. 26-8 154 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(X) All information necessary to comply with labeling requirements
imposed under the laws of this state and federal law, including, but not
limited to, sections 21a-91 to 21a-120, inclusive, and 21a-151 to 21a-159,
inclusive, the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 USC 301 et seq.,
as amended from time to time, and the federal Fair Packaging and
Labeling Act, 15 USC 1451 et seq., as amended from time to time, for
similar products that do not contain cannabis.
(XI) Such additional warning labels for certain cannabis products as
the commissioner may require and post on the department's Internet
web site.
(6) Establishing laboratory testing standards, consumer disclosures
concerning mold and yeast in cannabis and permitted remediation
practices.
(7) Restricting forms of cannabis products and cannabis product
delivery systems to ensure consumer safety and deter public health
concerns.
(8) Prohibiting certain manufacturing methods, or inclusion of
additives to cannabis products, including, but not limited to, (A) added
flavoring, terpenes or other additives unless approved by the
department, or (B) any form of nicotine or other additive containing
nicotine.
(9) Prohibiting cannabis product types that appeal to children,
including, but not limited to, facsimiles of foods, beverages and other
items that appeal to children.
(10) Establishing physical and cyber security requirements related to
build out, monitoring and protocols for cannabis establishments as a
requirement for licensure.
(11) Placing temporary limits on the sale of cannabis in the adult-use
Public Act No. 26-8 155 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
market, if deemed appropriate and necessary by the commissioner, in
response to a shortage of cannabis for qualifying patients.
(12) Requiring retailers and hybrid retailers to make best efforts to
provide access to (A) low-dose THC products, including products that
have one milligram and two and a half milligrams of THC per dose, and
(B) high-dose CBD products.
(13) Requiring producers, cultivators, micro-cultivators, product
manufacturers and food and beverage manufacturers to register brand
names for cannabis, in accordance with the policies and procedures and
subject to the fee set forth in, regulations adopted under chapter 420f.
(14) Prohibiting a cannabis establishment from selling, other than the
sale of medical marijuana products between cannabis establishments
and the sale of cannabis to qualifying patients and caregivers, (A)
cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material with a total THC
concentration greater than thirty-five per cent on a dry-weight basis,
and (B) any cannabis product other than cannabis flower and cannabis
plant material with a total THC concentration greater than seventy per
cent on a dry-weight basis, except that the provisions of subparagraph
(B) of this subdivision shall not apply to the sale of prefilled cartridges
for use in an electronic cannabis delivery system, as defined in section
19a-342a, as amended by this act, and the department may adjust the
percentages set forth in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision in
regulations adopted pursuant to this section for purposes of public
health or to address market access or shortage. As used in this
subdivision, "cannabis plant material" means material from the cannabis
plant, as defined in section 21a-279a, as amended by this act.
(15) Requiring dispensary facilities, hybrid retailers and retailers to
display the following types of cannabis in a form and manner prescribed
by the department and in an area physically and visually separated from
other cannabis for sale at such establishment: (A) Cannabis flower or
Public Act No. 26-8 156 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
other cannabis plant material with a total THC concentration greater
than thirty per cent on a dry-weight basis, and (B) any cannabis product
other than cannabis flower and cannabis plant material with a total THC
concentration greater than sixty per cent on a dry-weight basis,
excluding prefilled cartridges for use in an electronic cannabis delivery
system. As used in this subdivision, "cannabis plant material" has the
same meaning as provided in subsection (j) of section 21a-279a, as
amended by this act.
(16) Requiring any dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer that
sells any form of cannabis that exceeds the THC concentrations set forth
in subdivision (15) of this subsection to include the words "Warning -
High THC" next to each such form of cannabis on such cannabis
establishment's menus and advertisements.
(17) Prescribing signage to be displayed at a dispensary facility,
hybrid retailer or retailer informing consumers, qualifying patients and
caregivers of health risks associated with cannabis in excess of the THC
concentrations set forth in subdivision (15) of this subsection.
(18) Permitting the outdoor cultivation of cannabis.
(19) Prohibiting packaging that is (A) visually similar to any
commercially similar product that does not contain cannabis, or (B) used
for any good that is marketed to individuals reasonably expected to be
younger than twenty-one years of age.
(20) Allowing packaging to include a picture of the cannabis product
and contain a logo of one cannabis establishment, which logo may be
comprised of not more than three colors and provided neither black nor
white shall be considered one of such three colors.
(21) Requiring packaging to (A) be entirely and uniformly one color,
and (B) not incorporate any information, print, embossing, debossing,
graphic or hidden feature, other than any permitted or required label.
Public Act No. 26-8 157 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(22) Requiring that packaging and labeling for an edible cannabis
product, excluding the warning labels required under this subsection
and a picture of the cannabis product described in subdivision (20) of
this subsection but including, but not limited to, the logo of the cannabis
establishment, shall only be comprised of black and white or a
combination thereof.
(23) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
requiring that delivery device cartridges be labeled, in a clearly legible
manner and in as large a font as the size of the device reasonably allows,
with only the following information (i) the name of the cannabis
establishment where the cannabis is grown or manufactured, (ii) the
cannabis brand, (iii) the total THC and total CBD content contained
within the delivery device cartridge, (iv) the expiration date, and (v) the
unique identifier generated by a cannabis analytic tracking system
maintained by the department and used to track cannabis under the
policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted, by the
commissioner pursuant to this section.
(B) A cannabis establishment may emboss, deboss or similarly print
the name of the cannabis establishment's business entity, and one logo
with not more than three colors, on a delivery device cartridge.
(24) Prescribing signage to be prominently displayed at dispensary
facilities, retailers and hybrid retailers disclosing (A) possible health
risks related to mold, and (B) the use and possible health risks related to
the use of mold remediation techniques.
Sec. 79. Section 21a-421j of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 78 of this act, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section: [, "total THC"]
(1) "Other cannabis plant material" (A) means cannabis trim and all
Public Act No. 26-8 158 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
parts of any plant or species of the genus cannabis, or any infra specific
taxon thereof, excluding a growing plant, and the seeds thereof, and (B)
does not include (i) cannabis flower or hemp, as defined in section 22-
61l, as amended by this act, or (ii) an uprooted clone or uprooted cutting
of the cannabis plant; and
(2) "Total THC" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-240,
as amended by this act.
(b) The commissioner shall adopt regulations in accordance with
chapter 54 to implement the provisions of RERACA. Notwithstanding
the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, in order to
effectuate the purposes of RERACA and protect public health and
safety, prior to adopting such regulations the commissioner shall issue
policies and procedures to implement the provisions of RERACA that
shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all
policies and procedures on the department's Internet web site and
submit such policies and procedures to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
consumer protection and the Secretary of the State for posting on the
eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective date of
any policy or procedure. The commissioner shall also provide such
policies and procedures, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner,
to each licensee. Any such policy or procedure shall no longer be
effective upon the earlier of either the adoption of the policy or
procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or July 1, 2028. The
commissioner shall issue policies and procedures and thereafter final
regulations that include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) Setting appropriate dosage, potency, concentration and serving
size limits and delineation requirements for cannabis, provided (A) a
standardized serving of an edible cannabis product or beverage, other
than a medical [marijuana] cannabis product, shall contain not more
than five milligrams of THC, with an allowable variance for cannabis
Public Act No. 26-8 159 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
testing laboratory method uncertainty of up to plus or minus ten per
cent of the reported value for THC, and (B) there shall be no dosage,
potency or concentration limit for (i) cannabis concentrates, or (ii)
cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material.
(2) Requiring that each single standardized serving of cannabis
product in a multiple-serving edible product or beverage is physically
demarked in a way that enables a reasonable person to determine how
much of the product constitutes a single serving and a maximum
amount of THC per multiple-serving edible cannabis product or
beverage.
(3) Requiring that, if it is impracticable to clearly demark every
standardized serving of cannabis product or to make each standardized
serving easily separable in an edible cannabis product or beverage, the
product, other than cannabis concentrate, [or medical marijuana]
cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material or a medical cannabis
product, shall contain not more than five milligrams of THC per unit of
sale, with an allowable variance for cannabis testing laboratory method
uncertainty of up to plus or minus ten per cent of the reported value for
THC.
(4) Establishing, in consultation with the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services, consumer health materials that shall be
posted or distributed, as specified by the commissioner, by cannabis
establishments to maximize dissemination to cannabis consumers.
Consumer health materials may include pamphlets, packaging inserts,
signage, online and printed advertisements and advisories and printed
health materials.
(5) Imposing labeling and packaging requirements for cannabis sold
by a cannabis establishment that include, but are not limited to, the
following:
Public Act No. 26-8 160 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(A) Inclusion of universal symbols to indicate that cannabis, or a
cannabis product, contains THC and is not legal or safe for individuals
younger than twenty-one years of age, and prescribe how such product
and product packaging shall utilize and exhibit such symbols.
(B) A disclosure concerning the length of time it typically takes for
the cannabis to affect an individual, including that certain forms of
cannabis take longer to have an effect.
(C) A notation of the amount of cannabis the cannabis product is
considered the equivalent to.
(D) A list of ingredients and additives for cannabis.
(E) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section
21a-420p, as amended by this act, child-resistant, tamper-resistant and
light-resistant packaging. For the purposes of this subparagraph,
packaging shall be deemed to be (i) child-resistant if the packaging
satisfies the standard for special packaging established in 16 CFR
1700.1(b)(4), as amended from time to time, (ii) tamper-resistant if the
packaging has at least one barrier to, or indicator of, entry that would
preclude the contents of such packaging from being accessed or
adulterated without indicating to a reasonable person that such
packaging has been breached, and (iii) light-resistant if the packaging is
entirely and uniformly opaque and protects the entirety of the contents
of such packaging from the effects of light.
(F) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section
21a-420p, as amended by this act, (i) packaging for cannabis intended
for multiple servings to be resealable in such a manner so as to render
such packaging continuously child-resistant, as described in
subparagraph (E)(i) of this subdivision, and preserve the integrity of the
contents of such packaging, and (ii) if packaging for cannabis intended
for multiple servings contains any edible cannabis product, for each
Public Act No. 26-8 161 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
single standardized serving to be easily discernible and (I) individually
wrapped, or (II) physically demarked and delineated as required under
this subsection.
(G) Impervious packaging that protects the contents of such
packaging from contamination and exposure to any toxic or harmful
substance, including, but not limited to, any glue or other adhesive or
substance that is incorporated in such packaging.
(H) Product tracking information sufficient to determine where and
when the cannabis was grown and manufactured such that a product
recall could be effectuated.
(I) A net weight statement.
(J) A recommended use by or expiration date.
(K) Standard and uniform packaging and labeling, including, but not
limited to, requirements (i) regarding branding or logos, (ii) that all
packaging be opaque, and (iii) that amounts and concentrations of THC
and cannabidiol, per serving and per package, be clearly marked on the
packaging or label of any cannabis product sold.
(L) For any cannabis flower, other cannabis plant material or cannabis
concentrate cannabis product that contains a total THC percentage
greater than thirty per cent, a warning that such cannabis flower, other
cannabis plant material or cannabis concentrate cannabis product is a
high-potency product and may increase the risk of psychosis.
(M) Chemotypes, which shall be displayed as (i) "High THC, Low
CBD" where the ratio of THC to CBD is greater than five to one and the
total THC percentage is at least fifteen per cent, (ii) "Moderate THC,
Moderate CBD" where the ratio of THC to CBD is at least one to five but
not greater than five to one and the total THC percentage is greater than
five per cent but less than fifteen per cent, (iii) "Low THC, High CBD"
Public Act No. 26-8 162 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
where the ratio of THC to CBD is less than one to five and the total THC
percentage is not greater than five per cent, or (iv) the chemotype
described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subparagraph that most closely
fits the cannabis or cannabis product, as determined by mathematical
analysis of the ratio of THC to CBD, where such cannabis or cannabis
product does not fit a chemotype described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of
this subparagraph.
(N) A requirement that, prior to being sold and transferred to a
consumer, qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient,
caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver, cannabis packaging be
clearly labeled, whether printed directly on such packaging or affixed
by way of a separate label, other than an extended content label, with:
(i) A unique identifier generated by a cannabis analytic tracking
system maintained by the department and used to track cannabis under
the policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted, by
the commissioner pursuant to this section; and
(ii) The following information concerning the cannabis contained in
such packaging, which shall be in legible English, black lettering, Times
New Roman font, flat regular typeface, on a contrasting background
and in uniform size of not less than one-tenth of one inch, based on a
capital letter "K", which information shall also be available on the
Internet web site of the cannabis establishment that sells and transfers
such cannabis:
(I) The name of such cannabis, as registered with the department
under the policies and procedures issued, and final regulations adopted,
by the commissioner pursuant to this section.
(II) The expiration date, which shall not account for any refrigeration
after such cannabis is sold and transferred to the consumer, qualifying
patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or qualifying out-
Public Act No. 26-8 163 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
of-state caregiver.
(III) The net weight or volume, expressed in metric and imperial
units.
(IV) The standardized serving size, expressed in customary units, and
the number of servings included in such packaging, if applicable.
(V) Directions for use and storage.
(VI) Each active ingredient comprising at least one per cent of such
cannabis, including cannabinoids, isomers, esters, ethers and salts and
salts of isomers, esters and ethers, and all quantities thereof expressed
in metric units and as a percentage of volume.
(VII) A list of all known allergens, as identified by the federal Food
and Drug Administration, contained in such cannabis, or the denotation
"no known FDA identified allergens" if such cannabis does not contain
any allergen identified by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(VIII) The following warning statement within, and outlined by, a red
box:
"This product is not FDA-approved, may be intoxicating, cause long-
term physical and mental health problems, and have delayed side
effects. It is illegal to operate a vehicle or machinery under the influence
of cannabis. Keep away from children."
(IX) At least one of the following warning statements, rotated
quarterly on an alternating basis:
"Warning: Frequent and prolonged use of cannabis can contribute to
mental health problems over time, including anxiety, depression,
stunted brain development and impaired memory."
"Warning: Consumption while pregnant or breastfeeding may be
Public Act No. 26-8 164 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
harmful."
"Warning: Cannabis has intoxicating effects and may be habit-
forming and addictive."
"Warning: Consuming more than the recommended amount may
result in adverse effects requiring medical attention.".
(X) All information necessary to comply with labeling requirements
imposed under the laws of this state and federal law, including, but not
limited to, sections 21a-91 to 21a-120, inclusive, and 21a-151 to 21a-159,
inclusive, the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 USC 301 et seq.,
as amended from time to time, and the federal Fair Packaging and
Labeling Act, 15 USC 1451 et seq., as amended from time to time, for
similar products that do not contain cannabis.
(XI) Such additional warning labels for certain cannabis products as
the commissioner may require and post on the department's Internet
web site.
(6) Establishing laboratory testing standards. [,]
(7) Establishing consumer disclosures concerning mold and yeast in
cannabis. [and]
(8) Establishing permitted remediation practices, which practices
shall include, but need not be limited to, remediation of cannabis flower
or other cannabis plant material by way of one or more exposures to
ionizing radiation for any cannabis flower or other cannabis plant
material that fails any laboratory testing due to microbial
contamination.
[(7)] (9) Restricting forms of cannabis products and cannabis product
delivery systems to ensure consumer safety and deter public health
concerns.
Public Act No. 26-8 165 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(8)] (10) Prohibiting certain manufacturing methods, or inclusion of
additives to cannabis products, including, but not limited to, (A) added
flavoring, terpenes or other additives unless approved by the
department, or (B) any form of nicotine or other additive containing
nicotine.
[(9)] (11) Prohibiting cannabis product types that appeal to children,
including, but not limited to, facsimiles of foods, beverages and other
items that appeal to children.
[(10)] (12) Establishing physical and cyber security requirements
related to build out, monitoring and protocols for cannabis
establishments as a requirement for licensure.
[(11)] (13) Placing temporary limits on the sale of cannabis in the
adult-use market, if deemed appropriate and necessary by the
commissioner, in response to a shortage of cannabis for qualifying
patients.
[(12)] (14) Requiring retailers and hybrid retailers to make best efforts
to provide access to (A) low-dose THC products, including products
that have one milligram and two and a half milligrams of THC per dose,
and (B) high-dose CBD products.
[(13)] (15) Requiring producers, cultivators, micro-cultivators,
product manufacturers and food and beverage manufacturers to
register brand names for cannabis, in accordance with the policies and
procedures and subject to the fee set forth in, regulations adopted under
chapter 420f.
[(14)] (16) Prohibiting a cannabis establishment from selling, other
than the sale of medical [marijuana] cannabis products between
cannabis establishments and the sale of cannabis to qualifying patients,
[and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-
state caregivers, [(A) cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material
Public Act No. 26-8 166 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
with a total THC concentration greater than thirty-five per cent on a dry-
weight basis, and (B)] any cannabis product [other than cannabis flower
and cannabis plant material] with a total THC concentration greater
than seventy per cent on a dry-weight basis, except that the provisions
of [subparagraph (B) of] this subdivision shall not apply to the sale of
cannabis concentrates, cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material
or prefilled cartridges for use in an electronic cannabis delivery system,
as defined in section 19a-342a, as amended by this act. [and the
department may adjust the percentages set forth in subparagraph (A) or
(B) of this subdivision in regulations adopted pursuant to this section
for purposes of public health or to address market access or shortage.
As used in this subdivision, "cannabis plant material" means material
from the cannabis plant, as defined in section 21a-279a.]
[(15)] (17) Requiring dispensary facilities, hybrid retailers and
retailers to display the following types of cannabis in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and in an area physically and visually
separated from other cannabis for sale at such establishment: (A)
Cannabis flower or other cannabis plant material with a total THC
concentration greater than thirty per cent on a dry-weight basis, and (B)
any cannabis product other than cannabis flower and cannabis plant
material with a total THC concentration greater than sixty per cent on a
dry-weight basis, excluding prefilled cartridges for use in an electronic
cannabis delivery system. [As used in this subdivision, "cannabis plant
material" has the same meaning as provided in subsection (j) of section
21a-279a.]
[(16)] (18) Requiring any dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer
that sells any form of cannabis that exceeds the THC concentrations set
forth in subdivision [(15)] (17) of this subsection to include the words
"Warning - High THC" next to each such form of cannabis on such
cannabis establishment's menus and advertisements.
[(17)] (19) Prescribing signage to be displayed at a dispensary facility,
Public Act No. 26-8 167 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
hybrid retailer or retailer informing consumers, qualifying patients,
[and] qualifying out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-
state caregivers of health risks associated with cannabis in excess of the
THC concentrations set forth in subdivision [(15)] (17) of this subsection.
[(18)] (20) Permitting the outdoor cultivation of cannabis.
[(19)] (21) Prohibiting packaging that is (A) visually similar to any
commercially similar product that does not contain cannabis, or (B) used
for any good that is marketed to individuals reasonably expected to be
younger than twenty-one years of age.
[(20)] (22) Allowing packaging to include a picture of the cannabis
product and contain a logo of one cannabis establishment, which logo
may be comprised of not more than three colors and provided neither
black nor white shall be considered one of such three colors.
[(21)] (23) Requiring packaging to (A) be entirely and uniformly one
color, and (B) not incorporate any information, print, embossing,
debossing, graphic or hidden feature, other than any permitted or
required label.
[(22)] (24) Requiring that packaging and labeling for an edible
cannabis product, excluding the warning labels required under this
subsection and a picture of the cannabis product described in
subdivision [(20)] (22) of this subsection but including, but not limited
to, the logo of the cannabis establishment, shall only be comprised of
black and white or a combination thereof.
[(23)] (25) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this
subdivision, requiring that delivery device cartridges be labeled, in a
clearly legible manner and in as large a font as the size of the device
reasonably allows, with only the following information (i) the name of
the cannabis establishment where the cannabis is grown or
manufactured, (ii) the cannabis brand, (iii) the total THC and total CBD
Public Act No. 26-8 168 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
content contained within the delivery device cartridge, (iv) the
expiration date, and (v) the unique identifier generated by a cannabis
analytic tracking system maintained by the department and used to
track cannabis under the policies and procedures issued, and final
regulations adopted, by the commissioner pursuant to this section.
(B) A cannabis establishment may emboss, deboss or similarly print
the name of the cannabis establishment's business entity, and one logo
with not more than three colors, on a delivery device cartridge.
[(24)] (26) Prescribing signage to be prominently displayed at
dispensary facilities, retailers and hybrid retailers disclosing (A)
possible health risks related to mold, and (B) the use and possible health
risks related to the use of mold remediation techniques.
Sec. 80. Subsection (b) of section 21a-421k of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172,
inclusive, in order to effectuate the purposes of RERACA and protect
public health and safety, prior to adopting such regulations the
commissioner shall implement policies and procedures to implement
the provisions of RERACA that shall have the force and effect of law.
The commissioner shall post all such policies and procedures on the
department's Internet web site and submit such policies and procedures
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to consumer protection and the Secretary
of the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days
prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure. Any such policies
and procedures shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of either
adoption of such policies and procedures as a final regulation under
section 4-172 or [sixty-three months from June 22, 2021] July 1, 2028.
Public Act No. 26-8 169 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Sec. 81. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21a-421n of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Each cannabis establishment, licensed pursuant to chapter 420f or
the provisions of RERACA shall maintain a record of all cannabis
grown, manufactured, wasted and distributed between cannabis
establishments and to consumers, qualifying patients, [and] qualifying
out-of-state patients, caregivers and qualifying out-of-state caregivers in
a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner
shall require each cannabis establishment to use an electronic tracking
system to monitor the production, harvesting, storage, manufacturing,
packaging and labeling, processing, transport, transfer and sale of
cannabis from the point of cannabis cultivation inception through the
point when the final product is sold to a consumer, qualifying patient,
qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver, qualifying out-of-state
caregiver, research program or otherwise disposed of in accordance
with chapter 420f or the provisions of RERACA, and the policies and
procedures or regulations issued pursuant to RERACA. Cannabis
establishments shall be required to utilize such electronic tracking
system and enter the data points required by the commissioner to
ensure cannabis is safe, secure and properly labeled for consumer, [or]
qualifying patient or qualifying out-of-state patient use. The
commissioner may contract with one or more vendors for the purpose
of electronically collecting such cannabis information.
(b) The electronic tracking system shall not collect information about
any individual consumer, qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state
patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver purchasing
cannabis.
Sec. 82. Subsection (e) of section 21a-421o of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-8 170 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(e) Except as otherwise provided in RERACA, all records maintained
or kept on file related to RERACA by the department or the Social
Equity Council shall be public records for purposes of the Freedom of
Information Act, as defined in section 1-200. In addition to the
nondisclosure provisions contained in sections 1-210, 21a-408d, as
amended by this act, 21a-408l, as amended by this act, 21a-408v, as
amended by this act, 21a-420g, 21a-421n, as amended by this act, 21a-
421p and 21a-422k, as amended by this act, any information related to
(1) the physical security plans of a cannabis establishment or the
criminal background of individual applicants that is obtained by the
department through the licensing process, (2) the supply and
distribution of cannabis by cannabis establishments, and (3) [qualified]
qualifying patient, [and] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver and
qualifying out-of-state caregiver information, shall be confidential and
shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act,
as defined in section 1-200.
Sec. 83. Section 21a-421q of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Qualifying patients and caregivers registered pursuant to chapter
420f, and qualifying out-of-state patients and qualifying out-of-state
caregivers, shall be permitted to purchase cannabis of higher potency,
varied dosage form, and in a larger per transaction or per day amount
than are generally available for retail purchase, as determined by the
commissioner. Such determination, if any, shall be published on the
Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site or included in
regulations adopted by the department.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the sale or
delivery of drug paraphernalia to a qualifying patient, [or] qualifying
out-of-state patient, caregiver or qualifying out-of-state caregiver or
person licensed pursuant to the provisions of RERACA or chapter 420f,
shall not be considered a violation of the provisions of RERACA.
Public Act No. 26-8 171 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Sec. 84. Section 21a-421r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
A licensed pharmacist working as an employee at a dispensary
facility or hybrid retailer shall transmit dispensing information, in a
manner prescribed by the commissioner, on any cannabis sold to a
qualifying patient, [or] qualifying out-of-state patient, caregiver or
qualifying out-of-state caregiver in real-time or immediately upon
completion of the transaction, unless not reasonably feasible for a
specific transaction, but in no case longer than one hour after completion
of the transaction.
Sec. 85. Section 21a-421s of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section, [: (1) "Container" (A)] "container"
(1) means an object that is offered, intended for sale or sold to a
consumer and directly contains an infused beverage, [or legacy infused
beverage,] and [(B)] (2) does not include an object or packaging that
indirectly contains, or contains in bulk for transportation purposes, an
infused beverage. [or legacy infused beverage; and
(2) "Legacy infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-425.]
(b) A fee of one dollar shall be assessed by a dispensary facility,
hybrid retailer or retailer on each infused beverage container [and
legacy infused beverage container] sold by such cannabis establishment.
Such fee shall not be subject to any sales tax or treated as income
pursuant to any provision of the general statutes.
(c) On [October 1, 2024, and every six months thereafter] the first days
of October and April, annually, each dispensary facility, hybrid retailer
or retailer shall remit payment to the department for each infused
beverage container [and legacy infused beverage container] sold during
Public Act No. 26-8 172 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the preceding six-month period. The funds received by the department
from infused beverage sales [and legacy infused beverage sales] shall be
deposited in the consumer protection enforcement account established
in section 21a-8a for the purposes of (1) protecting public health and
safety, (2) educating consumers and licensees, and (3) ensuring
compliance with cannabis and liquor control laws.
Sec. 86. Subsection (c) of section 21a-421aa of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(c) A retailer or hybrid retailer shall not knowingly sell to a consumer
more than one ounce of cannabis or the equivalent amount of cannabis
products or combination of cannabis and cannabis products, as set forth
in subsection (i) of section 21a-279a, per day, except that a hybrid retailer
or dispensary facility may sell up to five ounces of cannabis or the
equivalent amount of cannabis products or combination of cannabis and
cannabis products to a qualifying patient or caregiver, or a qualifying
out-of-state patient or qualifying out-of-state caregiver, per day.
Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive,
to avoid cannabis supply shortages or address a public health and safety
concern, the commissioner may set temporary lower per-transaction
limits, which shall be published on the department's Internet web site.
Such limits shall become ineffective upon the commissioner's
determination that a supply shortage or public health and safety
concern no longer exists.
Sec. 87. Subsection (b) of section 21a-421bb of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, cannabis
establishments shall not:
Public Act No. 26-8 173 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(1) Advertise, including, but not limited to, through a business name
or logo, cannabis, cannabis paraphernalia or goods or services related to
cannabis:
(A) In ways that target or are designed to appeal to individuals under
twenty-one years of age, including, but not limited to, spokespersons or
celebrities who appeal to individuals under the legal age to purchase
cannabis or cannabis products, depictions of a person under twenty-five
years of age consuming cannabis, or, the inclusion of objects, such as
toys, characters or cartoon characters, suggesting the presence of a
person under twenty-one years of age, or any other depiction designed
in any manner to be appealing to a person under twenty-one years of
age; or
(B) By using any image, or any other visual representation, of the
cannabis plant or any part of the cannabis plant, including, but not
limited to, the leaf of the cannabis plant;
(2) Engage in any advertising by means of any form of billboard
within one thousand five hundred feet of an elementary or secondary
school ground or a house of worship, recreation center or facility, child
care center, playground, public park or library, or engage in any
advertising by means of a billboard between the hours of six o'clock a.m.
and eleven o'clock p.m.;
(3) Engage in advertising by means of any television, radio, Internet,
mobile application, social media or other electronic communication,
billboard or other outdoor signage, or print publication unless the
cannabis establishment has reliable evidence that at least ninety per cent
of the audience for the advertisement is reasonably expected to be
twenty-one years of age or older;
(4) Engage in advertising or marketing directed toward location-
based devices, including, but not limited to, cellular phones, unless the
Public Act No. 26-8 174 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
marketing is a mobile device application installed on the device by the
owner of the device who is twenty-one years of age or older and
includes a permanent and easy opt-out feature and warnings that the
use of cannabis is restricted to persons twenty-one years of age or older;
(5) Advertise cannabis or cannabis products in a manner claiming or
implying, or permit any employee of the cannabis establishment to
claim or imply, that such products have curative or therapeutic effects,
or that any other medical claim is true, or allow any employee to
promote cannabis for a wellness purpose unless such claims are
substantiated as set forth in regulations adopted under chapter 420f or
verbally conveyed by a licensed pharmacist or other licensed medical
practitioner in the course of business in, or while representing, a hybrid
[retail] retailer or dispensary facility;
(6) Sponsor charitable, sports, musical, artistic, cultural, social or
other similar events or advertising at, or in connection with, such an
event unless the cannabis establishment has reliable evidence that (A)
not more than ten per cent of the in-person audience at the event is
reasonably expected to be under the legal age to purchase cannabis or
cannabis products, and (B) not more than ten per cent of the audience
that will watch, listen or participate in the event is expected to be under
the legal age to purchase cannabis products;
(7) Advertise cannabis, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia
in any physical form visible to the public within five hundred feet of an
elementary or secondary school ground or a recreation center or facility,
child care center, playground, public park or library;
(8) Cultivate cannabis or manufacture cannabis products for
distribution outside of this state in violation of federal law, advertise in
any way that encourages the transportation of cannabis across state lines
or otherwise encourages illegal activity;
Public Act No. 26-8 175 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(9) Except for dispensary facilities and hybrid retailers, exhibit
within or upon the outside of the facility used in the operation of a
cannabis establishment, or include in any advertisement, the word
"dispensary" or any variation of such term or any other words, displays
or symbols indicating that such store, shop or place of business is a
dispensary;]
[(10)] (9) Exhibit within or upon the outside of the premises subject to
the cannabis establishment license, or include in any advertisement the
words "drug store", "pharmacy", "apothecary", "drug", "drugs" or
"medicine shop" or any combination of such terms or any other words,
displays or symbols indicating that such store, shop or place of business
is a pharmacy;
[(11)] (10) Advertise on or in public or private vehicles or at bus stops,
taxi stands, transportation waiting areas, train stations, airports or other
similar transportation venues including, but not limited to, vinyl-
wrapped vehicles or signs or logos on transportation vehicles not
owned by a cannabis establishment;
[(12)] (11) Display cannabis, cannabis products or any image, or any
other visual representation, of the cannabis plant or any part of the
cannabis plant, including, but not limited to, the leaf of the cannabis
plant, so as to be clearly visible to a person from the exterior of the
facility used in the operation of a cannabis establishment, or display
signs or other printed material advertising any brand or any kind of
cannabis or cannabis product, or including any image, or any other
visual representation, of the cannabis plant or any part of the cannabis
plant, including, but not limited to, the leaf of the cannabis plant, on the
exterior of any facility used in the operation of a cannabis establishment;
[(13)] (12) Utilize radio or loudspeaker, in a vehicle or in or outside of
a facility used in the operation of a cannabis establishment, for the
purposes of advertising the sale of cannabis or cannabis products;
Public Act No. 26-8 176 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(14)] (13) Operate any Internet web site advertising or depicting
cannabis, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia unless such
Internet web site verifies that the entrants or users are twenty-one years
of age or older; or
[(15)] (14) Engage in advertising or marketing that includes a
discounted price or other promotional offering as an inducement to
purchase any cannabis or cannabis product that is not a medical
[marijuana] cannabis product, except a discounted price or promotional
offering may be offered, as an inducement to purchase cannabis, (A)
within a dispensary facility, retailer or hybrid retailer, (B) through a
delivery service, or (C) on an Internet web site maintained by or for a
dispensary facility, retailer or hybrid retailer where cannabis or
cannabis products may be lawfully ordered.
Sec. 88. Section 21a-421ddd of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any person twenty-three years of age or older who sells, delivers or
gives cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by
this act, to any person under twenty-one years of age, and who knew or
should have known that such person was under twenty-one years of
age, shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 89. Subsection (a) of section 21a-422g of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) Upon the petition of not less than ten per cent of the electors of
any municipality, lodged with the town clerk at least sixty days before
the date of any regular election, as defined in section 9-1, the selectmen
of the municipality shall warn the electors of such municipality that, at
such regular election, a vote shall be taken to determine: (1) Whether or
not the recreational sale of [marijuana] cannabis shall be permitted in
Public Act No. 26-8 177 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
such municipality, or (2) whether the sale of [marijuana] cannabis shall
be permitted in such municipality in one or more of the classes of license
of cannabis establishments. The ballot label designations in a vote upon
the question of cannabis establishment license shall be "Shall the sale of
recreational [marijuana] cannabis be allowed in .... (Name of
municipality)?" or "Shall the sale of cannabis under (Specified license or
Licenses) be allowed in .... (Name of municipality)?" or "Shall the sale of
recreational [marijuana] cannabis be prohibited (No Licenses) in ....
(Name of municipality)?" and shall be provided in accordance with the
provisions of section 9-250. No elector shall vote for more than one
designation. Such vote shall be taken in the manner prescribed in section
9-369 and shall become effective on the first Monday of the month next
succeeding such election and shall remain in force until a new vote is
taken; provided such vote may be taken at a special election called for
the purpose in conformity with the provisions of section 9-164 and
provided at least one year shall have elapsed since the previous vote
was taken. The provisions of chapter 145 concerning absentee voting at
referenda shall apply to all votes taken upon the question of cannabis
establishment license. Any class of cannabis establishments already
allowed in a municipality shall not be affected by any vote.
Sec. 90. Section 21a-422k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Material change" means: (A) The addition of a backer, (B) a
change in the ownership interest of an existing backer, (C) the merger,
consolidation or other affiliation of a cannabis establishment with
another cannabis establishment, (D) the acquisition of all or part of a
cannabis establishment by another cannabis establishment or backer,
and (E) the transfer of assets or security interests from a cannabis
establishment to another cannabis establishment or backer;
Public Act No. 26-8 178 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(2) "Cannabis establishment" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
(3) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-420, as
amended by this act; and
(4) "Transfer" means to sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey,
give or otherwise dispose of or transfer control over, including, but not
limited to, transfer by way of merger or joint venture not in the ordinary
course of business.
(b) No person shall, directly or indirectly, enter into a transaction that
results in a material change to a cannabis establishment, unless all
parties involved in the transaction file a written notification with the
Attorney General pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and the
waiting period described in subsection (d) of this section has expired.
(c) The written notice required under subsection (b) of this section
shall be in such form and contain such documentary material and
information relevant to the proposed transaction as the Attorney
General deems necessary and appropriate to enable the Attorney
General to determine whether such transaction, if consummated, would
violate antitrust laws.
(d) The waiting period required under subsection (b) of this section
shall begin on the date of the receipt by the Attorney General's office of
the completed notification required under subsection (c) of this section
from all parties to the transaction and shall end on the thirtieth day after
the date of such receipt, unless such time is extended pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section.
(e) The Attorney General may, in individual cases, terminate the
waiting period specified in subsection (d) of this section and allow any
person to proceed with any transaction.
Public Act No. 26-8 179 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(f) The Attorney General may, prior to the expiration of the thirty-day
waiting period, require the submission of additional information or
documentary material relevant to the proposed transaction from a
person required to file notification with respect to such transaction
under subsection (b) of this section. Upon request for additional
information under this subsection, the waiting period shall be extended
until thirty days after the parties have substantially complied, as
determined solely by the Attorney General, with such request for
additional information.
(g) Any information or documentary material filed with the Attorney
General pursuant to this section shall not be subject to disclosure under
the Freedom of Information Act, as defined in section 1-200, and no such
information or documentary material may be made public, except as
may be relevant to any administrative or judicial action or proceeding.
Such information or documentary material shall be returned to the
person furnishing such information or documentary material upon the
termination of the Attorney General's review or final determination of
any action or proceeding commenced thereunder.
(h) (1) Any person, or any officer, director or partner thereof, who
fails to comply with any provision of this section shall be liable to the
state for a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars
for each day during which such person is in violation of this section.
Such penalty may be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney
General.
(2) If any person, or any officer, director, partner, agent or employee
thereof, fails substantially to comply with the notification requirement
under subsection (b) of this section or any request for the submission of
additional information or documentary material under subsection (f) of
this section within the waiting period specified in subsection (d) of this
section and as may be extended under subsection (f) of this section, the
court:
Public Act No. 26-8 180 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(A) May order compliance;
(B) Shall extend the waiting period specified in subsection (d) of this
section and as may have been extended under subsection (f) of this
section until there has been substantial compliance, except that, in the
case of a tender offer, the court may not extend such waiting period on
the basis of a failure, by the person whose stock is sought to be acquired,
to comply substantially with such notification requirement or any such
request; and
(C) May grant such other equitable relief as the court in its discretion
determines necessary or appropriate, upon application of the Attorney
General.
(i) (1) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of any
transaction described in subsection (b) of this section that involves a
cannabis establishment license awarded to a social equity applicant, all
parties involved in such transaction shall submit to the Social Equity
Council, in a form and manner prescribed by the council, a written
notice disclosing (A) the effective date of such transaction, (B) the
identity of each party to such transaction, (C) the nature of each cannabis
establishment involved in such transaction, broken down by license
type, and (D) the nature, and a detailed description of, each material
change made to a cannabis establishment involved in such transaction.
(2) The Social Equity Council shall post a copy of each written notice
the council receives under subdivision (1) of this subsection on the
council's Internet web site.
Sec. 91. Subsection (a) of section 21a-422l of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, "cannabis" has the same meaning as
provided in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act, and
Public Act No. 26-8 181 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
"electronic cannabis delivery system" and "vapor product" have the
same meanings as provided in section 19a-342a, as amended by this act.
No hotel, motel or similar lodging shall prohibit the legal possession or
consumption of cannabis in any nonpublic area of such hotel, motel or
similar lodging.
Sec. 92. Section 21a-422m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this section, "hospital" has the same meaning as provided
in section 19a-490 and "cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in
section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act. No hospital shall be
required to allow a patient to use cannabis while at such hospital. A
hospital may have a policy that sets forth restrictions patients shall
follow regarding cannabis use.
Sec. 93. Section 21a-425 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
For the purposes of this section, sections 21a-425a, as amended by this
act, 21a-425b, as amended by this act, 21a-425e, as amended by this act,
and 21a-425f, as amended by this act:
(1) "Alcoholic beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
30-1, as amended by this act;
(2) "Cannabis" [means marijuana, as defined] has the same meaning
as provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act;
(3) "Cannabis establishment" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
(4) "Cannabis product" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-8 182 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(5) "Cannabis testing laboratory" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-408, as amended by this act;
(6) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(7) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-420,
as amended by this act;
(8) "Container" (A) means an object that is offered, intended for sale
or sold to a consumer and directly contains an infused beverage or high-
THC beverage, and (B) does not include an object or packaging that
indirectly contains, or contains in bulk for transportation purposes, an
infused beverage or high-THC beverage;
(9) "Cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-420,
as amended by this act;
(10) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
(11) "Dispensary facility" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
(12) "Food and beverage manufacturer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
(13) "Hemp" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-61l, as
amended by this act;
(14) "Hemp producer" means producer, as defined in section 22-61l,
as amended by this act;
(15) "Hemp products" has the same meaning as provided in section
22-61l, as amended by this act;
(16) "High-THC beverage" means a beverage that (A) is not an
Public Act No. 26-8 183 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
alcoholic beverage, (B) is intended for human consumption, (C)
contains, or is advertised, labeled or offered for sale as containing, total
THC per container that is greater than [three milligrams] the maximum
total THC per container allowable for an infused beverage, and (D)
contains THC solely derived from hemp (i) grown by a United States
Department of Agriculture hemp producer licensee under an approved
state or tribal hemp production plan, and (ii) with a total THC
concentration of not more than three-tenths per cent on a dry-weight
basis or by volume, as applicable;
(17) "Hybrid retailer" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
(18) "Infused beverage" means a beverage that (A) is not an alcoholic
beverage, (B) is intended for human consumption, and (C) contains, or
is advertised, labeled or offered for sale as containing, total THC that is
not greater than [three] (i) five milligrams per container, with an
allowable variance for cannabis testing laboratory method uncertainty
of up to plus or minus ten per cent of the reported value for THC, if the
beverage is sold or offered for sale (I) on premises operating under a
package store permit issued under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as
amended by this act, or (II) on the premises of an infused beverage
manufacturer under subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of section 21a-
425a, as amended by this act, or (ii) ten milligrams per container, with
an allowable variance for cannabis testing laboratory method
uncertainty of up to plus or minus ten per cent of the reported value for
THC, if the beverage is sold or offered for sale at a dispensary facility,
hybrid retailer or retailer;
(19) "Infused beverage manufacturer" means a person licensed by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to section 21a-425a, as
amended by this act;
(20) "Infused beverage wholesaler" (A) means a person that has been
Public Act No. 26-8 184 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
issued an infused beverage wholesaler license under section 21a-425e,
as amended by this act, and (B) does not include the holder of a
wholesaler permit or a wholesaler permit for beer issued under section
30-17;
[(21) "Legacy infused beverage" means a beverage that (A) is not an
alcoholic beverage, (B) is intended for human consumption, (C)
contains, or is advertised, labeled or offered for sale as containing, THC,
and (D) as of June 30, 2024, is in compliance with (i) the provisions of
RERACA, and (ii) the policies and procedures issued by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection to implement, and any
regulations adopted pursuant to, RERACA;]
[(22)] (21) "Micro-cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(23)] (22) "Manufacturer hemp product" has the same meaning as
provided in section 22-61l, as amended by this act;
[(24)] (23) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act;
[(25)] (24) "Producer" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(26)] (25) "Product manufacturer" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(27)] (26) "RERACA" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(28)] (27) "Retailer" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act;
[(29)] (28) "THC" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240, as amended by this act; and
Public Act No. 26-8 185 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(30)] (29) "Total THC" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-240, as amended by this act.
Sec. 94. Section 21a-425a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 22-61m, as amended
by this act, and 22-61n, as amended by this act, and except as provided
in subsection (c) of this section, no person shall [, on or after October 1,
2024,] manufacture any infused beverage that is intended to be sold or
offered for sale in this state unless such person has received an infused
beverage manufacturer license issued by the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection pursuant to this section.
(b) A person seeking an infused beverage manufacturer license under
this section shall submit to the Department of Consumer Protection, in
a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, an application accompanied by an application fee in the
amount of five thousand dollars. Each license issued pursuant to this
section shall be valid for a period of one year, and shall be renewable for
additional one-year periods upon submission of a renewal application
in the manner, and payment of a renewal fee in the amount, set forth for
an initial application under this subsection. All fees collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the consumer protection enforcement
account established in section 21a-8a.
(c) (1) A cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage manufacturer
or product manufacturer, or a producer that has received expanded
authorization to engage in the adult use cannabis market under the
producer's license issued pursuant to section 21a-408i, as amended by
this act, may [, beginning on October 1, 2024,] manufacture infused
beverages in this state that are intended to be sold or offered for sale in
this state if such cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage
Public Act No. 26-8 186 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
manufacturer, product manufacturer or producer submits to the
Department of Consumer Protection, in a form and manner prescribed
by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, a written request to
manufacture such infused beverages, and the commissioner approves
such written request.
(2) A cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage manufacturer,
product manufacturer or producer that receives approval from the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be subject to all provisions of this section, and all
regulations, policies and procedures adopted or issued pursuant to
subsection [(k)] (l) of this section, applicable to infused beverage
manufacturers, except no such cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and
beverage manufacturer, product manufacturer or producer shall be
subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
(d) (1) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] An infused beverage
manufacturer shall only obtain [any] hemp, [product] a hemp product
or an intermediate hemp derivative for the purpose of manufacturing
any infused beverage that is intended to be sold or offered for sale in
this state unless such hemp product is in the form of hemp oil or an
intermediate hemp derivative, and no such infused beverage
manufacturer shall use any hemp product other than hemp oil or an
intermediate hemp derivative to manufacture any such infused
beverage.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the
interstate transportation of any product in violation of federal law,
including, but not limited to, the United States Agricultural Marketing
Act of 1946, 7 USC 1639o et seq., as amended from time to time, and no
intermediate hemp derivative shall be further distributed for resale.
[(2) Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] (3) No infused beverage
manufacturer shall obtain any hemp [oil] for the purpose of
Public Act No. 26-8 187 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
manufacturing any infused beverage that is intended to be sold or
offered for sale in this state unless such hemp: [oil:
(A) Is derived from hemp;
(B)] (A) (i) Was extracted from hemp grown by (I) a hemp producer,
as evidenced by a certificate of authenticity issued by the hemp
producer, or (II) a licensed hemp grower regulated by a state, territory
or federally recognized Indian tribe, and in accordance with a state or
tribal plan approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, as
evidenced by a certificate of authenticity issued by such licensed hemp
grower, or (ii) was extracted (I) by a person who is actively credentialed
by a state or federally recognized Indian tribe to extract hemp, and (II)
in a facility that is credentialed by a state or federally recognized Indian
tribe; and
[(C)] (B) Was extracted from hemp by using (i) a Class 3 residual
solvent within the meaning of the most recent United States
Pharmacopeia, Chapter 467, as amended from time to time, (ii) a solvent
generally recognized as safe pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act, or (iii) a solvent approved by the Department of
Consumer Protection and posted on the department's Internet web site.
[(3) Beginning on October 1, 2024, each] (4) Each infused beverage
manufacturer that manufactures any infused beverage that is intended
to be sold or offered for sale in this state shall:
(A) Not manufacture any such infused beverage with total THC that
exceeds [three] (i) five milligrams per container, with an allowable
variance for cannabis testing laboratory method uncertainty of up to
plus or minus ten per cent of the reported value for THC, if the beverage
is to be sold or offered for sale (I) on premises operating under a package
store permit issued under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as amended
by this act, or (II) on the premises of such infused beverage
Public Act No. 26-8 188 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
manufacturer under subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of this section, or
(ii) ten milligrams per container, with an allowable variance for cannabis
testing laboratory method uncertainty of up to plus or minus ten per
cent of the reported value for THC, if the beverage is to be sold or offered
for sale at a dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer;
(B) Manufacture such infused beverage by using equipment that is
exclusively used to manufacture an infused beverage or prepared in
accordance with good manufacturing practices as set forth in 21 CFR
Parts 110 and 111, as amended from time to time, as applicable; and
(C) Ensure that all hemp oil and intermediate hemp derivative such
infused beverage manufacturer possesses to manufacture such infused
beverage is (i) stored in a secure, locked location separate from any
cannabis, (ii) clearly and conspicuously labeled as hemp oil or
intermediate hemp derivative solely for use in manufacturing an
infused beverage, and (iii) solely used for the purpose of manufacturing
an infused beverage.
(e) (1) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No infused beverage that is
sold or offered for sale in this state shall include (A) any additive that (i)
is psychotropic, or (ii) could increase the potency, toxicity or addictive
properties of the infused beverage, including, but not limited to, caffeine
other than caffeine naturally occurring in chocolate, coffee or tea, or (B)
total THC that exceeds [three] (i) five milligrams per container, with an
allowable variance for cannabis testing laboratory method uncertainty
of up to plus or minus ten per cent of the reported value for THC, if the
beverage is sold or offered for sale (I) on premises operating under a
package store permit issued under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as
amended by this act, or (II) on the premises of such infused beverage
manufacturer under subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of this section, or
(ii) ten milligrams per container, with an allowable variance for cannabis
testing laboratory method uncertainty of up to plus or minus ten per
cent of the reported value for THC, if the beverage is sold or offered for
Public Act No. 26-8 189 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
sale at a dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer.
(2) (A) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, each] Each lot of an infused
beverage in final form shall be tested by a cannabis testing laboratory or
a similarly qualified laboratory that is located in, and licensed by,
another state. A statistically significant number of samples shall be
collected from such lot and submitted to the cannabis testing laboratory
or out-of-state laboratory for final product testing in a manner approved
by the Department of Consumer Protection. Such sampling and final
product testing shall be conducted by using a representative sample of
such lot and by collecting a minimum number of sample increments
relative to the size of such lot.
(B) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No infused beverage shall be
sold or offered for sale in this state unless the infused beverage meets (i)
the laboratory testing standards for cannabis established in, and any
regulations, policies and procedures adopted or issued pursuant to,
section 21a-421j, as amended by this act, or (ii) such other testing
standards as may be approved by the Department of Consumer
Protection and posted on the department's Internet web site.
(3) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No infused beverage sold or
offered for sale in this state shall be packaged, labeled or advertised in
any manner that is likely to mislead an individual by incorporating any
statement, brand, design, representation, picture, illustration or other
depiction that:
(A) Bears a reasonable resemblance to trademarked or characteristic
packaging of (i) cannabis offered for sale (I) in this state by a cannabis
establishment licensed in this state, or (II) on tribal land by a tribal-
credentialed cannabis entity, or (ii) a commercially available product
other than a cannabis product; or
(B) Appeals to individuals who are younger than twenty-one years of
Public Act No. 26-8 190 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
age by, among other things, (i) making use of any spokesperson or
celebrity who appeals to such individuals, (ii) depicting any individual
who is younger than twenty-five years of age consuming cannabis or an
infused beverage, (iii) including any object, such as a toy, character or
cartoon character, which suggests the presence of any individual who is
younger than twenty-one years of age, or (iv) making use of any other
method that is designed to appeal to any individual who is younger
than twenty-one years of age.
(4) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, each] Each infused beverage
container sold or offered for sale in this state shall prominently display
(A) a symbol, in a size of not less than one-half inch by one-half inch and
in a format approved by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection,
that indicates that such infused beverage is not legal or safe for
individuals younger than twenty-one years of age, and (B) a symbol that
satisfies ASTM International standard D8441.
(f) (1) No infused beverage manufacturer shall sell an infused
beverage to any person in this state other than (A) a dispensary facility,
(B) a hybrid retailer, (C) a retailer, (D) the holder of a wholesaler permit
or a wholesaler permit for beer issued under section 30-17, [or] (E) an
infused beverage wholesaler, or (F) a consumer for off-premises
consumption under subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of this section.
(2) A dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer, before selling an
infused beverage to a consumer in this state, a wholesaler permittee
under section 30-17, before selling an infused beverage to a package
store permittee under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as amended by this
act, or an infused beverage wholesaler, before selling an infused
beverage to a dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or retailer or a package
store permittee under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as amended by this
act, shall, based on a representative sample of the infused beverage
containers included in the shipment that includes such infused
beverage, (A) verify that the infused beverages included in such
Public Act No. 26-8 191 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
shipment satisfy the requirements established in subdivision (3) of
subsection (e) of this section and any regulations adopted, and policies
and procedures issued, pursuant to subsection [(k)] (l) of this section,
and (B) for the purpose of preserving public health and safety, verify
that the infused beverages included in such shipment were
manufactured in accordance with requirements that are substantially
similar to the requirements established in subsections (d) and (e) of this
section and any regulations adopted, and policies and procedures
issued, pursuant to subsection [(k)] (l) of this section if such infused
beverages were manufactured (i) in a facility located in, and regulated
by, another state, and (ii) by a person who is regulated as a food or
nonalcoholic beverage manufacturer.
(g) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No cannabis establishment or
infused beverage manufacturer, or agent or employee of a cannabis
establishment or infused beverage manufacturer, shall gift or transfer
any infused beverage to a consumer, at no cost to the consumer, as part
of a commercial transaction.
(h) (1) An infused beverage manufacturer may engage in the retail
sale of beverages to be consumed on the premises operating under the
license issued to the infused beverage manufacturer pursuant to this
section, provided (A) such beverages are manufactured on such
premises in accordance with applicable law, (B) such sales are made,
and beverages are consumed, (i) in a room or area that is physically
separated from the room or area in which the infused beverage
manufacturer manufactures infused beverages, and (ii) in accordance
with applicable law, and (C) no such beverage is an infused beverage,
an alcoholic beverage or contains THC.
(2) (A) An infused beverage manufacturer may engage in the retail
sale of infused beverages to be consumed off the premises operating
under the license issued to the infused beverage manufacturer pursuant
to this section, provided (i) such infused beverages are (I) manufactured
Public Act No. 26-8 192 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
on such premises in accordance with the provisions of this section, and
(II) sold in accordance with the provisions of this section and section
21a-425b, as amended by this act, (ii) such sales are made in a room or
area that is physically separated from the room or area in which the
infused beverage manufacturer manufactures infused beverages, and
(iii) such infused beverage manufacturer does not sell more than twelve
containers per day to a consumer.
(B) Each infused beverage manufacturer that engages in retail sales
under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall assess a fee of one
dollar on each infused beverage container sold at retail. Such fee shall
not be subject to any sales tax or treated as income pursuant to any
provision of the general statutes. Beginning on April 1, 2027, and every
six months thereafter, each infused beverage manufacturer shall remit
payment to the Department of Consumer Protection for each infused
beverage container sold during the preceding six-month period. The
funds received by the department from infused beverage sales shall be
deposited in the consumer protection enforcement account established
in section 21a-8a for the purposes of (i) protecting public health and
safety, (ii) educating consumers and licensees, and (iii) ensuring
compliance with cannabis and liquor control laws.
[(h) Beginning on October 1, 2024, the] (i) The Commissioner of
Consumer Protection may request that an infused beverage
manufacturer submit to the Department of Consumer Protection, in a
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, documentation
sufficient to demonstrate that the infused beverage manufacturer is in
compliance with the provisions of this section. The infused beverage
manufacturer shall promptly provide such documentation to the
department.
[(i) Beginning on October 1, 2024, each] (j) Each infused beverage
manufacturer shall be subject to the investigation and enforcement
provisions set forth in section 21a-421p.
Public Act No. 26-8 193 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(j) Beginning on October 1, 2024, if] (k) If the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection determines, after consulting with the Attorney
General, that the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018, P.L. 115-334, as
amended from time to time, has been amended in a manner that
conflicts with any provision of this section, the commissioner shall
prepare and submit a report, in coordination with the Attorney General
and in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to consumer protection. Such report shall, at a
minimum, set forth the scope of such conflict and recommendations to
resolve such conflict. The commissioner shall submit such report: (1)
Not later than thirty days after the United States Department of
Agriculture announces such amendment, if the General Assembly is in
session; or (2) not later than sixty days after the United States
Department of Agriculture announces such amendment, if the General
Assembly is not in session.
[(k)] (l) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
implement the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the
requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, the commissioner
shall, prior to adopting such regulations and in order to effectuate the
provisions of this section, issue policies and procedures to implement
the provisions of this section that shall have the force and effect of law.
The commissioner shall post all policies and procedures on the
Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site, and submit
such policies and procedures to the Secretary of the State for posting on
the eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective date
of any policy or procedure. Any such policy or procedure shall no longer
be effective upon the earlier of either the adoption of the policy or
procedure as a final regulation under section 4-172 or forty-eight
months from July 1, 2024, if such regulations have not been submitted
to the legislative regulation review committee for consideration under
Public Act No. 26-8 194 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
section 4-170.
[(l) Beginning on October 1, 2024, and following] (m) Following a
hearing conducted in accordance with chapter 54, the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection may impose an administrative civil penalty, not
to exceed five thousand dollars per violation, and suspend, revoke or
place conditions upon any infused beverage manufacturer that violates
any provision of this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to
subsection [(k)] (l) of this section. All administrative civil penalties
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the consumer
protection enforcement account established in section 21a-8a.
[(m) Beginning on October 1, 2024, the] (n) The Commissioner of
Consumer Protection may, pursuant to section 4-182, summarily
suspend any credential the commissioner or Department of Consumer
Protection has issued to any person who violates any provision of this
section.
[(n)] (o) Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be
deemed an unfair or deceptive trade practice under subsection (a) of
section 42-110b.
Sec. 95. Section 21a-425b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No infused beverage shall
be sold, offered for sale or distributed in this state unless:
(A) The infused beverage is sold or offered for sale (i) on premises
operating under a package store permit issued pursuant to subsection
(b) of section 30-20, as amended by this act, [or] (ii) at a dispensary
facility, hybrid retailer or retailer, or (iii) on the premises of an infused
beverage manufacturer under subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of
section 21a-425a, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-8 195 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(B) If the infused beverage is sold at a dispensary facility, hybrid
retailer or retailer, the infused beverage is stored and displayed
separately from any cannabis, in the same manner provided for
manufacturer hemp products, in accordance with section 21a-409, as
amended by this act, 21a-420s or 21a-420r, as amended by this act,
respectively; and
(C) The infused beverage meets the standards set forth for
manufacturer hemp products in subsections (v) and (x) of section 22-
61m.
(2) [Beginning on July 1, 2024, no] No infused beverage shall be sold,
or offered for sale, at retail to any individual in this state by way of any
indirect means, including, but not limited to, by way of mail or any
telephonic or other electronic means.
(b) No infused beverage shall be sold to any individual who is
younger than twenty-one years of age. No owner, agent or employee of
a package store permitted under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as
amended by this act, [or] of a dispensary facility, hybrid retailer or
retailer [,] or of an infused beverage manufacturer shall sell any infused
beverage to an individual without first verifying the individual's age
with a valid government-issued driver's license or identity card to
establish that such individual is twenty-one years of age or older.
(c) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, no] No person shall sell, or offer
for sale, any infused beverage in any container containing less than
twelve fluid ounces, or any packaging comprised of more than [four]
twelve containers.
[(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) to (c),
inclusive, of this section, a dispensary facility, hybrid retailer, retailer or
package store that has received a waiver from the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection under section 21a-425d may, during the period
Public Act No. 26-8 196 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
beginning on July 1, 2024, and ending on September 30, 2024, sell legacy
infused beverages in accordance with such waiver and the requirements
set forth in section 21a-425d.]
[(e)] (d) Any violation of the provisions of subsections (a) to (c),
inclusive, of this section shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive trade
practice under subsection (a) of section 42-110b.
Sec. 96. Subsection (f) of section 21a-425e of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) Each infused beverage wholesaler shall assess a fee of one dollar
on each infused beverage container sold to the holder of a package store
permit issued under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as amended by this
act, or to a retailer, hybrid retailer or dispensary facility. Such fee shall
not be subject to any sales tax or treated as income pursuant to any
provision of the general statutes. [Beginning on October 1, 2025, and
every six months thereafter] On the first days of October and April,
annually, each infused beverage wholesaler shall remit payment to the
Department of Consumer Protection for each infused beverage
container sold during the preceding six-month period. The funds
received by the department from infused beverage sales shall be
deposited in the consumer protection enforcement account established
in section 21a-8a for the purposes of (1) protecting public health and
safety, (2) educating consumers and licensees, and (3) ensuring
compliance with cannabis and liquor control laws.
Sec. 97. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21a-425f of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [On and after January 1, 2026, no] No person shall manufacture a
high-THC beverage in this state unless such person is an infused
Public Act No. 26-8 197 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
beverage manufacturer that has received a high-THC beverage
endorsement issued by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection
pursuant to this section. A high-THC beverage endorsement shall
authorize the infused beverage manufacturer to manufacture high-THC
beverages for sale exclusively outside of this state. No infused beverage
manufacturer shall advertise, offer or sell any high-THC beverage in this
state or offer or sell any high-THC beverage directly to any individual.
An infused beverage manufacturer shall verify that purchasers of high-
THC beverages intend to engage in the commercial resale of such
beverages exclusively outside of this state.
(b) [Beginning on January 1, 2026, an] An infused beverage
manufacturer seeking a high-THC beverage endorsement under this
section shall submit an application to the Department of Consumer
Protection in a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection.
Sec. 98. Subdivision (7) of subsection (a) of section 21a-426 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(7) "Moderate-THC hemp product" (A) means a manufacturer hemp
product that has a total THC, as defined in section 21a-240, as amended
by this act, concentration of not less than one-half of one milligram, and
not more than five milligrams, on a per-container basis, and (B) does not
include [(i)] an infused beverage, as defined in section 21a-425, as
amended by this act; [, or (ii) a legacy infused beverage, as defined in
section 21a-425;] and
Sec. 99. Section 22-61l of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) For the purpose of this section and section 22-61m, as amended by
this act, the following terms have the same meaning as provided in 7
Public Act No. 26-8 198 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
CFR 990.1, as amended from time to time: "Acceptable hemp THC level",
"Agricultural marketing service", "Audit", "Cannabis", "Conviction",
"Corrective action plan", "Culpable mental state greater than
negligence", "Decarboxylated", "Decarboxylation", "Disposal", "Dry
weight basis", "Gas chromatography", "Geospatial location", "Handle",
"Liquid chromatography", "Immature plants", "Information sharing
system", "Measurement of uncertainty", "Negligence",
"Phytocannabinoid", "Postdecarboxylation", "Remediation", "Reverse
distributor" and "Total THC". In addition, for the purpose of this section,
[and] section 22-61m, as amended by this act, and sections 100 and 101
of this act:
(1) "Cannabidiol" or "CBD" means the nonpsychotropic compound by
the same name;
(2) "Cannabis" (A) means all parts of any plant or species of the genus
cannabis, or any infra specific taxon thereof, whether growing or not;
(B) includes (i) every resin extracted from any part of such plant,
including, but not limited to, every resin extracted from (I) the mature
stalks of such plant, (II) the fiber produced from the mature stalks of
such plant, or (III) the oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant, (ii)
every other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
preparation of such plant or its resin, and (iii) every (I) high-THC hemp
product, as defined in section 21a-240, as amended by this act, (II)
manufactured cannabinoid, as defined in section 21a-240, as amended
by this act, or (III) cannabinol or cannabidiol and chemical compounds
which are similar to cannabinol or cannabidiol in chemical structure or
which are similar thereto in physiological effect, which are controlled
substances under this chapter, except cannabidiol derived from hemp,
that is not a high-THC hemp product; and (C) does not include (i) the
mature stalks of such plant, (ii) the fiber produced from the mature
stalks of such plant, (iii) the oil or cake made from the seeds of such
plant, (iv) any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture
Public Act No. 26-8 199 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
or preparation of the mature stalks of such plant, (v) the seeds of such
plant, (vi) hemp (I) with a total THC, as defined in section 21a-240, as
amended by this act, concentration of not more than three-tenths per
cent on a dry-weight basis, and (II) that is not a high-THC hemp
product, (vii) cannabinol, cannabigerol, cannabichromene or any other
minor cannabinoid derived from hemp, (viii) any substance approved
by the federal Food and Drug Administration or successor agency as a
drug and reclassified in any schedule of controlled substances or
unscheduled by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or
successor agency that is included in the same schedule designated by
the federal Drug Enforcement Administration or successor agency, or
(ix) any infused beverage, as defined in section 21a-425, as amended by
this act;
[(2)] (3) "Certificate of analysis" means a certificate from a laboratory
describing the results of the laboratory's testing of a sample;
[(3)] (4) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture, or
the commissioner's designated agent;
[(4)] (5) "Cultivate" means to plant, grow, harvest, handle and store a
plant or crop;
[(5)] (6) "Federal act" means the United States Agricultural Marketing
Act of 1946, 7 USC 1639o et seq., as amended from time to time;
[(6)] (7) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture;
[(7)] (8) "Hemp" has the same meaning as provided in the federal act;
[(8)] (9) "Hemp products" means all manufacturer hemp products
and producer hemp products;
[(9)] (10) "Independent testing laboratory" means a facility:
(A) For which no person who has any direct or indirect financial or
Public Act No. 26-8 200 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
managerial interest in the laboratory and also has any direct or indirect
interest in a facility that:
(i) Produces, distributes, manufactures or sells hemp or hemp
products, or [marijuana] cannabis in any state or territory of the United
States; or
(ii) Cultivates, processes, distributes, dispenses or sells [marijuana]
cannabis; and
(B) That is accredited as a laboratory in compliance with section 21a-
408-59 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies;
(11) "Infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-425, as amended by this act;
(12) "Infused beverage manufacturer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-425, as amended by this act;
(13) "Intermediate hemp derivative" means an oil or concentrate that
(A) is extracted directly and exclusively from raw hemp plant material,
(B) contains a total THC, as defined in section 21a-240, as amended by
this act, concentration of more than 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis,
and (C) is extracted by (i) adding heat, (ii) decarboxylation, (iii) adding
(I) a Class 3 organic solvent within the meaning of the most recent
United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 467, as amended from time to
time, or (II) another solvent approved by the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection, (iv) ethanol extraction, (v) carbon dioxide
extraction, (vi) a solventless extraction method, including, but not
limited to, the use of ice water, rosin pressing, dry sifting or steam
distillation, or (vii) an extraction process not set forth in subparagraphs
(C)(i) to (C)(vi), inclusive, of this subdivision, provided such extraction
process has been approved by the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
Public Act No. 26-8 201 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(10)] (14) "Laboratory" means a laboratory that meets the
requirements of 7 CFR 990.3 and that is accredited as a testing laboratory
to International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025 by a third-
party accrediting body such as the American Association for Laboratory
Accreditation or the Assured Calibration and Laboratory Accreditation
Select Services;
[(11)] (15) "Law enforcement agency" means the Connecticut State
Police, the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, the
Department of Agriculture, the Department of Consumer Protection
Drug Control Division or any other federal, state or local law
enforcement agency or drug suppression unit;
[(12)] (16) "Licensee" means an individual or entity that possesses a
license to produce or manufacture hemp or hemp products in this state;
[(13)] (17) "Manufacture" means the conversion of the hemp plant into
a by-product or an extract by means of (A) adding heat, [solvents or] (B)
decarboxylation, (C) adding (i) a Class 3 organic solvent within the
meaning of the most recent United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 467,
as amended from time to time, or (ii) another solvent approved by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection, (D) ethanol extraction, (E)
carbon dioxide extraction, (F) a solventless extraction method,
including, but not limited to, the use of ice water, rosin pressing, dry
sifting or steam distillation, or (G) any method of extraction that
modifies the original composition of the plant for the purpose of
creating a manufacturer hemp product for commercial or research
purposes;
[(14)] (18) "Manufacturer" means a person in the state licensed by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection to manufacture, handle, store
and market manufacturer hemp products pursuant to the provisions of
section 22-61m, as amended by this act, and any regulation adopted
pursuant to section 22-61m, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-8 202 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(15) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240;]
[(16)] (19) "Market" or "marketing" means promoting, distributing or
selling a hemp product within the state, in another state or outside of
the United States and includes efforts to advertise and gather
information about the needs or preferences of potential consumers or
suppliers;
[(17)] (20) "On-site manager" means the individual designated by the
producer license applicant or producer responsible for on-site
management and operations of a licensed producer;
[(18)] (21) "Pesticide" has the same meaning as "pesticide chemical" as
provided in section 21a-92;
[(19)] (22) "Lot" means a contiguous area in a field, greenhouse or
indoor growing structure containing the same variety or strain of hemp
throughout the area;
[(20)] (23) "Post-harvest sample" means a representative sample of the
form of hemp taken from the harvested hemp from a particular lot's
harvest that is collected in accordance with the procedures established
by the commissioner;
[(21)] (24) "Pre-harvest sample" means a composite, representative
portion from plants in a hemp lot, that is collected in accordance with
the procedures established by the commissioner;
[(22)] (25) "Produce" means to cultivate hemp or create any producer
hemp product;
[(23)] (26) "State plan" means a state plan, as described in the federal
act and as authorized pursuant to this section;
[(24)] (27) "THC" means delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol;
Public Act No. 26-8 203 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(25)] (28) "Controlled Substances Act" or "CSA" means the
Controlled Substances Act as codified in 21 USC 801 et seq.;
[(26)] (29) "Criminal history report" means the fingerprint-based state
and national criminal history record information obtained in accordance
with section 29-17a;
[(27)] (30) "Drug Enforcement Administration" or "DEA" means the
United States Drug Enforcement Administration;
[(28)] (31) "Farm service agency" or "FSA" means an agency of the
United States Department of Agriculture;
[(29)] (32) "Key participant" means a sole proprietor, a partner in
partnership or a person with executive managerial control in an entity,
including persons such as a chief executive officer, chief operating
officer and chief financial officer;
[(30)] (33) "Manufacturer hemp product" (A) means a commodity
manufactured from the hemp plant, for commercial or research
purposes, that (i) is intended for human ingestion, inhalation,
absorption or other internal consumption, [that] and (ii) contains a THC
concentration of not more than 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis or per
volume or weight of such manufacturer hemp product, and (B) does not
include an infused beverage; [, as defined in section 21a-425;]
[(31)] (34) "Producer" means an individual or entity licensed by the
commissioner to produce and market producer hemp products
pursuant to the federal act, the state plan, the provisions of this section
and the regulations adopted pursuant to this section;
[(32)] (35) "Producer hemp product" means any of the following
produced in this state: Raw hemp product, fiber-based hemp product or
animal hemp food product, and each of which contains a THC
concentration of not more than 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis or per
Public Act No. 26-8 204 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
volume or weight of such producer hemp product;
[(33)] (36) "USDA" means the United States Department of
Agriculture;
[(34)] (37) "Entity" means a corporation, joint stock company,
association, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
liability company, irrevocable trust, estate, charitable organization or
other similar organization, including any such organization
participating in the hemp production as a partner in a general
partnership, a participant in a joint venture or a participant in a similar
organization; and
[(35)] (38) "Homogenize" means to blend hemp into a mixture that
has a uniform quality and content throughout such mixture.
(b) The Commissioner of Agriculture shall establish and operate an
agricultural pilot program, as defined in 7 USC 5940, as amended from
time to time, for hemp research to enable the department, and its
licensees, to study methods of producing and marketing hemp. All
producer licensees licensed pursuant to this section shall be participants
in the state agricultural pilot program for hemp research. Until such
time as said commissioner adopts regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, the Department of Agriculture shall utilize
procedures and guidance policies that the commissioner deems to be
consistent with the provisions of 7 USC 5940, as amended from time to
time, provided such procedures and guidance policies shall, at a
minimum, require: (1) The commissioner to certify and register any site
used to grow hemp, (2) any person who produces hemp to produce
plants that meet the definition of hemp and verify such, (3) the
maintenance of records by any person who grows hemp and the
availability of inspection of such records by the commissioner, and (4)
verification of compliance with the definition of hemp by a laboratory,
at the expense of any licensee. The provisions of this section shall take
Public Act No. 26-8 205 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
precedence over any such procedure or guidance policy. Participants in
the state agricultural pilot program for hemp research shall be licensed
in accordance with the provisions of this section. Such pilot program
shall operate until the earlier of the date of a fully approved state plan
under the federal act, as described in this section, or the date of repeal
of the federal law permitting the state's agricultural pilot program for
hemp research.
(c) (1) The commissioner shall prepare a state plan in accordance with
the federal act and 7 CFR 990.3, for approval by the Governor, in
consultation with the office of the Chief State's Attorney and the
Attorney General. The state plan, once approved by the Governor and
the Attorney General, shall be submitted by the commissioner to the
United States Secretary of Agriculture for such secretary's approval. The
commissioner shall have the authority to amend the state plan, in
consultation with the Governor, the Attorney General and the office of
the Chief State's Attorney, as necessary to comply with the federal act.
(2) The commissioner shall operate the state plan, which shall
include, at a minimum, the following requirements:
(A) The sampling of hemp shall comply, at a minimum, with 7 CFR
990.3 and be performed by an authorized sampling agent;
(B) The testing of hemp shall comply, at a minimum, with 7 CFR
990.3;
(C) The control, remediation and disposal of noncompliant cannabis
plants shall comply with 7 CFR 990.27 and 7 CFR 990.3;
(D) The department shall comply with all recordkeeping and
reporting requirements in the federal act, and 7 CFR 990.1 to 7 CFR
990.71, inclusive;
(E) The department shall comply with enforcement procedures in 7
Public Act No. 26-8 206 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
CFR 990.6;
(F) The department shall conduct annual inspections of, at a
minimum, a random sample of producers to verify that hemp is not
produced in violation of the federal act, the state plan and the provisions
of this section, and shall enforce any violation as provided for in the
federal act and as defined in 7 CFR 990.6;
(G) Producers shall report their required license, lot and hemp crop
acreage information to FSA, in accordance with the requirements in 7
CFR 990.7; and
(H) Producers shall report to the commissioner the total acreage of
hemp planted, harvested and, if applicable, disposed of or remediated,
and such other information as the commissioner may require.
(3) All sampling and testing of hemp shall be done using protocols
that are at least as statistically valid as the USDA's published protocols
for sampling and testing of hemp, which protocols shall be posted on
the department's Internet web site. During a scheduled sample
collection, the producer, or an authorized representative of the
producer, shall be present at the lot. A producer shall not harvest the
cannabis crop prior to the taking of samples. Samples of hemp plant
material from one lot shall not be commingled with hemp plant material
from other lots. Lots tested and not certified by a laboratory at or below
the acceptable hemp THC level shall be handled, remediated and
disposed of in accordance with the federal act, the provisions of this
section and the state plan, as applicable.
(4) The commissioner shall collect, maintain and provide to the
USDA, on a timely basis, and not less than once per month, license status
of each hemp producer, contact information for each hemp producer
licensed in the state, including lot legal descriptions and locations, and
any changes to such information. The commissioner shall also report to
Public Act No. 26-8 207 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the USDA, on a timely basis, and not less than once per month, all
required hemp test results and disposal information for all
nonconforming hemp plants and plant material. Such information shall
not include state and federal fingerprint-based records pursuant to
section 29-17a.
(d) The commissioner shall have the authority to enforce the federal
act, as amended from time to time, the state plan, this section and any
regulations adopted in accordance with the federal act and chapter 54
for hemp production in the state. The commissioner shall have the
authority to enforce the applicable standards for producer hemp
products. The commissioner may consult, collaborate and enter into
cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency, municipality
or political subdivision of the state concerning application of the
provisions of the federal act and the regulations adopted pursuant to the
federal act, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
(e) Any person who produces hemp shall: (1) Be licensed by the
commissioner; (2) comply with the federal act, the state plan, the
provisions of this section and any regulation adopted pursuant to this
section; and (3) transport hemp and hemp samples in a manner and with
such documentation as required by the commissioner.
(f) Any person who sells hemp products shall not be required to be
licensed provided such person only engages in: (1) The retail or
wholesale sale of hemp or hemp products in which no further
producing or manufacturing of the hemp products occurs and the hemp
products are acquired from a person authorized under the laws of this
state or another state, territory or possession of the United States or
another sovereign entity to possess and sell such hemp products; (2) the
acquisition of hemp or hemp products for the sole purpose of product
distribution for resale; or (3) the retail sale of hemp products that are
otherwise authorized under federal or state law.
Public Act No. 26-8 208 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(g) Any applicant for a license pursuant to this section shall meet each
of the following requirements, as applicable:
(1) Each applicant, whether an individual or an entity, shall submit
an application for a license that consists, at a minimum, of the following:
(A) The name, telephone number, electronic mail address, business
address and address of any individual who is the applicant, the full
name of any entity that is the applicant, including any applicable
principal business location and the full name, title and electronic mail
address of each key participant; (B) the name and address of each lot for
the hemp cultivation or producing location; (C) the geospatial location
of each lot by means of global positioning system coordinates and legal
description of each lot used for the hemp cultivation; (D) the acreage
size of each lot where the hemp will be cultivated; (E) written consent
allowing the commissioner to conduct both scheduled and random
inspections of and around the premises on which the hemp is to be
cultivated, harvested, stored and produced; (F) the applicant's employer
identification number or the applicant's Social Security number if an
employer identification number is not available; and (G) any other
information as may be required by the commissioner;
(2) Each individual who is an applicant and each key participant of
any entity applying for a producer license, or renewal thereof, shall
submit to state and national fingerprint-based criminal history records
checks conducted in accordance with section 29-17a, at such individual's
own expense;
(3) No individual, including any key participant of any entity, who
has been convicted of any state or federal felony, related to a controlled
substance, shall be eligible to obtain or hold a producer license for ten
years from the date of the conviction, provided such restriction shall not
apply to any individual who lawfully grew hemp with a license,
registration or authorization under any state pilot program authorized
by section 7606 of the Agricultural Act of 2014 before December 20, 2018.
Public Act No. 26-8 209 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
Any individual or entity that materially falsifies any information in an
application pursuant to this section shall be ineligible to obtain a
producer license; and
(4) Each individual or entity who is required by this section to obtain
a producer license shall pay for all costs of sampling, testing, retesting
and resampling any samples at a laboratory for the purpose of
determining the THC concentration level of any cannabis under their
control, or in their possession. Each individual or entity who is required
by this section to obtain a producer license shall pay for all costs of
disposal of all noncompliant cannabis plants under their control, or in
their possession.
(h) Any producer license issued by the commissioner shall expire on
the third following December thirty-first and may be renewed during
the preceding month of October. Such licenses shall not be transferable.
(i) The following fees shall apply for each producer license and
inspection:
(1) A nonrefundable license application fee of fifty dollars, provided
any constituent unit of higher education, state agency or department
shall be exempt from such application fee if such production is for
research purposes;
(2) A nonrefundable triennial producer license fee of four hundred
fifty dollars for up to one acre of planned hemp plantings and thirty
dollars per each additional acre of planned hemp plantings rounded to
the nearest acre, except no license fee charged shall exceed three
thousand dollars, provided any constituent unit of higher education,
state agency or department shall be exempt from such license fee if such
production is for research purposes; and
(3) In the event that resampling by the commissioner is required due
to a test result that shows a violation of any provision of this section or
Public Act No. 26-8 210 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
any regulation adopted pursuant to this section, the licensee shall pay
an inspection fee of fifty dollars. Such fee shall be paid prior to the
inspection and collection of the sample to be used for resampling.
(j) After receipt and review of an application for producer licensure,
the commissioner may grant a triennial license upon a finding that the
applicant meets the applicable requirements. Each producer licensee
shall notify the commissioner of any changes to their application
information, not later than fifteen days after such change. While the
pilot program is in effect, the commissioner may grant a conditional
approval of a producer license, pending receipt of the criminal history
records check required by this section. The commissioner shall assign
each producer with a license or authorization identifier in a format
consistent with 7 CFR 990.3.
(k) Whenever an inspection or investigation conducted by the
commissioner pursuant to this title reveals any violation of the state
plan, this section or any regulation adopted thereunder, the producer
license applicant or respondent, as applicable, shall be notified, in
writing, of such violation and any corrective action to be taken and the
time period within which such corrective action shall be taken. Any such
producer license applicant or respondent may request a hearing,
conducted in accordance with chapter 54, on any such notification. Any
notification issued pursuant to this section shall be made by certified
mail, return receipt requested to the producer license applicant or
respondent's last known address, by in-hand service by the
commissioner or designated agent of the commissioner, electronic mail
service with the consent of the recipient, or by service in accordance
with chapter 896. The commissioner shall report all producer violations
made with a culpable mental state greater than negligence to the United
States Attorney General and the State's Attorney for the judicial district
in which the producer violation occurred.
(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
Public Act No. 26-8 211 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
commissioner's authority to issue a cease and desist order pursuant to
section 22-4d, or an emergency order, in order to respond to a condition
that may present a public health hazard, or issue orders necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to,
orders for the embargo, partial destruction, destruction and release of
hemp or hemp products. Any cease and desist order or an emergency
order shall become effective upon service of such order by the
commissioner. Following service of any such order, subsequent
proceedings shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of section
22-4d and the rules of practice for such agency. Any embargo, partial
destruction, destruction or release order issued pursuant to this section
shall be served by certified mail, return receipt requested to the
respondent's last known address, by in-hand service by the
commissioner or designated agent of the commissioner, or by service in
accordance with chapter 896.
(m) Following a hearing conducted in accordance with chapter 54,
the commissioner may impose an administrative civil penalty, not to
exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per violation, and suspend,
revoke or place conditions upon any producer licensee who violates the
provisions of this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this
section.
(n) (1) Any individual who produces hemp in this state without
obtaining a license pursuant to this section, or who produces hemp in
this state after having a license suspended or revoked shall have
committed an infraction.
(2) Any entity that produces hemp in this state without obtaining a
license pursuant to this section, produces hemp in violation of this
section or produces hemp in this state after having a license suspended
or revoked may be fined not more than two thousand five hundred
dollars per violation, after a hearing conducted in accordance with
chapter 54.
Public Act No. 26-8 212 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(o) (1) Any negligent violation, as described in the federal act, of this
section or the state plan shall be subject to enforcement in accordance
with the federal act, and the state plan for negligent violations.
(2) For any negligent violation, a producer shall be required to correct
such negligent violation, by means of a corrective action plan approved
by the commissioner. Each corrective action plan shall include, at a
minimum, a reasonable completion deadline for correction of the
negligent violation, periodic reporting to the commissioner for at least
two years and compliance with the state plan.
(3) Any producer that negligently violates the state plan shall not, as
a result of such negligent violation, be referred by the commissioner for
any criminal enforcement action by the federal, state or local
government.
(4) Any producer that negligently violates the state plan three times
during any five-year period shall be ineligible to produce hemp for a
period of five years beginning on the date of the third violation.
(5) The commissioner shall conduct an inspection to determine if the
corrective action plan for a producer who commits any such negligent
violation was properly implemented.
(p) Any person aggrieved by an order issued pursuant to this section
may appeal to the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54. Such appeal shall be made in writing to the commissioner
and received not later than fifteen days after the date of the order. If no
appeal is made pursuant to this subsection the order shall be final.
(q) (1) All documents submitted under this section shall be subject to
disclosure in accordance with chapter 14, except: (A) Information
depicting or describing (i) the test results of any producer, (ii) the
location of any hemp growing, harvesting, processing or storage
location, or (iii) hemp producer location security schematics; and (B) the
Public Act No. 26-8 213 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
results of any criminal history records check.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, all documents and records submitted or maintained
pursuant to this section shall be disclosed to any law enforcement
agency upon request of such law enforcement agency.
(r) The commissioner may inspect and shall have access to the
buildings, equipment, supplies, vehicles, records, real property and
other information that the commissioner deems necessary to carry out
the commissioner's duties pursuant to this section from any person
participating in producing, handling, storing, marketing or researching
hemp.
(s) All licensees pursuant to this section shall maintain records
required by the federal act, the state plan, this section and any regulation
adopted pursuant to this section. Each licensee shall make such records
available to the department immediately upon request of the
commissioner and in electronic format, if available.
(t) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section
including, but not limited to, the labeling of producer hemp products.
(u) Whenever the commissioner believes or has reasonable cause to
believe that the actions of a licensee or any employee of a producer
licensee are in violation of the federal act, the state plan, or any state law
concerning the growing, cultivation, handling, transporting or
possession of [marijuana] cannabis, the commissioner shall notify the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection and the
Division of State Police.
Sec. 100. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
Public Act No. 26-8 214 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(1) "Approved manufactured cannabinoid" means a manufactured
cannabinoid, as defined in section 21a-240 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, that has been approved by the Department of
Consumer Protection and posted on the department's Internet web site;
(2) "Cannabis product" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420 of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(3) "Cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-420
of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(4) "Food and beverage manufacturer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-420 of the general statutes, as amended by this
act;
(5) "Micro-cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420 of the general statutes, as amended by this act; and
(6) "Product manufacturer" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420 of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
(b) On and after December 1, 2026, a manufacturer may manufacture:
(1) Cannabigerol, cannabinol or an approved manufactured
cannabinoid, provided the manufacturer offers and sells such
cannabigerol, cannabinol or approved manufactured cannabinoid
exclusively to a producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product
manufacturer or food and beverage manufacturer; and
(2) Intermediate hemp derivative to be incorporated into a
manufacturer hemp product, provided the manufacturer offers and
sells such intermediate hemp derivative exclusively to a producer,
cultivator, micro-cultivator, product manufacturer, food and beverage
manufacturer or infused beverage manufacturer.
Public Act No. 26-8 215 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(c) (1) On and after December 1, 2026, a producer, cultivator, micro-
cultivator, product manufacturer or food and beverage manufacturer
may purchase cannabigerol, cannabinol, an approved manufactured
cannabinoid or intermediate hemp derivative from a manufacturer,
provided such cannabigerol, cannabinol, approved manufactured
cannabinoid or intermediate hemp derivative:
(A) Was manufactured in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (b) of this section; and
(B) Is tracked as a separate batch throughout the manufacturing
process in order to document the disposition of such cannabigerol,
cannabinol, approved manufactured cannabinoid or intermediate hemp
derivative.
(2) Once cannabigerol, cannabinol, an approved manufactured
cannabinoid or intermediate hemp derivative is received by a producer,
cultivator, micro-cultivator, product manufacturer or food and
beverage manufacturer, such cannabigerol, cannabinol, approved
manufactured cannabinoid or intermediate hemp derivative shall be
deemed cannabis and comply with the requirements for cannabis
contained in the applicable provisions of the general statutes and any
regulations adopted pursuant to such provisions.
(3) A producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product manufacturer or
food and beverage manufacturer shall retain:
(A) A copy of the certificate of analysis for the cannabigerol,
cannabinol, approved manufactured cannabinoid or intermediate hemp
derivative the producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product
manufacturer or food and beverage manufacturer purchased from a
manufacturer; and
(B) Invoices and transport documents that evidence the quantity of
cannabigerol, cannabinol, approved manufactured cannabinoid or
Public Act No. 26-8 216 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
intermediate hemp derivative purchased from the manufacturer and the
date the producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, product manufacturer or
food and beverage manufacturer received such cannabigerol,
cannabinol, approved manufactured cannabinoid or intermediate hemp
derivative.
(d) (1) On and after December 1, 2026, an infused beverage
manufacturer may purchase intermediate hemp derivative from a
manufacturer, provided such intermediate hemp derivative was
manufactured in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) An infused beverage manufacturer shall:
(A) Obtain from an independent testing laboratory, and retain, a
certificate of analysis for the intermediate hemp derivative the infused
beverage manufacturer purchased from a manufacturer in accordance
with the laboratory testing standards established in the regulations
adopted pursuant to section 21a-421j of the general statutes, as amended
by this act; and
(B) Invoices and transport documents that evidence the quantity of
intermediate hemp derivative purchased from the manufacturer and the
date the infused beverage manufacturer received such intermediate
hemp derivative.
(e) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
general statutes, to implement the provisions of this section.
Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive,
of the general statutes, the commissioner shall, prior to adopting such
regulations and in order to effectuate the provisions of this section, issue
policies and procedures to implement the provisions of this section that
shall have the force and effect of law. The commissioner shall post all
Public Act No. 26-8 217 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
policies and procedures on the Department of Consumer Protection's
Internet web site, and submit such policies and procedures to the
Secretary of the State for posting on the eRegulations System, at least
fifteen days prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure. Any
such policy or procedure shall no longer be effective upon the earlier of
either the adoption of the policy or procedure as a final regulation under
section 4-172 of the general statutes or July 1, 2028, if such regulations
have not been submitted to the legislative regulation review committee
for consideration under section 4-170 of the general statutes. Such
policies, procedures and regulations shall include, but need not be
limited to, provisions concerning product tracking information, security
and transportation.
Sec. 101. (NEW) (Effective from passage) No provision of chapter 424 of
the general statutes shall be construed to authorize the interstate
transportation of any product in violation of federal law, including, but
not limited to, the United States Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946, 7
USC 1639o et seq., as amended from time to time.
Sec. 102. Subsection (r) of section 22-61m of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(r) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
implement the provisions of this section including, but not limited to,
establishing sampling and testing procedures to ensure compliance
with this section, prescribing storage and disposal procedures for hemp,
[marijuana] cannabis and manufacturer hemp products that fail to pass
Department of Consumer Protection prescribed independent testing
laboratory testing standards and establishing advertising and labeling
requirements for manufacturer hemp products.
Sec. 103. Section 22-61n of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-8 218 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cannabis product" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(1)] (2) "Cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act;
(3) "Food and beverage manufacturer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(2)] (4) "Hemp" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-61l,
as amended by this act;
[(3)] (5) "Hemp products" has the same meaning as provided in
section 22-61l, as amended by this act;
(6) "Infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-425, as amended by this act;
(7) "Manufacturer" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-
61l, as amended by this act;
[(4)] (8) "Micro-cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420, as amended by this act;
[(5)] (9) "Producer" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420, as amended by this act; and
[(6)] (10) "Product manufacturer" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-420, as amended by this act.
(b) [Any] A producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, [and] food and
beverage manufacturer or product manufacturer may manufacture,
market, cultivate or store hemp and hemp products in accordance with
Public Act No. 26-8 219 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to
[said] this chapter. A producer, cultivator, micro-cultivator, [and] food
and beverage manufacturer or product manufacturer that obtains hemp
and hemp products shall only obtain such hemp and hemp products
from a person authorized under the laws of this state or another state,
territory or possession of the United States or another sovereign entity
to possess and sell such hemp and hemp products.
(c) Hemp or hemp products purchased by a producer, cultivator,
micro-cultivator, food and beverage manufacturer or product
manufacturer [or food and beverage manufacturer] from a third party
shall be tracked as a separate batch throughout the manufacturing
process in order to document the disposition of such hemp or hemp
products. Once hemp or hemp products are received by a producer,
cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage manufacturer or
product manufacturer [or food and beverage manufacturer] to
manufacture a cannabis product, such hemp or hemp products shall be
deemed cannabis and shall comply with the requirements for cannabis
contained in the applicable provisions of the general statutes and any
regulations adopted pursuant to such provisions. A producer,
cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage manufacturer or
product manufacturer [and food and beverage manufacturer] shall
retain a copy of the certificate of analysis for purchased hemp or hemp
products and invoice and transport documents that evidence the
quantity purchased and date received.
Sec. 104. Section 30-1 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context indicates a
different meaning:
(1) "Airline" means any (A) United States airline carrier holding a
Public Act No. 26-8 220 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Civil
Aeronautics Board under Section 401 of the Federal Aviation Act of
1958, as amended from time to time, or (B) foreign flag carrier holding a
permit under Section 402 of said act.
(2) "Alcohol" (A) means the product of distillation of any fermented
liquid that is rectified at least once and regardless of such liquid's origin,
and (B) includes synthetic ethyl alcohol which is considered nonpotable.
(3) "Alcoholic beverage" and "alcoholic liquor" include the four
varieties of liquor defined in subdivisions (2), (5), [(21)] (22) and [(22)]
(23) of this section (alcohol, beer, spirits and wine) and every liquid or
solid, patented or unpatented, containing alcohol, beer, spirits or wine
and at least one-half of one per cent alcohol by volume, and capable of
being consumed by a human being as a beverage. Any liquid or solid
containing more than one of the four varieties so defined belongs to the
variety which has the highest percentage of alcohol according to the
following order: Alcohol, spirits, wine and beer, except as provided in
subdivision [(22)] (23) of this section.
(4) "Backer" means, except in cases where the permittee is the
proprietor, the proprietor of any business or club, incorporated or
unincorporated, that is engaged in manufacturing or selling alcoholic
liquor and in which business a permittee is associated, whether as an
agent, employee or part owner.
(5) "Beer" means any beverage obtained by the alcoholic fermentation
of a decoction or infusion of barley, hops and malt in drinking water.
(6) "Boat" means any vessel that is (A) operating on any waterway of
this state, and (B) engaged in transporting passengers for hire to or from
any port of this state.
(7) "Business entity" means any incorporated or unincorporated
association, corporation, firm, joint stock company, limited liability
Public Act No. 26-8 221 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
company, limited liability partnership, partnership, trust or other legal
entity.
(8) "Case price" means the price of a container made of cardboard,
wood or any other material and containing units of the same class and
size of alcoholic liquor. A case of alcoholic liquor, other than beer,
cocktails, cordials, prepared mixed drinks and wines, shall be in the
quantity and number, or fewer, with the permission of the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection, of bottles or units as follows:
(A) Six three thousand seven hundred fifty milliliter bottles, (B) six three
thousand milliliter bottles, (C) six two thousand milliliter bottles, (D) six
one thousand eight hundred milliliter bottles, (E) six one thousand
seven hundred fifty milliliter bottles, (F) six one thousand five hundred
milliliter bottles, (G) six nine hundred forty-five milliliter bottles, (H)
twelve one liter bottles, (I) twelve nine hundred milliliter bottles, (J)
twelve seven hundred fifty milliliter bottles, (K) twelve seven hundred
twenty milliliter bottles, (L) twelve seven hundred ten milliliter bottles,
(M) twelve seven hundred milliliter bottles, (N) twelve five hundred
seventy milliliter bottles, (O) twelve five hundred milliliter bottles, (P)
twelve four hundred seventy-five milliliter bottles, (Q) twenty-four
three hundred seventy-five milliliter bottles, (R) twenty-four three
hundred fifty-five milliliter bottles, (S) twenty-four three hundred fifty
milliliter bottles, (T) twenty-four three hundred thirty-one milliliter
bottles, (U) forty-eight two hundred fifty milliliter bottles, (V) forty-
eight two hundred milliliter bottles, (W) forty-eight one hundred eighty-
seven milliliter bottles, (X) sixty one hundred milliliter bottles, or (Y) one
hundred twenty fifty milliliter bottles, except a case of fifty milliliter
bottles may be in a quantity and number as originally configured,
packaged and sold by the manufacturer or out-of-state shipper prior to
shipment if the number of such bottles in such case is not greater than
two hundred. The commissioner shall not authorize fewer quantities or
numbers of bottles or units as specified in this subdivision for any one
person or entity more than eight times in any calendar year. For the
Public Act No. 26-8 222 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
purposes of this subdivision, "class" has the same meaning as provided
in 27 CFR 4.21 for wine, 27 CFR 5.22 for spirits and 27 CFR 7.24 for beer.
(9) "Club" has the same meaning as provided in section 30-22aa.
(10) "Coliseum" has the same meaning as provided in section 30-33a.
(11) "Commission" means the Liquor Control Commission
established under this chapter.
(12) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection.
(13) "Dining room" means any room or rooms (A) located in premises
operating under (i) a hotel permit issued under section 30-21, (ii) a
restaurant permit issued under subsection (a) of section 30-22, (iii) a
restaurant permit for wine and beer issued under subsection (b) of
section 30-22, (iv) a cafe permit issued under section 30-22a, or (v) a cafe
permit for wine, beer and cider issued under section 30-22g, and (B)
where meals are customarily served to any member of the public who
has means of payment and a proper demeanor.
(14) "Infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-425, as amended by this act.
[(14)] (15) "Mead" means fermented honey (A) with or without
additions or adjunct ingredients, and (B) regardless of (i) alcohol
content, (ii) process, and (iii) whether such honey is carbonated,
sparkling or still.
[(15)] (16) "Minor" means any person who is younger than twenty-
one years of age.
[(16)] (17) "Noncommercial entity" means an academic institution,
charitable organization, government organization, nonprofit
organization or similar entity that is not primarily dedicated to
obtaining a commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
Public Act No. 26-8 223 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
[(17)] (18) "Nonprofit club" has the same meaning as provided in
section 30-22aa.
[(18)] (19) (A) "Person" means an individual, including, but not
limited to, a partner.
(B) "Person" does not include any business entity.
[(19)] (20) (A) "Proprietor" includes all owners of a business or club,
incorporated or unincorporated, that is engaged in manufacturing or
selling alcoholic liquor, whether such owners are persons, fiduciaries,
business entities, stockholders of corporations or otherwise.
(B) "Proprietor" does not include any person who, or business entity
that, is merely a creditor, whether as a bond holder, franchisor, landlord
or note holder, of a business or club, incorporated or unincorporated,
that is engaged in manufacturing or selling alcoholic liquor.
[(20)] (21) "Restaurant" has the same meaning as provided in section
30-22.
[(21)] (22) "Spirits" means any beverage that contains alcohol
obtained by distillation mixed with drinkable water and other
substances in solution, including brandy, rum, whiskey and gin.
[(22)] (23) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermenting the natural sugar content of fruits, such as apples, grapes or
other agricultural products, containing such sugar, including fortified
wines such as port, sherry and champagne.
Sec. 105. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 30-17d of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section, [: (1) "Container"] "container" has
the same meaning as provided in section 21a-425, as amended by this
Public Act No. 26-8 224 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
act. [; and
(2) "Infused beverage" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-425.]
(b) A fee of one dollar shall be assessed by the holder of a wholesaler
permit or a wholesaler permit for beer issued under section 30-17 on
each infused beverage container sold to the holder of a package store
permit issued under subsection (b) of section 30-20, as amended by this
act. Such fee shall not be subject to any sales tax or treated as income
pursuant to any provision of the general statutes.
(c) On the second days of January [2, 2025, and every six months
thereafter] and July, annually, each holder of a wholesaler permit or a
wholesaler permit for beer issued under section 30-17 shall remit
payment to the department for each infused beverage container sold
during the preceding six-month period. The funds received by the
department from infused beverage sales shall be deposited in the
consumer protection enforcement account established in section 21a-8a
for the purposes of (1) protecting public health and safety, (2) educating
consumers and licensees, and (3) ensuring compliance with cannabis
and liquor control laws.
Sec. 106. Subsection (b) of section 30-20 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) A package store permit shall allow the retail sale of alcoholic
liquor in sealed bottles or containers not to be consumed on the permit
premises. The holder of a package store permit may, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Department of Consumer Protection
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 54, (A) offer free samples of
alcoholic liquor for tasting on the permit premises, (B) conduct fee-
based wine or spirits education and tasting classes and demonstrations,
Public Act No. 26-8 225 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
and (C) conduct tastings or demonstrations provided by a permittee or
backer of the package store for a nominal charge to charitable nonprofit
organizations. Any offering, tasting, wine or spirits education and
tasting class or demonstration held on permit premises shall be
conducted only during the hours the package store may sell alcoholic
liquor under section 30-91. No tasting of wine on the permit premises
shall be offered from more than ten uncorked bottles at any one time.
No holder, backer or permittee shall offer or provide to any customer (i)
more than one-half ounce of any single spirit for sampling or tasting per
day, or (ii) a total of more than two ounces of spirits for sampling or
tasting per day. No tasting shall be provided below cost.
(2) No store operating under a package store permit shall sell any
commodity other than alcoholic liquor except, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, such store may sell (A) cigarettes and cigars, (B)
publications, (C) bar utensils, including, but not limited to, corkscrews,
beverage strainers, stirrers or other similar items used to consume, or
related to the consumption of, alcoholic liquor, (D) gift packages of
alcoholic liquor shipped into the state by a manufacturer or out-of-state
shipper, which gift packages may include nonalcoholic items, other than
food or tobacco products, if the dollar value of the nonalcoholic items in
such gift package does not exceed the dollar value of the alcoholic items
in such gift package, (E) complementary fresh fruits used in the
preparation of mixed alcoholic beverages, (F) cheese, crackers or both,
(G) olives, (H) nonalcoholic beverages, (I) concentrates used in the
preparation of mixed alcoholic beverages, (J) beer and wine-making kits
and products related to such kits, (K) ice in any form, (L) articles of
clothing imprinted with advertising related to the alcoholic liquor
industry, (M) gift baskets or other containers of alcoholic liquor, (N)
multiple packages of alcoholic liquors, provided in all such cases the
minimum retail selling price for such alcoholic liquor shall apply, (O)
lottery tickets authorized by the Department of Consumer Protection, if
licensed as an agent to sell such tickets by the department, (P) devices
Public Act No. 26-8 226 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
and related accessories designed primarily for accessing and extracting
a beverage containing alcohol from prepackaged containers, including,
but not limited to, pods, pouches or similar containers, but excluding
devices, including, but not limited to, household blenders, that are not
designed primarily for such purposes, (Q) alcohol-infused confections
containing not more than one-half of one per cent of alcohol by weight
and which the commissioner has approved for sale under section 21a-
101, (R) gift baskets containing only containers of alcoholic liquor and
commodities authorized for sale under subparagraphs (A) to (Q),
inclusive, of this subdivision, and (S) infused beverages, [as defined in
section 21a-425,] provided (i) the package store permittee (I) paid to the
department the annual fee for an infused beverage endorsement
pursuant to this subdivision, and (II) purchased such infused beverages
from the holder of a wholesaler permit or a wholesaler permit for beer
issued under section 30-17 or an infused beverage wholesaler licensed
under section 21a-425e, as amended by this act, and (ii) such sales are
made in accordance with the provisions of section 21a-425b, as amended
by this act. [, and (T) legacy infused beverages, as defined in section 21a-
425d, provided all such sales shall be made (i) during the period
beginning on July 1, 2024, and ending September 30, 2024, and (ii) in
accordance with (I) a waiver issued pursuant to section 21a-425d, and
(II) the requirements set forth in section 21a-425d.] A package store
permit shall also allow the taking and transmitting of orders for delivery
of such merchandise in other states. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, a package store permit shall allow the participation in
any lottery ticket promotion or giveaway sponsored by the department.
The annual fee for a package store permit shall be five hundred thirty-
five dollars. The annual fee for an infused beverage endorsement to a
package store permit shall be five hundred dollars, and shall be
deposited by the department in the consumer protection enforcement
account established in section 21a-8a.
Sec. 107. Subsection (a) of section 30-47 of the 2026 supplement to the
Public Act No. 26-8 227 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Consumer Protection may, in the department's
discretion, suspend, revoke or refuse to grant or renew a permit for the
sale of alcoholic liquor, or impose a fine of not greater than one thousand
dollars per violation, if the department has reasonable cause to believe:
(1) That the applicant or permittee appears to be financially
irresponsible or neglects to provide for the applicant's or permittee's
family, or neglects or is unable to pay the applicant's or permittee's just
debts; (2) that the applicant or permittee has been provided with funds
by any wholesaler or manufacturer or has any forbidden connection
with any other class of permittee as provided in this chapter; (3) that the
applicant or permittee is in the habit of using alcoholic beverages to
excess; (4) that the applicant or permittee has wilfully made any false
statement to the department in a material matter; (5) that the applicant
or permittee has been convicted of violating any of the liquor laws of
this or any other state or the liquor laws of the United States or has been
convicted of a felony as such term is defined in section 53a-25, provided
any action taken is based upon (A) the nature of the conviction and its
relationship to the applicant or permittee's ability to safely or
competently perform the duties associated with such permit, (B)
information pertaining to the degree of rehabilitation of the applicant or
permittee, and (C) the time elapsed since the conviction or release, or
has such a criminal record that the department reasonably believes the
applicant or permittee is not a suitable person to hold a permit, provided
no refusal shall be rendered under this subdivision except in accordance
with the provisions of sections 46a-80 and 46a-81; (6) that the applicant
or permittee has not been delegated full authority and control of the
permit premises and of the conduct of all business on such premises; or
(7) that the applicant, applicant's backer, backer or permittee has
violated (A) any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted
under this chapter, or (B) any provision of sections 21a-425 to [21a-425d]
Public Act No. 26-8 228 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
21a-425f, inclusive, as amended by this act, or any regulation adopted
under subsection [(k)] (l) of section 21a-425a, as amended by this act.
Any applicant, applicant's backer or backer shall be subject to the same
disqualifications as provided in this chapter, or any regulation adopted
under this chapter, for permittees.
Sec. 108. Subsection (e) of section 30-63 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the sale or
distribution of infused beverages, [or legacy infused beverages,] as
[such terms are] defined in section 21a-425, as amended by this act.
Sec. 109. Subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of section 31-40q of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(6) "Cannabis" [means marijuana, as defined] has the same meaning
as provided in section 21a-240, as amended by this act;
Sec. 110. Section 38a-1052 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-240,
as amended by this act;
[(1)] (2) "Caregiver" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
408, as amended by this act;
[(2) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240;]
(3) "Palliative use" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
Public Act No. 26-8 229 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
408, as amended by this act; and
(4) "Qualifying patient" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-408, as amended by this act.
(b) There is established, within available appropriations, an Office of
the Cannabis Ombudsman, which shall be within the Office of the
Healthcare Advocate for administrative purposes only. The Office of the
Cannabis Ombudsman shall be under the direction of a Cannabis
Ombudsman. The Healthcare Advocate shall appoint an individual
who is familiar with the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis and the
medical cannabis system to serve as the Cannabis Ombudsman.
(c) The Office of the Cannabis Ombudsman shall:
(1) Represent the interests of qualifying patients and caregivers;
(2) Identify, investigate and resolve complaints made by, or on behalf
of, qualifying patients and caregivers;
(3) Monitor the palliative use of [marijuana] cannabis as authorized
under chapter 420f;
(4) Report action, inaction or decisions that may adversely affect the
health, safety, welfare or rights of qualifying patients;
(5) Analyze, comment on and monitor the development and
implementation of federal, state and local laws, regulations and other
government policies and actions concerning the health, safety, welfare
and rights of qualifying patients and caregivers;
(6) Recommend any changes to the laws, regulations, policies and
actions described in subdivision (5) of this subsection that the office
deems appropriate to, among other things, improve the palliative
[marijuana] cannabis market in this state; and
Public Act No. 26-8 230 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
(7) Facilitate public comment on the laws, regulations, policies and
actions described in subdivision (5) of this subsection.
Sec. 111. Section 53-247a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any person who provides cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420]
21a-240, as amended by this act, to a domesticated animal, shall be guilty
of a class C misdemeanor.
Sec. 112. Subsection (a) of section 53a-213a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of smoking, otherwise inhaling or ingesting
cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act,
while operating a motor vehicle when he or she smokes, otherwise
inhales or ingests cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as
amended by this act, while operating a motor vehicle upon a public
highway of this state or upon any road of any specially chartered
municipal association or of any district organized under the provisions
of chapter 105, a purpose of which is the construction and maintenance
of roads and sidewalks, or in any parking area for ten cars or more, or
upon any private road on which a speed limit has been established in
accordance with the provisions of section 14-218a or upon any school
property. No person shall be convicted of smoking or otherwise
inhaling or ingesting cannabis while operating a motor vehicle and
possessing or having under such person's control a controlled substance
upon the same transaction. A person may be charged and prosecuted
for either or each such offense, a violation of operating a motor vehicle
while under the influence of any drug and any other applicable offense
upon the same information.
Sec. 113. Subsection (a) of section 53a-213b of the 2026 supplement to
Public Act No. 26-8 231 of 232

Substitute House Bill No. 5350
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of smoking or otherwise inhaling or ingesting
cannabis, as defined in section [21a-420] 21a-240, as amended by this act,
in a motor vehicle when he or she smokes or otherwise inhales or ingests
cannabis in a motor vehicle that is being operated by another person
upon a public highway of this state or upon any road of any specially
chartered municipal association or of any district organized under the
provisions of chapter 105, a purpose of which is the construction and
maintenance of roads and sidewalks, or in any parking area for ten cars
or more, or upon any private road on which a speed limit has been
established in accordance with the provisions of section 14-218a or upon
any school property. No person shall be convicted of smoking or
otherwise inhaling or ingesting cannabis as a passenger in a motor
vehicle and possessing or having under such person's control a
controlled substance upon the same transaction, but such person may
be charged and prosecuted for both offenses upon the same information.
Sec. 114. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to consumer protection recommending
legislation to establish a micro-retailer license in the state's adult use
cannabis market.
Sec. 115. Sections 21a-425c and 21a-425d of the general statutes are
repealed. (Effective October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026
Public Act No. 26-8 232 of 232